,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,"Data Engineer, Supply Chain",$115k-$187k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

How would Facebook scale to the next billion users? The Infrastructure Supply Chain group is responsible for the strategic analysis to support and enable the continued growth critical to Facebooks infrastructure organization. We are looking for a Data Engineer to not only build data pipelines but also extend our data tools. As a Data Engineer, you will develop a clear sense of connection with our organization and leadership - as Data Engineering is critical investment to scale analytics capabilities and drive strategy. This is a partnership-heavy role. As a member of Infrastructure Supply Chain Analytics team, you will belong to a centralized Analytics and Data Engineering team who partners closely with teams in Facebooks Infrastructure organization. Through the consulting-nature of our team, you will contribute to a variety of projects and technologies, depending on partner needs. Projects include analytics, ML modeling, tooling, services and more.
Partner with leadership, engineers, program managers and data analyst to understand data needs.
Design, build and launch efficient and reliable data pipelines transforming data into useful report ready datasets.
Communicate at scale, through multiple mediums: Presentations, dashboards, company-wide datasets, bots and more.
Use your data and analytics experience to see whats missing identifying and address data gaps, build monitor to detect data quality issues and partner to establish a self-serve environment.
Broad range of partners equates to a broad range of projects and deliverables including ML Models, datasets, measurements, services, tools and process.
Leverage data and business principles to automate data flow, detect business exceptions, build diagnostic capabilities, improve both business and data knowledge base.
Build data expertise and own data quality for your areas.
5+ years of SQL experience.
4+ years of Python development experience.
3+ years of experience with workflow management engines (i.e. Airflow, Luigi, Prefect, Dagster, digdag.io, Google Cloud Composer, AWS Step Functions, Azure Data Factory, UC4, Control-M).
3+ years experience with Data Modeling.
Experience analyzing data to discover opportunities and address gaps.
5+ years experience in custom ETL design, implementation and maintenance.
Experience working with cloud or on-prem Big Data/MPP analytics platform (i.e. Netezza, Teradata, AWS Redshift, Google BigQuery, Azure Data Warehouse, or similar).
Experience with more than one coding language.
Experience in designing and implementing real-time pipelines.
Experience with data quality and validation.
Experience with SQL performance tuning and e2e process optimization.
Experience with anomaly/outlier detection.
Experience with notebook-based Data Science workflow.
Experience querying massive datasets using Spark, Presto, Hive, Impala, etc.
Experience working with Supply Chain or Data Center Operation team.
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
1,Consulting Data and ETL Engineer,$61k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position will lead interface and ETL development efforts in claims, financial and other care systems. Will also support audits and contribute to new development processes. Ensure data governance and best practice is embraced. Responsible for understanding business and IT strategy to align with outcomes. Will be a hands-on Data and Integration Engineer who can write quality code, assist with problem solving, root cause analysis, trouble shooting and coaching. Must understand big picture from a business standpoint within the context of the application. Will define improvements to increase system reliability, security and performance. Perform rich data visualizations and presentations to senior management on value adds.
Acts as the primary focal point for both internal and external customers as to software development tasks. This includes estimates of feasibility, time and effort of tasks. Provide updates to both the user community and the programmers. Monitor projects, determines potential problems and guides them to a successful completion.
Ensures that all work is getting accomplished by making assignments and monitoring tasks. This includes balancing work between programmers, analysts, project managers, supervisors, and managers, and ensuring that the proper policies and procedures are being followed.
Mentors staff and continues to work hands-on doing programming and analysis work themselves.
Tracks all project requests in functional area and updates status of projects on a regular basis.
Assists in estimating project work effort associated with new project requests.
Assists in planning for the development and support of a functional systems area.
Contributes to on-call staff coverage.
Proficient in developing and maintaining Snaplogic, Informatica, PL/SQL code.
Researching, analyzing, documenting, and solving data issues.
Healthcare, Pharmacy or Medi-Cal claims insurance experience preferred.
Develops, tests and maintains code using software development methodology and appropriate technologies for the system being used.
Works closely with Business Analysts to develop detail systems design and written test plans for online and report application programs.
Performs analysis on projects and provides a project plan that shows the tasks needing to be completed and a time estimate for each task.
Participates in design walkthroughs with appropriate focus groups and related users to verify accuracy of design in meeting business needs.
Prepares installation instructions and coordinates installation procedures.
Supports and troubleshoots application code problems.
Provides status reports that give a detailed description of the current projects progress and indicates time devoted to each task of the project.
Coordinates, guides and mentors programming efforts performed by in-house programmers or outside consultants to ensure that all programming is completed according to the project plan.

Other Job Requirements

Responsibilities

7+ years related experience including a minimum of 3-4 years of designing, building and maintaining high quality, secure software in IT.
Agile and Design Thinking (Coursera).
Critical thinker.
Demonstrated problem solving techniques.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
ServiceNow training.

General Job Information

Work Experience

IT

Education

Bachelors: Computer and Information Science

License and Certifications - Required

License and Certifications - Preferred

Magellan Health Services is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and a Tobacco-free workplace. EOE/M/F/Vet/Disabled. Every employee must understand, comply and attest to the security responsibilities and security controls unique to their position.",3.2,"Magellan Health
3.2","Rancho Cordova, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
2,EO/IR sensor payload Image Processing Senior Principal Systems Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

We are looking for an EO/IR sensor payload Image Processing Senior Principal Systems Engineer to be part of a growth-oriented organization. This role will leverage your knowledge of all elements of a spaceborne image acquisition system, including algorithm design, sensor and hardware/software performance considerations, optics design, and interface requirements. The successful candidate will have a strong Physical Science/Engineering/Applied Math/Computer Science background. The job will require continuous interaction with the program Chief Engineer, the Systems Engineering team, and a broad cross-functional team. Your vital contribution will help us to deliver excellence on a dynamic program critical to national security.

Required Skills:
10+ years engineering experience
Strong Physical Science/Engineering/Applied Math/Computer Science background
Experience with digital image processing
Extensive experience programming with Matlab
Ability to work independently and manage ones time and tasks
Ability to determine and develop rigorous analytical approaches to problem solving
Evidence of problem solving and time management skills
Experience working with multi-disciplined teams
Active DOD Secret Clearance
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment
Desired Skills:
Experience designing algorithms for target detection and tracking
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work with minimal supervision and collaborate on small teams
Experience designing hardware-in-the-loop and software-in-the-loop testbeds for algorithm verification
Experience with flight software auto-generation using Simulink
Experience with extended Kalman filter design
Required Education (including Major):

Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Math, Science or related technical STEM discipline
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#IdeasInOrbit
#Space2020 168625

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
3,Cyber Security Engineer (TENCAP),$78k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Working at USfalcon is about providing exceptional professional services to the DoD and various Federal Agencies. We have been excelling in diverse platforms for almost 30 years and continue to be an industry leader. If you thrive in an organization that values integrity, commitment, stewardship, and service, we want to meet you.
We have an exciting opportunity to join us in supporting one of our valued customers as a Cyber Security Engineer (TENCAP) to work out of Schriever AFB, CO.

Provide guidance assistance to all levels of C&A technical and non-technical personnel.
Put C&A packages together and submit them to the proper agency. Track and report the status to the customer.
Document existing and proposed information architecture to convey compliance, problems, and solutions.
Resolve incidents and breaches, mitigating problems, and informing key personnel.
Analyze networks to identify vulnerabilities and reduce breaches.
Develop and implement scanning and certification plans for network control and maintenance.
Assist the Government in performing threat assessments to determine if potential threats to a system/network exist and the likelihood of that threat actually occurring to the system.
Assist in ensuring that IA and IA-enabled software, hardware, and firmware comply with appropriate security configuration guidelines.
Assist in executing all security tests and evaluations and support the creation of comprehensive threat and risk assessment reports.
Oversee the overall security, integrity and operations of USAFWC systems and networks IAW AFI 33-115, AFI 33-200, AFI 33-210, AFI 31-501, AFMAN 33-152, AFMAN 33-282, and local policies and procedures.
Collect and maintain data needed to meet Cybersecurity reporting requirements.
Ensure Security Technical Implementation Guide (STIG) configuration, patching, scanning and testing of systems.
Develop/review Communication System Requirement Document (CSRD) technical solutions to provide network, computer system, financial, installation, outside agency coordination, information assurance and customer assistance.
Develop/find technical solutions and work plans that are consistent with architectural and information system security guidelines.
Support the Government in the development of assessment and authorization (A&A) packages via the RMF, IAW Air Force Policy Directive (AFPD) 33-2, DoD Directive 8500.1, DoD Instruction 8500.2, DoD Instruction 8510.01, Intelligence Community Directive (ICD) 502, ICD 503, NIST SP 800-53, and AFI 33-210 Air Force Certification and Accreditation (C&A) Program and supports USAFWC customers/users with their specific network and stand-alone system accreditations to include maintaining and updating Trusted Facility Manuals, system descriptions, security policies, user guides, system architectures and security-related documentation.
Prepare and present training tailored for initial and periodic Information Awareness (IA) Training, System Administrator Technical Awareness, and executive level IA.
Provide information to support System Administrators, Network Managers, users, procurement staff and security personnel and monitor, implement and report on all security/configuration patches/changes (i.e., NOTAM, IAVA and security/vulnerability advisories).
Perform a weekly review of the audit trail for USAFWCs systems IAW Air Force Policy Directive (AFPD) 33-2, DoD Instruction 8500.2, ICS 500-27, and ICS 700-02.
Conduct vulnerability testing and risk analysis as part of the overall assessment process on all networks and systems as determined by the Government.
Additional duties as assigned

Required Skills:
Minimum of 5 years experience in information system security development and management.
6 years of additional, relevant experience will suffice in lieu of degree.
Desired Skills:
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications (e.g., Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Access, and Outlook)
Education:
Bachelors degree in IT, Computer Science, Engineering.
IAT Level 2 Certification preferred.
Clearance: TS/SCI
Travel: 10%",4.4,"USfalcon
4.4","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
4,Industrial Engineer/Process Engineer,$39k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"TriMech Services is an engineering resource provider specializing in the placement of qualified technical candidates for both temporary and direct hire opportunities. TriMech Services offers a unique approach to matching the specialized skillsets of our candidates to the engineering specific industry.

Industrial/Process Engineer

Responsibilities:
Plan operation of facilities, equipment, materials, and personnel to improve efficiency of Production.
Learn functional operations, organization charts, and project information to determine functions and responsibilities of workers and work units and to identify areas of duplication.
Establish programs and analyzes work samples to develop standards for labor utilization.
Analyze work force utilization, facility layout, and operational data, such as production costs, process flow charts, and production schedules, to determine efficient utilization of workers and equipment.
Recommend methods for improving worker efficiency and reducing waste of materials and utilities, such as restructuring job duties, reorganizing work flow, relocating work stations and equipment, and purchase of equipment.
Confer with management and engineering staff to implement plans and recommendations.
May develop management systems for cost analysis, financial planning, wage and salary administration, and job evaluation.
Evaluate and justify requests for capital expenditures.

Education and Experience:
BS in Engineering is required. Prior Process or Industrial Engineer for the last 3-5 years preferred
Knowledge of principles, methods and techniques in the design and operation of automated process control systems and their components.
Knowledge of principles and methods of systems analysis, including business process and entity relationship analysis tools and methods.
Experience conducting Time Studies and calculating OEE.
Familiarity with standard software packages, including Microsoft Office, database and flow charting.
Lean training and experience are essential

Experience and Education:
5+ Years Experience in AutoCAD.
Six Sigma Green Belt certification preferred.
Knowledge of SPC preferred.",3.4,"TriMech Services
3.4","Knoxville, TN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
5,Principal Software Engineer - Platform,$83k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"The position

Nasuni is expanding our Platform development team and looking for a Principal Python Software Engineer. This team is responsible developing and maintaining the Core Operating System and Python Services of the Nasuni Cloud File Server Edge Appliance.

Were looking for Python Software Engineers passionate about learning and pushing cloud technology to the edge and beyond.

This candidate will be responsible for creation and maintenance of new Python services, integrating with third party utilities and protocols, including SAMBA and ProFTP to expand the capabilities of our Edge Appliance.

During Covid-19 Nasuni is interviewing and onboarding remotely. This position is based in Boston Seaport or Marlborough MA.

As the Principal Software Engineer, you will...
Participate in requirements analysis, design, design reviews and other work related to expanding Nasuni's Platform and Operating System.
Develop and maintain Python libraries and services delivered to customers as part of our NAS appliance
Debug and fix bugs reported by customers, support, QA and development
Work with customer support to address any escalations
Required skills and experience we look for are...
6+ years of enterprise software development experience using Python
Fluent in a Linux or CentOS environment
Linux library distribution, such as RPM or Yum.
Computer Science degree or similar experience that includes System Design, Design Principals, Code Architecture.
As a Principal Engineer at Nasuni you should have prior technical team leadership and mentoring experience.
Plus skills include
Linux system administration or configuration; System services, Firewall, Iptables
Networking protocols such as TCP, UDP, HTTP
Nasuni's product is a Cloud File Storage Solutions, having File Storage Protocols including NFS, CIFS, SMB is helpful, but if you have not used, our team will help ramp you up.
Our Cloud-Native Platform connects to enterprise applications and public storage via Software API's. Having prior API creation and utilization is helpful.
Experience with and contributions to open-source communities is a plus
PostgreSQL is used as backbone to our system, prior Postgres is helpful.
Exposure to Cloud Storage backend integration with AWS or Azure.
Knowledge of containerization with Docker and Kubernetes
Modern source control repositories such as Git
Other high-level languages including; C++, Golang, Java, or Perl
Certified Scrum Master
About Nasuni

Nasuni delivers a single software platform to store, protect, synchronize, and collaborate on unstructured file data at scale. Nasuni Cloud File Services, powered by the patented UniFS® global file system, leverages cloud storage to modernize primary NAS and file server storage; file archiving; backup; and disaster recovery, while offering transformational new capabilities for multi-site file collaboration. By combining the low cost, unlimited capacity, and durability of private or public cloud object storage with the high performance, security, and broad application compatibility of traditional disk-based file storage, the Nasuni subscription service improves workforce productivity, simplifies IT operations, and reduces IT costs. Nasuni operates globally from its worldwide headquarters in Boston, Mass., USA.

Why work at Nasuni?
As part of our commitment to your well-being, we are pleased to offer comprehensive benefits packages to employees across the world. Benefits packages vary by geography, but generally include:
Take-What-You-Need paid time off
Incentive stock options
Comprehensive health, dental, and vision plans
Life and disability insurance
Retirement plan
Generous employee referral bonuses
To all recruitment agencies: Nasuni does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our job boards, Nasuni employees or any other company location. Nasuni is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

Nasuni is an equal opportunity employer. The equal employment opportunity policy at Nasuni protects employees and job applicants from discrimination on the bases of race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors. These protections extend to all management practices and decisions, including recruitment and hiring practices, appraisal systems, promotions, and training and career development programs.",3.9,"Nasuni
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
6,Staff Data Engineer (Analytics),-1,"At Edelman Financial Engines, we believe every hardworking American deserves to move their financial life forward, and were growing our team so we can help more clients every day.

The Data Engineering team at Edelman Financial Engines is looking for an experienced Staff Data Engineer to build out and enhance our robust enterprise-wide data analytics platform for our Finance department. The data analytics platform consists of the enterprise data warehouse (AWS Redshift), AWS data lake, business dashboards (Tableau), key corporate data marts, and the data pipelines (Apache Airflow).

Responsibilities and Roles:
This member will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture across Finance, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for other cross functional teams.
This role will work on data initiatives, including data quality and data governance and ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects.
The individual must be independent and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products with guidance.
As part of Data Engineering team, contribute towards scaling and maintaining our data analytics platform
Requirements:
8+ years of hands-on experience as a developer in Data Engineering working with data warehouse systems and data pipelines.
Intermediate to Expert level / 6+ years hands-on experience like Redshift, SQL and Python.
Experience working with data formats such as Apache AVRO, Apache Parquet, and common methods in data transformation
Excellent teamwork and communication skills
Experience working as Data Engineer in Finance/Financial Analytics is a strong plus
BS or MS in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or similar
Experience with AWS Big Data technology stack and AWS Certification is a plus.
About Edelman Financial Engines

Since 1986, Edelman Financial Engines has been committed to always acting in the best interest of our clients. We were founded on the belief that all American investors not just the wealthy deserve access to personalized, comprehensive financial planning and investment advice. Today, we are Americas top independent financial planning and investment advisor, recognized by both InvestmentNews1 and Barrons2 with 150+ planner offices across the country and entrusted by more than 1.2 million clients to manage more than $220 billion in assets. Our unique approach to serving clients combines our advanced methodology and proprietary technology with the attention of a dedicated personal financial planner. Every clients situation and goals are unique, and the powerful fusion of high-tech and high-touch allows Edelman Financial Engines to deliver the personal plan and financial confidence that everyone deserves.

For more information, visit www.EdelmanFinancialEngines.com and www.FinancialEngines.com

© 2019 Edelman Financial Engines, LLC All rights reserved. All advisory services provided by Financial Engines Advisors L.L.C. Financial Engines Advisors does not guarantee future results.

For California residents, please see the link for the Privacy Notice for Candidates. California law requires that we provide you this notice about the collection and use of your personal information. Please read it carefully and reach out to Jill OConnell (857-305-8555 or joconnell@edelmanfinancialengines.com) with any questions.

Edelman Financial Engines encourages success based on our individual merits and abilities without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, pregnancy, marital, domestic partner, or civil union status, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, ethnic heritage, genetic information, age, legally recognized disability, military service or veteran status.

1 Ranking and status for 2019. For independence methodology and ranking, see InvestmentNews Center (http://data.investmentnews.com/ria/);

2 The 2019 Top 50 Independent Advisory Firm Ranking issued by Barrons is qualitative and quantitative, including assets managed, the size and experience of teams, and the regulatory records of the advisers and firms. Firms elect to participate, but do not pay to be included in the ranking. Investor returns/experience are not considered. 2018 ranking refers to Edelman Financial Services (EFS), which combined its advisory business in its entirety with Financial Engines Advisors L.L.C. (FEA) in November 2018. For the same survey, FEA received a precombination ranking of twelfth.",3.3,"Edelman Financial Engines
3.3",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
7,Data Scientist active TS/SCI,$83k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are currently seeking an innovative, experienced, and highly-skilled Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Analytics team in Ft. Belvoir, VA. In this role, you will create and develop custom solutions for our users in a collaborative, fast-paced, state-of-the art environment. To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
*This position is located in Ft. Belvoir, VA and requires an active TS/SCI clearance*

The Data Scientist will:
Demonstrate the ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Establish data science pipelines.
Develop, train, test, deploy, and sustain AI and machine learning models.
Leverage data patterns and other development methods to optimize code and reduce computational cost.
Develop front-end interfaces to facilitate usage of developed AI/ML solutions
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.

Active TS/SCI clearance
Bachelor’s degree in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline strongly preferred. Master's degree in these disciplines preferred.
Experience working with Scala, Python, Java
5-10+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly-organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively
#LI-SH1

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer-all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.3,"LMI
4.3","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
8,Lead Data Engineer,$83k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a data engineer in Zipcar’s data engineering team, your mission is to build real-time and offline solutions to make data accessible and reliable while leveraging the largest-scale data processing technologies in the world -- and then apply them to the Zipcar's most critical and fundamental data problems.

What you will do:
Build and own mission critical data pipelines that power Zipcar’s business
Develop solutions in bleeding-edge data technologies on AWS eco-system
Partner with architects and data analysts to make the best technology decisions
Create and maintain data models, data catalogs, and data security
Mentor team members and assist them in developing, testing and deploying software
What you’ll love about being a Zipster in Engineering:
You’ll get to come to work every day knowing that you’re contributing to the success of the world’s leading car sharing network
You'll be joining a collaborative, diverse, passionate team of Zipsters
You’ll get to work in a flexible work environment that is innovative and resourceful
At Zipcar, we encourage new tools and ideas- your opinion always matters!
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer scienceor related field
5+years’ experiencewith data engineering or data warehousing, or an equivalent data-oriented software engineering background
5+ years’ experience with SQL, optimizing queries and tuning database performance
3+years’ experiencewith key AWS technologies (Redshift, S3, IAM;alsoKinesis, Lambda, EMR, Spark, Hive)
3+years’ experiencewith ETL technologies (e.g. Talend, Informatica,Matillion)
4+years’ experiencewith Java, Python,Scalaand other programming languages
Experience withdbtand Airflow a strong plus
Familiarity with data analysis and data science tools (Looker,Jupyter, R) is a plus
What tops off the tank:
Competitive Medical, Dental, Vision, Life and Disability Insurance and other voluntary benefits through our parent company, Avis Budget Group
Generous paid time off, including holidays, vacation, personal, sick, volunteer and Parental Leave options
Up to $5,500/year tuition reimbursement
Tax-free benefit for public transportation or parking expenses
Bicycle Reimbursement program
401(k) Retirement Plan with company matched contributions
Free Zipcar Membership and other employee discounts, including discounts on renting and buying Avis/Budget cars
Community involvement opportunities
Who are we?

Glad you asked! Zipcar is the world’s leading car-sharing network, found in urban areas and university campuses in more than 500 cities and towns. Our team is smart, creative and fun, and we’re driven by a mission – to enable simple and responsible urban living.

Being a Zipcar member gives you easy access to a car nearby without all the cost and hassle of owning one. Founded in 2000, Zipcar disrupted – or innovated – the traditional model of car ownership and independent studies show that Zipcar’s model of car sharing is proven to reduce vehicle ownership, freeing up more city space for people. Zipcar provides members with socially responsible, sustainable mobility options that support the global environment, their communities and city livability.

Zipcar is a subsidiary of Avis Budget Group, Inc. (Nasdaq: CAR), a leading global provider of mobility solutions. For more information, visit:www.zipcar.com.

The extra mile:

We encourage Zipsters to bring their whole selves to work - unique perspectives, personal experiences, backgrounds, and however they identify. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer – M/F/D/V.",3.2,"Zipcar
3.2","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Car Rental,Travel & Tourism,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
9,Sr Principal Comms Systems Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence and Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence and Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

Job Description:

The Systems Engineering Center is seeking a strong, technically sound Comms engineer for the role of Senior Principal Comms Systems Engineer who is committed and passionate about creating innovative, cost-effective solutions for advanced space-based Comms architectures, systems and mission capabilities. The successful candidate will serve as the Senior Comms Systems Engineer on a large-scale, and very complex Intelligence, Surveillance, Reconnaissance and Communications (ISRC) Program and will be responsible for providing technical leadership and guidance of the Comms Sub-System IPT along with supporting the delivery of verified products, components or services to support the Comms Sub-System team.The Senior Principal Comms Systems Engineer is will provide significant technical contributions to the Integrated Sub-System and all system engineering work products across the entire life cycle of the program, including architecture development, requirements development, system integration and test, verification and validation. This position reports to the Comms Sub-System Integrated Product Team Lead and interfaces with cross-functional product teams, sub-contractors program management, and functional managers.

Required Skills:
Minimum of 10+ years of engineering experience with some experience in Space RF & digital communication system design and development
Experience in requirements development and flowdown of top-level functional, operational and constraining requirements to the Comms subsystem and hardware levels.
Knowledge of Digital Design techniques and implementation (modem design and optimization, Advanced Coding and Modulation Schemes, SoC Design Implementation, ASIC or FPGA Design and Development)
Knowledge of Digital Signal Processing (Digital Pre-distortion techniques, Carrier Recovery, Channel Equalization)
Experience in Payload vs spacecraft trades and analyses
Experience in Requirements analysis and performance budgeting
Knowledge of End-to-end data delivery (data chain) architecture development - comm payload system function and interfaces, link design (frequency plans, data rates, coding, noise, modulation), data processing (encryption, storage, error correction and detection, packet delineation, etc.) and ground system operations
Ability to coordinate between organizations (cross-functional teams, customers and departments).
Ability to contribute to the development of new ideas and concepts, translate these ideas into executable action plans, and communicate these plans to a diverse client base.
Team oriented individual with strong interpersonal and communication skill
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.
Active and Current TS/SCI or completed SSBI within last 24 months required
Desired Skills:
Knowledge of Antenna subsystem development (requirements analysis, performance budgeting, conceptual design)
Knowledge of Anti-jamming communication algorithms
Knowledge of space hardness and survivability environments; spacecraft subsystems (TT&C, ADC, CDH, Thermal, Structures/Mechanisms, propulsion, Guidance and Navigation); and Launch vehicle considerations.
CONOPS trades and analyses (Orbital and constellation design)
Data delivery/data chain flow trades and analyses (operations, observation payloads, communication system, and ground system)
Mission timeline analyses (tasking, scheduling, control and operations)
Mission utility analyses to quantify performance as a function of design, cost, risk and schedule
Ability to mentor and lead engineering personnel to collaborate with members of other teams to accomplish problem resolution and other tasks in a timely manner.
Experience leading multi-discipline intra-company integrated product teams
Master's Degree/PhD in relevant field
Education:
Bachelors degree in Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math (STEM), or Masters degree in relevant field
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#ideasinorbit 169733

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
10,Senior Software Engineer II - Integrations,$98k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Health Care– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

Tabula Rasa Health Care is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer II to contribute to our Integrations team servicing our Medication Risk Mitigation Platform. The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer II, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on primarily full-stack Javascript applications / services (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform).
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Troubleshooting and modifying SQL stored procedures.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
Experience with SQL, SQL Server.
EDUCATION:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.

M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)

EXPERIENCE:
10+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
OTHER SKILLS and ABILITIES:
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to occasionally work remote when warranted.
Regular office activities include: game nights, paddle boarding, yoga on the pier, team lunches and happy hours.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
11,Sr. Machine Design Engineer,$51k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"TriMech Services is an engineering resource provider specializing in the placement of qualified technical candidates for both temporary and direct hire opportunities. TriMech Services offers a unique approach to matching the specialized skillsets of our candidates to the engineering specific industry.

Sr. Engineer will be able to effectively lead, manage, and supports the design and development of new machinery systems as well as overseeing of engineering of complex industrial machinery.

Role:

Responsible for projects and manufacturing product line management including scheduling, planning, estimating and manpower assignment.
Prepare complex layout and proposals and detail drawings in accordance with Engineering Standards from rough sketches, models or verbal descriptions.
Prepare studies, concepts, and proposals for project justification and approval.
Manage day to day activities of assigned engineering personnel.
Work with Manufacturing, Service & Customers to resolve machine problems.
Assist Sales & Marketing on presentation of proposals to customers.
Prepare bills of material and cost estimates as required.
Maintain drawing and specification files.
Review and check work of others for conformance to Engineering Standards, dimensioning and clarity of data.

EXPERIENCE:

B.S. Mechanical Engineering or equivalent.
Must have minimum of 3 years’ experience in machinery design and engineering project management experience.

· Min 7 years of experience with SolidWorks design software",3.4,"TriMech Services
3.4","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
12,Mission Sr. Principal Systems Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

We are seeking a Mission Sr. Principal Systems Engineer who brings space vehicle system leadership and engineering knowledge to our programs. The successful candidate will have prior experience and/ or knowledge across all subsystems of the Space Vehicle and Bus. Key subsystems of interest include, Command & Data Handling (C&DH), Power, Attitude Control, Communications, and EO/IR Payload subsystems. The candidate should also have experience with Launch systems integration and logistics as well as early on-orbit operations and test and possess a detailed understanding of the design based on hands-on experience. The Mission Sr. Principal Systems engineer will engage at a high operational tempo and demonstrate the ability to react quickly to changes in both plans and priorities while maintaining the execution rigor needed to ensure mission success. The role will also be a strategic position requiring daily contact with multiple organizations as well as customer counterparts.

Responsibilities include providing technical direction to the bus and communication supplier, communicating changes and issues with the System Engineering team, and development/management of the integration, test, and logistics needed to integrate the space vehicle and transport it to the launch site.

Your vital contribution will help us to deliver excellence to our customers. Successful candidates should expect to be immersed in a fast-paced, team-based, and challenging technical environment where an individual with talent and initiative can stand out and thrive.

Required Skills:
• 10+ years engineering experience with at least 5 years working space vehicle and/or bus systems engineering
• Experience with a dynamic collaborative environment including multi-functional and cross-site teams
• Demonstrated strong organization, coordination, planning, and team building skills
• Demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills
• Ability to managing interdependencies, identifying disconnects, between current and future architectures, requirements, and interfaces, and resolving system issues
• Ability to perform trade studies from ""first principles"" and basic engineering fundamentals to drive a design from inception forward
• U.S. Citizenship status
• Active Secret security Clearance day 1

Desired Skills:
• Experience with Space Qualification
• Experience with the Full System Life Cycle (from customer requirements through launch integration)
• Experience with Launch Systems Integration
• Experience with requirements analysis, capture, flow down and verification
• Experience managing system interfaces
• Experience managing technical budgets (Mass, Volume, etc)

Required Education (including Major):
Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Math, Science or related technical discipline (preferably Systems, Electrical, Mechanical, Computer, or Software Engineering)
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#ideasinorbit
#Space2020
165517

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
13,"Hardware-In-The-Loop, Sr Principal RF Systems Engineer",-1,"The Hardware-In-The-Loop RF Department is looking for an experienced Systems Engineer with a strong and diverse background in RF product development and testing. A successful candidate will be able to provide a systems approach to the design and development of complex radar test environments used to ensure the performance capability of Raytheon Missile & Defense products.

Job Description:
The successful candidate will be a technical subject-matter-expert within projects requiring strong RF and radar knowledge. Ability to work well with teams and program stakeholders to develop technical requirements and solutions for test environments. Presenting complete solutions to both functional and program technologists.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Required Education, Skills and Experience:
US Citizenship is required
Requires a Bachelor's Degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) and minimum of 10 years of prior relevant experience
A minimum of ten (10) or more years of experience focused on modeling, analysis, and test of applied RF systems and phenomena
Eight (8) or more years of systems experience working with radars and simulations, to include target and radar modeling, hardware and software integration, and systems analysis
Five (5) or more years of experience presenting technical data to stakeholders, in design reviews and technical interchange meetings
Desired skills:
Five (5) or more years of experience in Model Based Systems Engineering (MBSE)
Previous work experience working with large cross functional teams to achieve results
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. Additional information can be found here: All About Security Clearances
164342

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
14,"Senior Staff Engineer, Failure Analysis",$94k-$214k (Glassdoor Est.),"pSemi Corporation is a Murata company driving semiconductor integration. pSemi builds on Peregrine Semiconductor’s 30-year legacy of technology advancements and strong IP portfolio but with a new mission—to enhance Murata’s world-class capabilities with high-performance semiconductors. With a strong foundation in RF integration, pSemi’s product portfolio now spans power management, connected sensors, optical transceivers, antenna tuning and RF frontends. These intelligent and efficient semiconductors enable advanced modules for smartphones, base stations, personal computers, electric vehicles, data centers, IoT devices and healthcare. From headquarters in San Diego and offices around the world, pSemi’s team explores new ways to make electronics for the connected world smaller, thinner, faster and better.

Job Summary

The Senior Staff Fault Isolation Failure Analysis Engineer will primarily be tasked with performing electrical and fault isolation failure analysis on field returns, qualification failures, yield failures, and new product development on RF and mixed signal CMOS products.

Roles & Responsibilities

This position has responsibility for:
Perform preliminary failure analysis as needed, including: external visual examination, scanning acoustic microscopy, radiographic examination, and bench testing etc
Perform fault isolation to identify failure mechanisms(s) utilizing schematics, layouts, FIB microprobing, PEM, XIVA, etc…
Perform electrical bench testing and interpret ATE datalogs to aid in localizing electrical failures.
Develop, characterize, and optimize FA techniques and tools to advance FA capabilities and efficiency.
Work with designers and engineering groups to isolate root cause of failures.
Generate detailed failure analysis reports for both internal and external customers.
Expert at fault isolation techniques such as PEM, XIVA, and thermal emission.
Mentor other engineers in fault isolation and electrical techniques as needed.
Competency Requirements

In order to perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Critical Thinking: Skilled at finding logical flaws in arguments and plans; identifies problems and solutions that others might miss; provides detailed insight and constructive criticism into problems and complex situations
Working with Ambiguity: Achieves forward progress in the face of poorly defined situations and/or unclear goals; able to work effectively with limited or partial information
Prioritizing and Organizing Work: Allocates time and attention based on what is the most important to achieve key goals and objectives; approaches work in an organized and systematic manner; effectively manages tasks, information, and requests
Displaying Technical Expertise: Keeps his/her technical skills current; effectively applies specialized knowledge and skills to perform work tasks; understands and masters the technical skills, knowledge, and tasks associated with his/her job; shares technical expertise with others
Evaluating and implementing Ideas: Defines requirements and resources needed to implement new ideas; approaches innovation with a practical, task-oriented mindset; converts ideas from general concepts into actionable plans
Minimum Qualifications (Experience and Skills)
12 years of experience in failure analysis engineering, product engineering, characterization engineering, or design experience.
Preferred Qualifications
Extreme attention to detail
RF Experience
Strong desire to increase one's depth and breadth in the field of fault isolation/failure analysis
Comfort and desire to be challenged
An attitude/practice of continuous improvement
“Can do” attitude.
Education Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Electrical Engineering (BSEE) or equivalent
Work Environment

This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment.

Physical Demands

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus. This position requires the ability to occasionally lift office products and supplies, up to 20 pounds.

pSemi Corporation supports a diverse workforce and is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity for applicants and employees. pSemi does not discriminate on the basis of age, race, color, religion (including religious dress and grooming practices), sex/gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions or breastfeeding), gender identity, gender expression, genetic information, national origin (including language use restrictions and possession of a driver’s license issued under Vehicle Code section 12801.9), ancestry, physical or mental disability, legally-protected medical condition, military or veteran status (including “protected veterans” under applicable affirmative action laws), marital status, sexual orientation, or any other basis protected by local, state or federal laws applicable to the Company. pSemi also prohibits discrimination based on the perception that an employee or applicant has any of those characteristics, or is associated with a person who has or is perceived as having any of those characteristics.

Note: The Peregrine Semiconductor name, Peregrine Semiconductor logo and UltraCMOS are registered trademarks and the pSemi name, pSemi logo, HaRP and DuNE are trademarks of pSemi Corporation in the U.S. and other countries. All other trademarks are the property of their respective companies. pSemi products are protected under one or more of the following U.S. Patents: http://patents.psemi.com",3.7,"pSemi
3.7","San Diego, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
15,Senior Splunk Engineer - Telework,-1,"Stage 2 Security is looking for certificated Splunk Engineers with security minded savviness to help design & improve large Splunk deployments. The selected candidate will leverage strong written and verbal communications skills to help customers better understand how their information is protected from threats within cyberspace.

Responsibilities include:

Evolving the client's data within Splunk into a superior state via field extractions, data transformations, event parsing, data previewing, etc.
Improving the client's Splunk deployment via curtailing the data, optimizing reporting, and enhancing search capabilities.
Creating and implementing configuration standards, policies, and/or procedures for improved Splunk operations and management.
Resolving incidents and/or other issues, while integrating with change management processes.
Deploying new Splunk installations, refining configuration management capabilities, ensure license management is operating ideally.

Stage 2 Security welcomes and encourages diversity in the workplace regardless of race, gender, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or veteran status.

If you are looking to make an impact, Stage 2 Security is the place for you.

The Qualifications :

The selected candidate is required to have:

Splunk Certified Architect.

Experience with designing, building, and maintaining large scale Splunk solutions.

Deep understanding of:

Splunk scalability
Splunk capacity planning
Splunk distributed setup
Splunk search head clustering
Splunk indexer clustering.
5 years of engineering experience with Splunk.
Splunk Enterprise Security (ES) experience.

Solid system administration foundation:

Experience with Linux platforms is required
Experience with large Windows platforms is a plus.

Some cybersecurity and networking experience.

7 years of experience with IT.

Strong written communication skills.

Strong verbal communication skills.

Works well with the team and clients.

Willingness to learn.

Bachelor's degree.

The Benefits:

At Stage 2 Security (S2), people come first, hence everyone at S2 is provided with outstanding benefits. S2 is a small business where we know and care about each and every employee, hence we believe that the benefits we offer are a notch above the rest.

Our mission is to expedite the arrival of a secure cyberspace by out-innovating our adversaries through superior services and solutions. S2 is currently focused on providing superior cybersecurity consulting services to our clients. Our private sector clients are typically large technology focused companies while our public sector clients are commonly from agencies across the federal government. We provided these clients with cybersecurity related services while cultivating a common body of knowledge among all employees at S2.

The Benefits at S2 includes:

Medical & Dental Insurance Premiums are 100% paid by S2 for employee and eligible dependents
Up to $100 per month reimbursed for mobile phone expenses
Up to $50 per month reimbursed for home Internet access
Expenses paid for approved work-related trainings & conferences
Eligibility to participate in our 401k program after 90 days of employment
Competitive salary, which is paid bi-weekly (every other Friday)
3 weeks a year (15 days) of Paid Time Off (PTO), accrued at 4.62 hours per pay period (includes vacation and sick time)
10 paid government holidays annually

Powered by JazzHR

zsfbZ6PUPL",-1,Stage 2 Security,"Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
16,Informatica IICS SQL Integration Engineer,-1,"Chicago Preferred - Lake Forest, CA considered
*SQL Informatica IICS Integration Engineer* - $120K - $128K + Bonus + Relo. 80% bonus on individual performance
*Temporarily remote YES* but onsite initially for some days
Remote-based position on an interim basis only due to Covid-19 Pandemic. Upon approval of “Return to Office” site guidelines, this role will require the individual to work onsite
*Hands-on not just lead a team*
*Experience with Cloud-based integrations* (Salesforce, Azure, Amazon, Google)
Good knowledge/experience with *data governance* practices
*5 year Informatica*
*1+ year experience specifically using Informatica IICS preferred*, other cloud-based tools considered
*Strong SQL coding skills for data analysis and testing*
*Data Extraction skills a must*

*Before sending your WORD resume only* be sure your resume includes all the required skills you have, preferable under your work history.
*Resumes without a last name* or phone number or email address will be deleted.
Put Sr SQL Data Architect in the subject line.
*Pointing out the required skills you have* with a number of years’ experience, will get an immediate response from me.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $6,000.00 per year

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Flexible schedule
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Parental leave
* Relocation assistance
* Retirement plan
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
* Bonus pay

Education:
* Bachelor's (Preferred)

Experience:
* SQL: 1 year (Preferred)",-1,"Computer Recruiters, Inc","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
17,Real Time Embedded Software Engineer II,-1,"Do new ideas and technology thrill you?
Do people call you an overachiever?
Do you enjoy facing new development challenges and working in dynamic teams?

If your answer to those questions is an enthusiastic ""yes!"" then you may be the person were looking for to join our innovative team as a Software Engineer.

As part of the Software Products Team, you will be an integral part of helping Raytheon Missiles & Defense further our vision to be the global leader in core and next-generation weapon and security solutions. By any measure, Raytheon Missiles & Defense is an exciting and rewarding place to work. We pride ourselves on developing world-class talent in an inclusive atmosphere. The result is a workforce that takes pride in the company and consistently delivers superior solutions.

Job Description:

Applies basic software engineering technical standards, principles, theories, concepts and techniques associated with the C and C++ computer languages for software development. Under general supervision, develops solutions to a variety of challenging technical problems in software development, following established procedures. Contributes to the successful completion of software related milestones on projects that include C/C++ software development, design, code, unit test and formal testing. Interacts with senior software engineers and support staff on a situational basis. Develops and builds knowledge of emerging software technologies. Produces documentation related to the design and release of software artifacts and provides formal and informal presentations to senior software personnel.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

We have Full-time and Part-time opportunities available.

Job responsibilities include, but not limited to
Applying expertise in software development for embedded multi-processor systems using C++ and Ada languages.
Providing software solutions to complex technical problems using ingenuity and creativity. Following and/or recommending changes to department processes and procedures
Reviewing software products for soundness of technical judgment and adequacy.
Producing documentation related to the design and release of software artifacts.
Utilizing agile software development methods, automation, and continuous integration.
Required Education, Skills, and Experience:
B.S. in a STEM degree. (Preferred Degrees: Computer Engineering, Software Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Math, Physics (or other physical science), or other related degree). ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard. If you have completed your degree within the last 18 months please apply to Missile Systems college jobs under www.raytheon.com/campus
Two (2) years of professional experience in one or more of the following: programming experience, data structures and algorithms, systems software design, operating systems, and/or architectures
U.S. Citizenship is required.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.
Desired Skills:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Experience with real time operating systems (Green Hills Integrity, VxWorks, etc)
Experience using MATLAB
Experience with Scripting
Experience with Agile Software
Experience working in a DoD embedded software environment
Computer Science classes such as Operating Systems and Compiler Design
Electrical Engineering classes related to embedded systems design
Why did you pick RMD as your first employer?
I work with missile software and brilliant people every day. There is nothing more exciting than that!- CH

I picked RMD as my first employer, because of the opportunities that are available here. With RMD, I know that if, in the future, I'm interested in exploring other areas, such as signal processing or systems engineering, that the opportunity to do so is available. Also, RMD encourages education and training and offers different ways to learn new skills or brush up on old skills. EH

What excites you about the work you do at RMD - SPT every day?
I get to work with and learn from the most talented individuals in the country. There is a lot of diversity in experience and education, and it is amazing to see what we can accomplish together. And knowing that our work has a national impact makes it very awarding.- Jsa

I don't do the same thing every day. In fact, I am basically given the opportunity to turn 180 degrees every couple of months to try out something completely new and that keeps me entertained.- GC

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. Additional information can be found here: All About Security Clearances
170356

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
18,Civil Associate II (Structural Software Engineer),$38k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Michael Baker International is a leading provider of engineering, development, intelligence and technology solutions with global reach and mobility. The firm offers a comprehensive range of innovative services and solutions in support of federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of private development and commercial clients. Michael Baker International’s focus is on the safety and security of people across the world through planning and engineering improvements to infrastructure and the environment, and through protection of our quality of life and freedom in support of national and international security. With more than $1 billion in annual revenue, Michael Baker International has more than 5,000 employees in over 80 offices located across the U.S. and internationally, and is ranked as the 26th largest design firm in the U.S. by Engineering News Record (ENR). Michael Baker International’s Mission is to make a difference by providing innovative solutions to sustain the future and further the safety, security and quality of life for people across the globe by providing the highest level of expertise, unmatched quality and effective project teams for a diverse range of projects and clients. Michael Baker International offers excellent benefit packages that includes: Medical, Dental, Vision, Disability Insurance, Life Insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts, Additional Paid Time Off, Flex-Time, 401-K Retirement Plan, Tuition Reimbursement and Employee Credit Union. To learn more, please visit us on the web at www.mbakerintl.com . Michael Baker International is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer - M/F/Disability/Veteran/e-Verify Employer

WHO WE ARE

Michael Baker International is a leading provider of architectural, engineering and consulting services , including design, planning, environmental, construction and program management. The company provides its comprehensive range of services and solutions to support U.S. federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of commercial clients. Michael Baker’s more than 3,000 employees across nearly 100 locations are committed to a culture of innovation, collaboration and technological advancement to help solve challenges for clients and communities throughout the country. To learn more, visit https://mbakerintl.com/ .

BRIDGE PRACTICE

Michael Baker International has addressed bridge design, construction and preservation challenges with innovative and sustainable solutions. Exemplifying its depth and versatility in the bridge space, Michael Baker International, ranked Number Five by Engineering News-Record in its annual ranking of Bridge Design Firms in the United States, has partnered with clients on a full spectrum of bridge types-from conventional grade separations to major, complex river crossings, including trusses, arches, box girders and cable-stayed bridges.

DESCRIPTION

Combining a degree in Civil Engineering and knowledge/ education in computer science is an awesome career, but not an easy opportunity path to find. At Michael Baker International, this career is a reality!

We are looking for a Civil Associate II for our Moon Twp., PA location that has 2-4 years' experience ready to work on bridge related software projects .

This is great opportunity with career growth potential and the opportunity to contribute on large cutting-edge projects. The engineer/developer will be part of Michael Baker’s Bridge Software Group. This group has been applying computer technology to the bridge profession for over 30 years, using bridge engineering experience combined with a wide range of programming skills.

The American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials (AASHTO) contracted with Michael Baker In 1999 to develop a comprehensive bridge software package to guide bridge engineers through the initial design phase of a bridge and to maintain data for analysis and load rating throughout the lifespan of the bridge. The software development has been continuous since then and has been expanded to include nearly all bridge types designed and maintained by member states throughout the nation.

In addition, the software group maintains and enhances software projects for the Pennsylvania Department of Transportation (PennDOT). These projects include software that designs and drafts simple span steel and prestressed concrete bridges (BRADD3-Bridge Automated Design and Drafting) and a group of analysis/design/rating programs for prestressed concrete beams, steel beams, steel floorbeams, abutments and retaining walls, concrete box culverts, elastomeric bearing pads, and sign structures.

This position will be responsible for utilizing a combination of bridge engineering skills and software development skills to perform tasks on these projects. This position also involves working under the direct supervision of registered Professional Engineers and involves both bridge engineering and software engineering and related skills and often crosses over to work with our bridge design group.

Michael Baker International offers competitive salaries/benefits, a great work environment, the ability to work on high profile projects, significant professional growth potential and the strength and stability that only comes from 80 years of making a difference.

PROFESSIONAL REQUIREMENTS

Bachelor’s Degree in Civil Engineering or related field
2-4 years of experience under a registered Professional Engineer
Knowledge of structural analysis and finite element analysis
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Desire to pursue a career in software development related to bridges and transportation structures

PREFERRED SKILLS

Passing the Fundamentals of Engineering exam and obtaining an Engineer-In-Training certificate
Knowledge of bridge engineering and AASHTO’s bridge design and evaluation specifications
Strong structural engineering background
Knowledge of software programming using:
C++ and/or C# development and debugging
Other programming experience: VB.NET, FORTRAN, Matlab
Finite element analysis programming
Domain design using OOP
GUI design
OpenGL or general computer graphics
BIM for bridges or 3D modeling
Producing XML Reports (C++/C#)
Software testing

MICHAEL BAKER INTERNATIONAL EEO STATEMENT

Michael Baker International is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Michael Baker International provides equal employment opportunity for all persons, in all facets of employment. Michael Baker International maintains a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing and background checks. We encourage all qualified applicants to apply for any open position for which they feel they are qualified and all will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other legally protected status.

EEO is the Law. Applicants to and employees of Michael Baker International are protected under Federal law from discrimination.",3.5,"Michael Baker International
3.5","Moon Township, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
19,Future Opportunity: Senior Back-End Software Engineer,$99k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Senior Back-End Software Engineer, you will develop and automate business functionality of enterprise systems using primarily Microsoft technologies. You will employ modern DevOps engineering practices to implement both cloud and on-premise solutions for clients.

You will enable modern application transformation while being surrounded by people who are passionate about building modern applications that demonstrate leading technologies. You will learn our client’s business, organization, systems, challenges and goals, and utilize that knowledge on a team to deliver outstanding results.

Day to Day,You will
Build and automate the features and services that model complex business problems and power enterprise-scale systems
Implement APIs and Microservices, integrating with external systems, including database design, data access, and ORMs
Develop scalable cloud-based solutions, considering security and performance
Harness modern development and DevOps practices including CI/CD, containerization, and automated testing
Support the design, development, modification, maintenance and evaluation of applications
Support teams in evaluating detailed requirements
Prepare and obtain approval of system design documentation
Recommend changes in development, maintenance, and system standards
Lead multi-functional product development teams to design, develop, and improve software assets that meet or exceed internal and external (customer) expectations, and meet requirements for product functionality, cost, and delivery schedules
Apply knowledge to build an environment that fosters accountability, quality, commitment, growth, innovation, and supporting sales processes as needed
Your Skills
Experience is preferred in the following technical areas. (Note that not all areas are strictly required.)
Programming: C# / .Net
Service Development: RESTful APIs, Microservices,ASP.Net Core, Azure API Management, Azure API Apps
Microsoft Azure: Compute, Storage and PaaS services (Web Apps, Cognitive Services, App Services, Logic Apps, Azure Functions, Service Bus)
Data: Microsoft SQL Server, Azure SQL, Entity Framework/CosmosDB, DynamoDB, MySQL, MongoDB
Containers: Docker, Kubernetes
DevOps: Git, Azure DevOps, Maven, Jenkins
About You
You are a hardworking software engineer who is able to communicate complex concepts with clarity to non-technical audiences. While passionate about technology, you have a strong business sensibility and an ability to connect well with clients
You are comfortable analyzing, designing, developing, implementing and maintaining application code in a variety of contexts
You are comfortable developing cloud and/or on-premise web-based software solutions with complex application development and testing
You have a proven ability to connect with external clients
You have experience working with global teams
Preferred Years of Experience: 3-5 years of experience in software engineering with Microsoft technologies

Required Education: Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Computer or Electrical Engineering, Management Information Systems, or related field is required

Management Experience: None required

Important Note about this Future Opportunity:
We are actively recruiting and interviewing for this ‘Future Opportunity’ position, however will not be extending offers at the present time.

The outbreak and spread of COVID-19 has created uncertainty for many, and during this period Avanade is focused on the personal safety and well-being of our employees and candidates. The good news is that Avanade is a 38,000-person organization that depends on new ways of working every day and we’ve been relying on our workplace experience to empower our employees - wherever they’re working - for 20 years now. Thanks to our workplace platforms - the likes of Office 365, Microsoft Teams, SharePoint and more - we’ve been able to continue delivering work seamlessly and connecting with talent to explore opportunities for tomorrow.

What does that mean for you? It means you can apply and interview virtually, via video, for a future career opportunity without pressure to make a decision. It means that you will have the chance to connect with leaders and hiring managers at your own pace.

We encourage you to speak candidly with your recruiter about your career aspirations and expectations throughout this recruiting process. In return, we are committed to being transparent with you about our intent and goals around this position.",3.9,"Avanade
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,2000,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
20,Civil Associate I (Structural Software Engineer),$37k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Michael Baker International is a leading provider of engineering, development, intelligence and technology solutions with global reach and mobility. The firm offers a comprehensive range of innovative services and solutions in support of federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of private development and commercial clients. Michael Baker International’s focus is on the safety and security of people across the world through planning and engineering improvements to infrastructure and the environment, and through protection of our quality of life and freedom in support of national and international security. With more than $1 billion in annual revenue, Michael Baker International has more than 5,000 employees in over 80 offices located across the U.S. and internationally, and is ranked as the 26th largest design firm in the U.S. by Engineering News Record (ENR). Michael Baker International’s Mission is to make a difference by providing innovative solutions to sustain the future and further the safety, security and quality of life for people across the globe by providing the highest level of expertise, unmatched quality and effective project teams for a diverse range of projects and clients. Michael Baker International offers excellent benefit packages that includes: Medical, Dental, Vision, Disability Insurance, Life Insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts, Additional Paid Time Off, Flex-Time, 401-K Retirement Plan, Tuition Reimbursement and Employee Credit Union. To learn more, please visit us on the web at www.mbakerintl.com . Michael Baker International is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer - M/F/Disability/Veteran/e-Verify Employer

WHO WE ARE

Michael Baker International is a leading provider of architectural, engineering and consulting services , including design, planning, environmental, construction and program management. The company provides its comprehensive range of services and solutions to support U.S. federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of commercial clients. Michael Baker’s more than 3,000 employees across nearly 100 locations are committed to a culture of innovation, collaboration and technological advancement to help solve challenges for clients and communities throughout the country. To learn more, visit https://mbakerintl.com/ .

BRIDGE PRACTICE

Michael Baker International has addressed bridge design, construction and preservation challenges with innovative and sustainable solutions. Exemplifying its depth and versatility in the bridge space, Michael Baker International, ranked Number Five by Engineering News-Record in its annual ranking of Bridge Design Firms in the United States, has partnered with clients on a full spectrum of bridge types-from conventional grade separations to major, complex river crossings, including trusses, arches, box girders and cable-stayed bridges.

DESCRIPTION

Combining a degree in Civil Engineering and knowledge/ education in computer science is an awesome career, but not an easy opportunity path to find. At Michael Baker International, this career is a reality!

We are looking for a Civil Associate I for our Moon Twp., PA location that has 0-2 years' experience ready to work on bridge related software projects .

This is great opportunity with career growth potential and the opportunity to contribute on large cutting-edge projects. The engineer/developer will be part of Michael Baker’s Bridge Software Group. This group has been applying computer technology to the bridge profession for over 30 years, using bridge engineering experience combined with a wide range of programming skills.

The American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials (AASHTO) contracted with Michael Baker In 1999 to develop a comprehensive bridge software package to guide bridge engineers through the initial design phase of a bridge and to maintain data for analysis and load rating throughout the lifespan of the bridge. The software development has been continuous since then and has been expanded to include nearly all bridge types designed and maintained by member states throughout the nation.

In addition, the software group maintains and enhances software projects for the Pennsylvania Department of Transportation (PennDOT). These projects include software that designs and drafts simple span steel and prestressed concrete bridges (BRADD3-Bridge Automated Design and Drafting) and a group of analysis/design/rating programs for prestressed concrete beams, steel beams, steel floorbeams, abutments and retaining walls, concrete box culverts, elastomeric bearing pads, and sign structures.

This position will be responsible for utilizing a combination of bridge engineering skills and software development skills to perform tasks on these projects. This position also involves working under the direct supervision of registered Professional Engineers and involves both bridge engineering and software engineering and related skills and often crosses over to work with our bridge design group.

Michael Baker International offers competitive salaries/benefits, a great work environment, the ability to work on high profile projects, significant professional growth potential and the strength and stability that only comes from 80 years of making a difference.

PROFESSIONAL REQUIREMENTS

Bachelor’s Degree in Civil Engineering or related field

0-2 years of experience under a registered Professional Engineer

Knowledge of structural analysis and finite element analysis

Excellent oral and written communication skills

Desire to pursue a career in software development related to bridges and transportation structures

PREFERRED SKILLS

Passing the Fundamentals of Engineering exam and obtaining an Engineer-In-Training certificate

Knowledge of bridge engineering and AASHTO’s bridge design and evaluation specifications

Strong structural engineering background

Knowledge of software programming using:

C++ and/or C# development and debugging

Other programming experience: VB.NET, FORTRAN, MATLAB

Finite element analysis programming

Domain design using OOP

GUI design

OpenGL or general computer graphics

BIM for bridges or 3D modeling

Producing XML Reports (C++/C#)

Software testing

MICHAEL BAKER INTERNATIONAL EEO STATEMENT

Michael Baker International is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Michael Baker International provides equal employment opportunity for all persons, in all facets of employment. Michael Baker International maintains a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing and background checks. We encourage all qualified applicants to apply for any open position for which they feel they are qualified and all will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other legally protected status.

EEO is the Law. Applicants to and employees of Michael Baker International are protected under Federal law from discrimination.",3.5,"Michael Baker International
3.5","Moon Township, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
21,Data Engineer - Cloud Services,-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

A leader in the post-hardware era, 2nd Watch walks alongside our clients to help them navigate and embrace change to provide better customer experiences through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our world-class cloud native capabilities in strategic consulting, workload design, technology deployments and workload management enable our clients to have the agility of a growth company and the security of a leader.

Selected by global brands for our thought leadership and agility through tested, proven and trusted customer-obsessed solutions for people, processes and technology, we are hyper-focused on six solution areas:
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

Data Cloud Engineer :

The ideal candidate is someone who
Operates with the highest levels of integrity
Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges
Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner
Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better
Has a passion for technology
Expertise you bring:
Owning the technical engagement and ultimate success around specific implementation projects.
Developing a deep expertise in enterprise cloud technologies and services.
Being subject matter expert and taking on a consultative role as it pertains to cloud adoption.
Ensure that our applications and infrastructure are designed and implemented to the highest security standards thus maintaining and enhancing customer trust
Evangelize security within 2nd Watch and be an advocate for keeping customer information secure
Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges
Other duties as assigned
Specialized Knowledge & Skills Requirements
Demonstrated experience building and maintaining cloud-native data lakes
Demonstrated experience providing customer-driven solutions, support or service.
In-depth knowledge of SQL or NoSQL and experience using a variety of data stores (e.g. RDBMS, analytic database, scalable document stores)
Extensive hands-on Python programming experience, with an emphasis towards building ETL workflows and data-driven solutions.
Able to employ design patterns and generalize code to address common use cases. Capable of authoring robust, high quality, reusable code and contributing to the divisions inventory of libraries.
Expertise in big data batch computing tools (e.g. Hadoop or Spark), with demonstrated experience developing distributed data processing solutions.
Applied knowledge of cloud computing (AWS, GCP, Azure).
Familiarity with open source machine learning toolkits, such as sklearn, Keras, or TensorFlow.
Applied knowledge of data modeling principles (e.g. dimensional modeling and star schemas).
Understanding of relational database internals
Experience using tools for infrastructure-as-code (e.g. Docker, CloudFormation, Terraform, etc.)
Experience with software engineering tools and workflows (i.e. Jenkins, CI/CD, git).
Education and Licenses:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field, or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Benefits and Perks of working at 2nd Watch:
Competitive salaries and all employees are bonus eligible.
401(k) with company stock plans to all employees
100% paid medical, dental and vision coverage for all employees and 90% paid for family, along with other wellness and disability plans.
Open and flexible Paid Time Off Policy
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
22,Senior Traffic Engineer,$70k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Traffic Engineer (022005)

SRF Consulting Group is a well-established and award-winning transportation engineering, planning, and design firm providing services throughout the Midwest. At SRF, our employee-owners help shape the culture and future of our business. As a 100% ESOP company, team members share in the company’s growth and prosperity and receive stock ownership on a vesting schedule for their retirement. SRF also provides our team with a 401(k) and company match plan, a comprehensive health benefits package, competitive salaries, paid professional certifications and memberships, flex-time scheduling, generous time-off programs, vacation time carry-over, and multiple professional development programs to choose from.

SRF Consulting Group, Inc., is seeking a Senior Engineer to join our Traffic Engineering Group in our Madison, WI office. You will play a lead role in the development and management of a variety of traffic operations and planning projects, including conducting corridor studies, freeway modeling, review of travel demand forecasting work, and traffic modeling and analysis of complex transportation systems. We are also seeking a traffic engineer that can provide construction work zone program support. SRF Traffic Studies Services and Projects

Responsibilities include:

Management of staff and technical work for complex transportation projects
Working with internal company groups and external clients
Completion and review of traffic analysis documentation
Development and review of models and analysis for multimodal corridors, freeway and interchanges and transit projects
Creation and support of work zone initiatives including mobility and safety mitigations in work zones and applications of work zone activity data into the national work zone data initiative program.

The ideal candidate will possess the following qualifications:

Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in traffic / transportation engineering or civil engineering
5+ years’ of prior related traffic engineering experience
PE or ability to attain within 6 months
Ability to lead traffic engineering tasks or manage projects
Strong analytical skills
Proven technical writing ability
Excellent interpersonal and public communication skills
Proficiency in computer applications including word processing, spreadsheets, and experience with any traffic engineering software (Synchro/SimTraffic, VISSIM, Corsim, CUBE, etc.)

Visa sponsorship is available for this position.

SRF Consulting Group, Inc. is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer.",4.0,"SRF Consulting
4.0","Madison, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1961,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
23,Senior Software Engineer - Interoperability,-1,"Job Summary

Creates, modifies and maintains software applications individually or as part of a team. Provides technical leadership on a team, including training and mentoring of other team members.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

· Codes, tests, debugs and documents software applications using established coding standards and methodologies
· Work within an agile scrum team, contributing to an atmosphere of continuous improvement
· Self-starter and self-organized - able to work with little or no supervision
· Work with technical leaders in establishment of coding standards and best practices
· Perform code and process reviews to ensure adherence to best practices
· Work with architects, designers, business analysts and others to design and implement high quality software solutions
· Understands how to interpret database models and effectively collaborate with Database Engineers
· Assist product owners in backlog grooming, story breakdown and story estimation
· Collaborate and communicate effectively with team members and other stakeholders throughout the organization
· Document software changes for use by other engineers, quality assurance and documentation specialists
· Master the technologies, languages, and practices used by the team and project assigned
· Train others in the technologies, languages, and practices used by the team
· Trouble shoot and resolve issues in existing software
· Other duties as assigned
#LI-REMOTE

Education

· BA/BS in Computer Science, Technology or a related field or equivalent work experience

Minimum Qualifications

· Mastered programming concepts, including object-oriented programming
· Mastered technologies and tools utilized by team and project assigned
· Able to train others on general programming concepts and specific technologies
· Minimum 6 years’ experience developing software applications

Skills/Knowledge

· Must be proficient in advanced programming skills and proficient in one or more of the following languages (Specific languages needed will vary based on development department or project)
ASP.NET, C#, C++, Java, Progress 4GL, SQL, HTML, VBScript, JavaScript
Additional Desired Skills

· Single-Page Applications
· Angular (v4.4.0)
· AJAX
· RESTful API development
· Microservices
· Startup mentality
· Test Driven Development (TDD)
· Amazon Web Services (AWS)
· TypeScript
· Docker
· Customer-facing product development
· Ionic Framework
· Electron
· HTML5
· CSS
· SQL
· NoSQL
· PostgreSQL
· JSON
· XML
· MongoDB
· C#
· .Net 4.5
· .Net Core 2.0
· Entity Data Model/LINQ
· Spotfire
· Kafka
· Agile/Scrum/Kanban/DevOps
· Strong problem-solving skills
· Outstanding communications and interpersonal skills
· Strong organizational skills and ability to multi-task
· Ability to track software issues to successful resolution
· Ability to work in a collaborative fast paced environment
· Ability to learn new development language quickly and apply that knowledge effectively
· MS Windows operating system functionality
· MS Office and productivity related applications

Work Environment/Physical Demands

· While at work, this position is primarily a sedentary job and requires that the associate can work in an environment where they will consistently be seated for the majority of the work day
· This role requires that one can sit and regularly type on a key board the majority of their work day
· This position requires the ability to observe a computer screen for long periods of time to observe their own and others’ work, as well as in-coming and out-going communications via the computer and/ or mobile devices.
· The role necessitates the ability to listen and speak clearly to customers and other associates
· The work environment is an open room with other associates and noise from others will be part of the regular work day",2.8,"Greenway Health
2.8",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
24,Onsite Systems Engineer,$26k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"The DigitalNET Onsite Engineer provides a high level of in-person customer service implementing, maintaining, resolving technical issues, supporting, and optimizing all customer workstation and server hardware, software, and network equipment and connectivity. Must be customer service orientated, have effective verbal and communication and provide proactive work on behalf of our clients.

Responsible for working through DigitalNET’s ticketing system to configure, implement, monitor, manage, and support all of DigitalNET’s clients IT environments including;
Windows workstations
Server hardware and server operating systems
Anti-virus/malware software and remediation
Email systems such as Office 365 and/or Exchange and SPAM Filtering
Network switches, firewalls and access points
Backup systems and data recovery
Administer and maintain end user accounts, permissions and access rights
Provide 3rd party vendor management assistance
Produce accurate documentation related to client environments and issue resolution
Ensure that Service Level Agreements are met for all customers
This role must also be able to;
Setup, deploy and replace Windows desktops and laptops
Setup and install Windows operating systems, Microsoft Office Suite, and other Windows applications
Setup and install network equipment such as switches, firewalls and/or wireless access points
Setup, deploy, replace and support server hardware and Windows Server operating systems
Setup, deploy and support server virtualization such as; Microsoft Hyper-V and VMWare
Coach and mentor junior staff

Experience
Three to five years hands on experience configuring, deploying, supporting and troubleshooting PC hardware, Windows operating systems and Windows applications, server hardware and operating systems and networking equipment networking hardware and protocols. Experience working with 3rd party vendors.
Education
College diploma or university degree in the field of computer science preferred. Industry certifications such as Microsoft, CompTIA, Cisco and other is a plus but not required.
Interpersonal Skills
DigitalNET Onsite Engineer must be customer service focused. This is a direct customer interactive role so strong written and verbal skills with the ability to speak in user-friendly terms as well as communicate with technical peers. Collaboration with peers to problem solve and find the best solution and outcomes for DigitalNET’s clients is a must.
Work Conditions
This position will have local travel with 90% of time at client sites, so a clean driving record is required. There will be limited after hours work but must be available for On-Call support when required. This role may require the ability to sit or stand for extended periods of time. The ability to lift and transport moderately heavy objects such as computer equipment and peripherals. May require climbing of ladders or working in confined spaces such as under desks, data closets, etc.",4.3,"GFI Digital Inc.
4.3","Springfield, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Business Service Centers & Copy Shops,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
25,Electrical Automation Engineer,$63k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Electrical Automation Engineer, Ronkonkoma
General Information
Job Title:
Electrical Automation Engineer
Location:
2001 Orville Drive North
Ronkonkoma, NY, 11779
United States
Employee Type:
Exempt
Job Category:
Maintenance
Industry:
Manufacturing
Minimum Experience:
5 Years
Contact information
Name:
Mayra Miranda
Phone:
631-563-6262
Email:
mayra.miranda@europastry.com
Description
Do you want to join a growing company with a proven track record for success and growth? Wenner Bakery is part of Europastry, a family business founded in Barcelona in 1987 by Pere Galles with locations worldwide! The bakery business is our passion and this is your opportunity to be a member of our team.

We are searching for a motivated & experienced

This position is responsible for program automation and overseeing controls systems involving Programmable Logic Controllers (PLC). Provides support to production staff by programming, testing, troubleshooting and inspecting PLC controls, assemblies and systems.

ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES & ACCOUNTABILITIES: include the following:
Performs equipment repairs through electrical troubleshooting and diagnosis, adjusts, and replaces defective components in an efficient manner to minimize downtime.
Sets up, programs, modifies, and maintains a variety of PLC controls, HMI’s, SCADA software, and reporting applications.
Works with industrial PC’s, networks, servers, controls, and optics to maximize equipment efficiency and uptime. Interfaces PLC’s to Personal Computers and other peripherals.
Creates and reads logic and flow diagrams for program design, programming, simulation, testing, and start-up.
Designs and writes programs for embedded controllers, HMI panels, motor drives, and other intelligent devices.
Conducts installation of PLC controls as well as programs controls to achieve desired equipment functions. Coordinates machine start up and de-bugging as it relates to PLC controls
Understands and safely works with AC & DC Voltages, 24-480V. Replaces electrical components as needed such as 3 phase motors, VFD’s, sensors, motor starters, power supplies and positions sensing devices.
Through use of CMMS, completes scheduled and emergency Work Orders to maintain optimum manufacturing line efficiencies. Records data into MP2 as required.
Informs supervisors and others in the management team regarding potential hazards and recommending corrective solutions.
Performs all work in accordance to OHSA standards for general industry.
Keeps abreast of new technology, devices and manufacturing processes Remain up to date on changes in software, hardware and control technology as it relates to installed equipment.
Follows blue prints, installs power supply wiring and conduit for newly installed machines and equipment or conveyors as well as troubleshoots and performs safety control testing.
Assists with building and grounds maintenance as needed
Attends company scheduled meetings as required (e.g., safety meetings, production meetings, department meetings).
Timely informs supervision of any problems or complications that may arise.
Participates in special projects and performs other duties as required.
In addition to the essential duties and responsibilities listed above, all positions are also responsible for:
Meeting company standards pertaining to quantity and quality of work performed on an ongoing basis, performing all work related tasks in a manner that is in compliance with all Company policies and procedures.
Adhering to Company policies, procedures, and directives regarding standards of workplace behavior in completing job duties and assignments. Must follow all Company Safety policies, as well as all GMP regulations and all lock-out/tag-out requirements according to OSHA requirements.
As an employee at Wenner Bakery, you must also be aware of issues associated with food safety and safe food handling practices that are relevant to your job. Formal training is not required, but in house Food Safety Training conducted by a qualified staff member is mandatory. You must know how to recognize, prevent and alleviate food safety hazards. This position requires good working knowledge of the SQF code.
What can Europastry/Wenner Bakery offer to you?
Competitive compensation package including: Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance & ADD, STD, LTD, 401K, FSA, and Paid Time Off
Ongoing opportunities for development and career advancement
Exciting fast-paced entrepreneurial environment.",2.9,"Wenner Bakery
2.9","Ronkonkoma, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1956,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
26,Software Controls Engineer,-1,"Must be a U. S. Citizen or Green Card Holder*
Key Responsibilities: *
• Developing and designing new feature and function algorithms to control engines using Matlab and Simulink. This includes the engine diagnostics, fuel controls, etc.

• Development of model based controls and analyzing the behavior of the software design using simulation.

• Performing and supporting bench, rig and local vehicle testing.

• Supporting and investigating problem reports and change requests.

• Working closely with our customers on implementation of the algorithms in the Engine Control Module architecture.
SKILLS--FUNCTIONAL/TECHNICAL: *
• Ability to understand and apply models and simulation of control algorithms including experience with Matlab and Simulink.

• Demonstrated ability to develop unique and innovative solutions to problems.

• Training in the application of control laws and theory as applied to embedded real time control systems including open and closed controls, PID controllers, etc.

• General understanding of the functions and circuits utilized in engine control modules.

• General knowledge of electronic based sensor and system diagnostics.

• Knowledge of internal combustion engine operation and performance is a plus.

• Proficient in the use of MS Excel (required), MS Office, MS Word, Powerpoint, etc.
SKILLS--QUALITY/IMPROVEMENT: *
• Use systematic approaches, principles of logic and analytical techniques to define and solve problems.

• Ability to find the real issues behind problems.

• Use of basic statistics.

• Ability to develop, implement, follow, maintain and improve processes, practices and standards.
SKILLS--LEADERSHIP: *
• Ability to handle new assignments.

• Ability to prioritize goals and objectives.

• Ability to meet established schedules.

• Interactive and proactive in responding to issues.
EDUCATION*
• Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Math, Physics, or equivalent.

• Trained in data analysis techniques and basic statistics for process control.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Relevant Work: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Application Question:
Currently BAA is not offering visa sponsorship for this role. Do you now, or will you in the future, require employer sponsorship?
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.billaustin.com",4.0,"BAA
4.0",Indiana,-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
27,System Engineer – Data Flow (TS with Poly Required),$60k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"The System Engineer will assist the team in designing, implementing and maintaining data flows. The engineer will be integral in data flow and analytic process improvement through evaluating data accuracy, frequency and completeness. This includes:
Data analysis and evaluation
Assisting the Infrastructure Team to coordinate changes
Data flow process improvement
Developing and maintaining tools for collecting, storing and analyzing network devices
Requirements

Experience with:
NiFi or other data flow technologies
Automation and Orchestration
AWS/C2S
Linux OS
Excellent oral and written communication skills – able to clearly communicate technology and design concepts
Strong organizational and time management skills, including the ability to multi-task and work independently with minimum supervision to meet deadlines
Bachelor’s Degree or higher in computer engineering or in a field related to the computer engineering or computer science disciplines
10 years System Engineering experience. An additional 4+ years of System Engineering experience may be substituted for the degree for a total of 14 years
Active TS with Poly is required. Candidates without an active clearance will not be considered.

PCI is an equal opportunity employer with over 12 years supporting the customer, and partnerships with Amazon, Elastic and Microsoft Azure. We consider our employees our most valuable asset, prioritizing company culture and providing generous benefits.

We were founded on the principal that uncompromising personal integrity and ethics are the primary guides in all business situations. We believe that the company’s collective character is of utmost importance, the trust of our clients is sacred, and view reliability as a requisite quality in each of our professionals. PCI is centered on ensuring three principles are ingrained in everything that we do: Performance, Commitment and Integrity.",4.6,"PCI
4.6","Fort Meade, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
28,Principal Systems Safety Engineer,-1,"Note: This is a position for experienced professionals. If you have completed your degree within the last 18 months please apply to RTX College jobs: https://jobs.raytheonmissilesanddefense.com/college-jobs

Check us out on YouTube:
https://youtu.be/kfHlc8GCzoU

At Raytheon Technologies (RTX), we are defining the future of aerospace and defense with ambitious technologies that push the limits of known science. Our technologies help our customers take on the world's biggest challenges. Together we are advancing research and development in both the defense and commercial aerospace sectors.

The Whole Life Engineering Directorate (WLE) is responsible for ensuring our products are Safe, Reliable, Maintainable, and delivered on time. WLE consists of multiple disciplines that support engineering, our program offices and our customers. Our WLE disciplines participate in the total life cycle of our products from conception to deactivation. Our focus area is product support, which includes the following disciplines: reliability, system safety, and supportability.

The System Safety Engineering Department is seeking candidates for a Principal System Safety Engineer position, located in Tucson, AZ.

Experienced engineers will lead our System Safety program efforts by conducting safety engineering tasks, while also providing direction and mentoring of junior system safety engineers.

System Safety Engineering ensures our Raytheon Technologies (RTX) products safely perform their required mission functions throughout their required lifecycle environments, while also meeting overall cost and schedule constraints. This position supports programs by working with missile engineering personnel to ensure that our products are designed with safety in mind.

The Principal System Safety Engineer is an experienced engineer that will work with direction from Program and System Safety Department personnel and will exercise considerable latitude in technical decisions to meet customer safety requirements. The Principal System Safety Engineer will identify key safety issues and addressing them with optimal technical solutions. The Principal System Safety Engineer should be proficient in the following disciplines and processes: MIL-STD-882E System Safety management tasks and methodologies, MIL-STD-882E hazard analyses, software and firmware system safety, DoD system safety review boards. The Principal System Safety Engineer should be familiar with Insensitive Munitions program activities, dangerous goods transportation, Explosive Hazard Classification, U.S. Government test range safety requirements, Explosive Ordnance Disposal data, and system safety tool sets.

The Principal System Safety Engineer should be able to manage one or more System Safety programs. This position requires a high degree of self-motivation, communications and interpersonal skills to interface effectively with coworkers, RTX, and external Program office customers, and the ability to prepare for and present the Safety program results to appropriate DoD system safety review boards.

Key Responsibilities:
Perform System Safety engineering tasks and analyses, applying technical knowledge to meet Raytheon and customer safety program requirements
Interpretation of system requirements, customer specifications and military standards to develop appropriate safety requirements for hazard mitigation or elimination
Design influence and verification via conduct of fault tree analyses, hazard analyses, sneak circuit analyses, and software and firmware safety analyses.
Prepare internal and customer reports describing various analyses relevant to the System Safety program
Collaborate with and function across multiple disciplines to gain a full understanding of the product architecture and design
Manage one or more System Safety programs; responsibilities include monitoring program technical execution, interfacing with stakeholders (e.g. customers, program offices, subcontractors, vendors, etc.), performing Earned Value Management System tasks and effectively managing System Safety engineering personnel as needed to support program tasks.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will require a U.S. Security Clearance as of day 1 of employment

Required Skills, Education, and Experience:
US Citizenship
Bachelors Degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM); Desired: ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
A minimum of eight (8) years of related system safety engineering experience
Proficient in performing MIL-STD-882E hazard analyses, to include software safety, firmware safety, Fault Tree analysis, failure diagnosis and corrective action recommendations
Proficiency in MS Office, including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio, Access and Project
Effective preparation and presentation to Department of Defense Safety Review Boards to include: Software System Safety Technical Review Panel; Weapon System Explosives Safety Review Board; Fuze and Initiation System Technical Review Panel; Department of Defense Explosives Safety Board; Non-Nuclear Munitions Safety Board
Desired Skills, Education, and Experience:
Ten (10) years of related system safety engineering experience
Masters Degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM); Desired: ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
Experience in Rocket Motor Ignition Systems and Fuzing Systems safety requirements and qualifications testing programs (MIL-STD-1901A, MIL-STD-1316 and JOTP-052)
Proficiency in performing Sneak Circuit Analysis
Experience with application of Emotional Intelligence® concepts, techniques
Strong written, oral and presentation skills
Interface with customers and Safety Review Boards
Strong interpersonal and project management skills, with the ability to manage a safety program and provide direction to supporting safety personnel
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. Additional information can be found here: All about Security Clearances

170448

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
29,Senior Backend Engineer,-1,"We are looking to add a Senior Backend Engineer to our talented team of Engineers. We are targeting a Senior Engineer who seeks challenges, loves solving problems, and cherishes all things new and interesting under the tech sun. If you enjoy working in a startup environment having the ability to wear multiple hats and solving complicated tasks with fresh new ideas, we are the right place for you!

As a Senior Engineer with Soaren Management, you would work collaboratively with other members of the development team, executives, data science, marketing, and operations to understand user and business requirements. You would work individually and with your team to design, build, test and deliver technology to meet those requirements. You will be part of a cross-functional team that is responsible for the full software development life cycle, from conception to deployment. We are targeting people with the ability to write clean and functional code and can teach and mentor other engineers. You should have excellent communication skills and the desire to be part of a great team.
Responsibilities include: *
Write clean and functional code using PHP, MySQL, and SQL
Develop scalable software in a LAMP stack
Solid understanding of OOP, design patterns, and data structures
Mentor and train junior Engineers on the team with support and code reviews
Have the ability communicate clearly and attend team meetings
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Manage data integrations with third party data services
Build and maintain reusable code and libraries
Optimize applications for speed and scalability
Implement security and data protection protocols
Ability to work in a 24/7 uptime codebase environment
Ability to work with your product team to proactively identify problems and make technical suggestion on requirements
Areas of technical expertise should include: *
Laravel
PHP
LAMP Stack
REST API’s
JIRA or similar project management software
MySQL/RDS/MariaDB
CI/CD
AWS
Bonus Points for: *
Twilio flex
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or similar or equivalent experience
5+ years of relevant experience
OUR COMPANY MISSION*
Soaren Management merges time-tested business practices with bleeding-edge proprietary technologies to deliver reliable, efficient and secure financial products and services. Our greatest strengths, technology and customer care, flow from the ingenuity, curiosity and integrity of our partners and employees.
VISION STATEMENT*
Soaren Management works toward a future where all consumers have broad and immediate access to a range of reliable, efficient, and secure financial products and services, expedited by constantly evolving technologies.
COMMITMENT TO OUR TALENT*
Soaren Management believes our success flows directly from our employees. Our employees are at the heart of our success. As such, it's in our best interest to provide all the support they need to succeed and thrive. For that reason, Soaren Management is expanding its search for fresh talent and developing our current talent. Our commitment to our team ensures value and service to our ever-growing customer base through hiring and growing our people-centric, diverse, and forward-thinking talent. We live in our values of Innovation, Superior Customer Care, Compliance, Community, Balance, and working by the Golden Rule.
Our benefits: *
Start-up company atmosphere with an established corporate structure
A fun, casual work environment that encourages innovative thinkers
A small executive team with promotion opportunities
Competitive annual salary
Company sponsored medical/dental/vision/life insurance/AD&D
401k with company matching
Unlimited Vacation
Paid Parental leave
Excellent work-life balance
Flexible schedule available
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Scottsdale, AZ (Preferred)
Experience:
PHP: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
Yes: H-1B work authorization
Yes: Other non-immigrant work authorization (e.g. L-1, TN, E-3, O-1, etc.)
Yes: Immigrant visa sponsorship (e.g., green card sponsorship)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Company's website:
https://www.soarenmanagement.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.3,"Soaren Management
4.3","Scottsdale, AZ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
30,Lead Systems Engineer - Electronic Warfare - Senior Level - Secret,-1,"The Systems Engineering Electronic Warfare (EW) Electronic Attack (EA) Systems Department requires a Lead Systems Engineer (LSE) with demonstrated experience in developing creativesolutions that meet war-fighter needs to support the EWS business area relating to EA and Electronic Support (ES) capability development. The LSE requires proven technological experience suitable to define next generation Multi-Function EW capabilities. The candidate must have excellent oral and written communication skills.

The LSE is responsible for the requirements implementation of all Systems Engineering tasks and work products on a program, assuring technical integrity and quality of the systems engineering work throughout the program lifecycle. The LSE has the ultimate responsibility for the quality of the resulting architecture, requirements, design, integration, and tests. The LSE is also responsible for an integrated test plan that defines the integration and verification of the system.

Required Skills:
Minimum 10 years related system engineering experience in EW, Communications, or Radar programs including prior leadership experience.
Demonstrated development and adherence to the Systems Engineering Management Plan (SEMP) and tailored Integrated Product Development System plan.
Demonstrated proficiency in requirements management using Dynamic Object-Oriented Requirements System (DOORS).
Demonstrated ability to determine, set, and monitor SE technical priorities to meet cost, schedule, and performance.
Responsible for the technical fidelity and quality of the systems engineering work products and associated analyses that document the technical baseline.
Experience coordinating with hardware and software design teams to resolve technical systems issues.
Experience to approve SE engineering work products and applicable SDRLs/CDRLs
Experience establishing and maintaining the system requirements including requirement decomposition and traceability, design and performance trades and analysis, and system requirements verification and validation through system sell-off.
Responsible for leading, monitoring and ensuring the SE technical budget is met (KPP, TPM).
Experience in proactive SE Risk and Opportunity management, including robust correlation between TPMs/KPPs, TBL Maturity, and technical Risks. Experience in the proper configuration management of SE work products is conducted, baselined at appropriate milestones and changes are coordinated, communicated and controlled across IPTs.
Participated in the development of cost and technical volumes for new business/proposals
Excellent communication and presentation skills with the ability to interface with senior level executives and customers.
Ability to support occasional business travel.
Accountable to the Program Chief Engineer and SE Department Manager for all of the above requirements.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.
Desired Skills:
Advocate for proper product life cycle application of systems engineering to including test verticality, requirements development, flow, traceability, allocation, functional analysis & decomposition, and system architecture.
Experience in Functional Analysis/Design Synthesis System Architecture, System Model Development and Alignment (MBSE), Trades/analyses, Performance Analysis, Models, and Simulations.
Demonstrated ability to lead System and Performance Specifications and Interface Control Documents.
Demonstrated ability to track system performance while balancing program risks and opportunities.
Experience developing Measures of Effectiveness.
Experience with Use cases/functional descriptions.
Experience developing a Technical Data Package.
Experience with Agile development methodology.
Development and submittal of technical publications and/or patents.
Active DoD Top Secret clearance with investigation within five years.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems.

*Required Education:
(including Major): B.S. in Electrical Engineering, or other relevant Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM) or related discipline

Desired Education:
(including Major): Master's degree in Electrical Engineering, or other relevant Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM) or related discipline

Electronic Warfare Capabilities
Electronic Warfare Jobs
#ownthespectrum

#LI-JW3
166102

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Fort Wayne, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
31,"Senior Software Engineer, Android SDK",-1,"At Branch, we're transforming how brands and users interact across digital platforms. Our mobile marketing and deep linking solutions are trusted to deliver seamless experiences that increase ROI, decrease wasted spend, and eliminate siloed attribution. Our team consists of smart, humble, and collaborative people who value ownership over all we do to create a product, team, and company that lives and breathes our motto: Build Together, Grow Together, Win Together.

You'll be joining a fast-moving team working to build the next generation of search, focused on mobile, for potentially billions of devices around the globe. Working with our team means you'll get the opportunity to learn and grow on a daily basis, interfacing with both technical and non-technical team members, and coordinating closely with external partners.

As a Senior Software Engineer, Android SDK, you'll get to:
Design and develop the next generation software development kit (SDK) to enable developers to build better features using deep links.
Work on the futuristic features that enable app developers to better grow their apps with Branch links.
Design and implement other supporting Android SDKs, tools and Android Applications to help automated and efficient integration of deep link SDK.
Help Branch Partner application on any issues with integrating any of Branch deep link SDK or supporting SDKs. Work on fixing any issue or feature requests reported with Branch open source SDKs.
Own entire projects while scoping, defining, and leading design and implementation across multi-functional teams. You will often take vague product requirements and be responsible for breaking them down into smaller components displaying committed prioritization and coordination.
Collaborate with product managers, infrastructure, platform, and data engineers to refine requirements, architect, and implement complex systems.
Debug hard problems - that's a given! When things break, and they will, you will find yourself debugging those challenging bugs and will be eager and able to fix things.
Every week we find ourselves learning something new, whether it's a new technology or a quirk of a language we otherwise didn't know. On occasion, you may find yourself picking up a new language or working with an unfamiliar platform. If this does not intimidate you, and you're eager to dive in and get the job done you will be right at home.
You'll be a good fit if you have:
3+ years of experience building Android applications.
Proficiency in Java and comfortable diving into any language or technology.
Experience with the use and functions of Android SDK, Java, and XML and are able to build mobile applications for Android.
Passion for building and debugging complex systems in a team environment.
Strong interest in leading technical multi-functional project teams.
Ability to display significant ownership of features and systems and pursue a result-driven development approach consistent with pragmatism.
Passion for building and shipping phenomenal customer-facing software.
Ability to write readable and testable code.
A little bit about us:
Branch has raised more than $330M from investors such as NEA, Founders Fund, and Playground Ventures.
We are headquartered in Silicon Valley and have presence all over the world.
Diversity at Branch ranks in the top 10% for similarly sized companies (by Comparably).
In 2020, we are recognized as one of Forbes Best Startups, Great Places to Work, and Bay Area Best Places to Work.
We have more than 3 billion monthly users and are partnered with over 50,000 apps.
If you think you'd be a good fit for this role, we'd love for you to apply! At Branch, we strive to create an inclusive culture that encourages people from different backgrounds to bring their unique, diverse perspectives to work. We aim every day to build an environment that empowers us all to do the best work of our lives, and we can't wait to show you what we have to offer!",4.0,"Branch
4.0",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
32,Data Engineer,$59k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary of Responsibilities

Codes and develops software applications. Works as part of a development team on the design and implementation of analytical applications, including current Business Intelligence technologies, modern programming languages (Python, Scala, R) and current SQL database skills. Conducts requirement analysis, produces design documents on proposed solutions, and delivers consistent, test-covered, high quality code in a timely fashion. Recommends and completes product revisions or enhancements based on feedback. Develops and maintains documentation as required.

Performs work under minimal supervision. Handles moderate to complex issues and problems, and engages higher-level staff on only the most complex issues as necessary. Possesses comprehensive knowledge of subject matter. Provides coaching, and/or mentoring to a subordinate group.

Preferred Experience and Skills

Four to Eight year of related experience
Technical expertise and detail orientated
Complex problem-solving and critical thinking skills
Analytical thinking skills
Ability to build collaborative skills
Agile/SCRUM methodology experience
Azure DevOps experience
Property and Casualty insurance experience
4+ years of Hands-on experience with SQL databases, SSIS/Informatica ETL, Power BI, Cloud based integration tools.
Knowledge of Data warehousing concepts, and data modeling using Kimball methodology.

Preferred Education and Training

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field

INDSP",3.6,"West Bend Mutual Insurance Company
3.6","West Bend, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1894,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
33,"Engineer 3, Data Center and Enterprise Network Ops (XNOC)",$57k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:
Responsible for support and operations of data center networking equipment to include load balancing, routing, and switching equipment. This includes incident management, working tickets, monitoring the status of the equipment, and reviewing/approving changes to the environment. Works to achieve operational compliance, identifying and addressing unique and timely solutions to operational gaps and alignment to development standards. Ensures compliance with industry and Company technical requirements, standards, policies, and procedures. Developing visualizations that support innovative analysis and new types of predictive models of network behaviors. Acts as a champion through continued focus on processes and automation issues impacting operations. Serves as a technical authority (SME) and mentor for a highly technical group of engineers with deep knowledge.

Core Responsibilities:
Responsible for Data Center and Enterprise Networking support.
Incident break fix responsibly in a fast paced environment with a focus on meeting SLA
Help to ensure all process and procedures are consistently applied while driving consistency standards and protocols.
Work with engineering teams on more efficient ways to automate and operate our infrastructure.
Responsible for ensuring the timely and accurate delivery of Methods and Procedure for new technology deployments including engineering design packages and configuration integrity to follow national standards.
Responsible for mentoring of new employees and team initiatives.
Collaborates with software development teams to operationalize data visualization solutions and build analytical/business intelligence products
Participates in the analysis and formalization of business problems Minimal direction required for job duties and high performance.
Develop and/or improve standard methodologies and procedures for network installation, maintenance and operations.
Be available on a 24 x 7 basis.
Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance.
Regular, consistent and punctual attendance. Must be able to work nights and weekends, Variable schedule(s) as necessary.

Job Specification:
Bachelor's Degree or Equivalent
Engineering, Computer Science
Generally requires 5-8 years related experience
In-depth knowledge of routing, switching and load balancing protocols and technologies
In-depth knowledge/ previous experience with different vendor’s equipment (Juniper/Cisco/ F5/A10/Arista)
Operational experience in large network support with a datacenter focus
Must have previous (strong) load balancing operations experience
Must have experience working in cloud-based environments both in the Public and Private Domains (i.e AWS/Azure)
Experience and/or working knowledge of Dell Cloud based network environments
Experience working with Firewalls is a plus
CCNP/JNCIP or CCIE/JNCIE certified or equivalent on-the-job experience
Very organized individual with the ability to run multiple project, lead and/or participate on multiple project teams
Additional experience in server-based technology, such as Microsoft and Unix is a plus
Experience with a scripting language (e.g. Python, Perl or Bash)
Familiarity with at least one monitoring/logging tool (e.g. Splunk, OP5, Nagios or DynaTrace)

Here are some of the specific technologies used in our architecture: Python, Javascript, HTML5/CSS, Django, Flask, Angular.js, D3.js, Bootstrap, Git, FFMpeg, Nginx, Postgresql + Hstore, Centos, Cisco UCS + VMWare

This position is ineligible for visa sponsorship. To be considered for this role, you must be legally authorized to work in the United States and not require sponsorship for employment now or in the future.

Comcast is an EOE/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer",3.7,"Comcast
3.7","Greenwood Village, Arapahoe, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1963,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
34,Junior Software Engineer (TS/SCI),$52k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in software engineering or a related technical field, or equivalent experience is required. Agile experience preferred.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Department of Defense TS/SCI security clearance is required at time of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

General Dynamics Mission Systems has an immediate opening for a Junior Software Engineer. Please note this position will be based out of our Fairfax, VA location. This position provides an opportunity to further advance the cutting-edge technology that supports some of our nation’s core defense/intelligence services and systems. General Dynamics Mission Systems employees work closely with esteemed customers to develop solutions that allow them to carry out high-stakes national security missions.

In this role, you will:

Assist in software requirements analysis, design, development and testing for software enhancements and new products
Apply the appropriate standards, processes, procedures, and tools throughout the system development life cycle to support the generation of technical engineering products
Support and develop our technical culture by being engaged, intellectually curious, friendly, motivated to solve complex problems, and inspired to deliver superior user-centered design
Participate in internal reviews of software components and systems

Candidates should have demonstrated strengths and experience in some of the following areas:

User Interface development
Computer science theory (e.g., data structures, algorithms, computational complexity)
Appreciation for user-centric design
Attention to quality
Full use and understanding of software engineering concepts, principles, and theories
Effective communication and attention to detail

Programming Skills:

Strong fundamentals in data structures and algorithms
Solid object oriented programming and software design skills
Proficient in one of the following: Java, C#, C++, or JavaScript (using object oriented techniques)
Web Services knowledge (HTML, CSS, JavaScript, jQuery, XML and related AJAX technologies)

Other beneficial experience:

Experience with version control systems
Concurrent programming and building multi-threaded systems
Memory and CPU profiling
Data modeling and writing efficient Structured Query Language (SQL) statements
Experience building large-scale mission-critical applications
Experience with distributed systems

#CJ3

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Fairfax, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
35,Senior Mechanical Engineer Virtual Hiring Event,$68k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"Stanley Black & Decker Hiring Event! Offers on the Spot!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Solution QA Engineer

Embedded Systems Engineer

Solutions Integrations Developer - Remote

Business Analyst

Assembler - 2nd Shift

Service Technician

Scheduling and Configuration Specialist

Electrical Test Engineer

Senior Mechanical Engineer

Embedded Systems Engineer

Solutions Integrations Developer - Remote

Business Analyst

Assembler - 2nd Shift

Service Technician

Scheduling and Configuration Specialist

Electrical Test Engineer

Senior Mechanical Engineer

Intake Details:

Requirements

College

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the virtual interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About Stanley Black & Decker

Stanley Black & Decker

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Responsibilities

Advanced mechanical design and high-level innovation for new and existing products, options, and accessories
Create complex Creo Parametric models and BOMs of components and assemblies

Generate 2D manufacturing drawings using 3D model data

Obtain prototype components/subassemblies interfacing with domestic and foreign suppliers to build samples for testing
Create methodical test specifications for validation and verification of new and existing designs
Communicate with a Global Design Center to further elaborate on designs

Strong intrapersonal skills to work with other engineers to brainstorm new concepts and ideas

Select and specify materials for new or existing components
Follow the Product Development Process ensuring engineering milestones and project goals are met

Maintain Engineering documentation using the product change notice process

Work independently on other small projects including Productivity and sustaining projects
Build, install, and test new or upgraded products
Travel requirements >5%

Required Qualifications

BS degree in Mechanical Engineering
10+ years design and analysis experience",3.3,"Stanley Black & Decker
3.3","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1843,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
36,Sr Control Systems Engineer,-1,"Outside the box. Above the Earth. Beyond our wildest dreams. Our engineers are creating new possibilities in space.

Raytheon Technologies invites you to consider joining us in developing the next generation of space-based systems. The Space Systems Engineering organization within the Systems Engineering Center (SEC) is currently seeking a Senior Control Systems Engineer with hardware hands-on experience and Line Of Sight (LOS) and Servo Control problem solving capabilities. The systems engineer will lead a design team building electro-optical systems including imagers, passive/active EO tracking, LIDAR, and directed energy systems. The systems engineer will be responsible for performing trade studies, design, performance analysis, modeling, integration, and test of control systems in the support of the development and build of advanced electro-optical systems. The ideal candidate will be a self-starter with very strong problem solving skills and also have demonstrated capability in design, integration and test of complex engineering systems.

Primary tasks will be:
Development of mathematical algorithms for LOS control systems, navigation, command generation, and attitude determination
Computer modeling and simulation of sensor physics and phenomenology
Advanced sensor alignment and calibration
Servo control system integration and test
Technical presentations to both internal and external customers
*Required Skills:
The systems engineer needs to have a strong background with controls and navigation systems.
Current/Active Secret Clearance
6+ years of engineering experience with at least 4 years working on design, build or testing of EO systems or EO platforms
Knowledge in servo control and navigation systems or related experience
Knowledge of and experience with HW integration for electro-optical systems
Experience with analytics, Matlab/Simulink and C/C++ programming
Strong oral and written communication skills
Demonstrated problem solving, organization, coordination, and planning skills
Ability to establish and maintain strong working relationships with all levels of the organization
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position requires a U.S. Secret Security Clearance as of Day 1 of employment.
Ability to access to US only data systems
Desired Skills:
Experience with design of real-time data processing systems including real-time control and measurement systems
Demonstrated experience with estimation theory and numerical methods and some practical experience with estimation and numerical methods
Experience in space vehicle guidance, navigation, and control or attitude determination
EO/IR or Laser domain knowledge
Technical experience in opto-mechanical engineering, control systems, embedded computing, or electronics
Experience in numerical modeling and simulation, and performing analysis using MATLAB, C++, Python, or similar language
Experience with Matlab/Simulink auto-code generation
Knowledge and experience with LabVIEW, dSpace, or FPGA programming
Current/Active TS/SSBI Clearance
*Required Education:
Bachelor's Degree in ME, EE, AE, Math, Physics or related STEM field; advanced degree(s) preferred

Desired Education:
Masters Degree or PhD in ME, EE, AE, Math, Physics or related STEM field
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#ideasinorbit
#Space2020 167717

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
37,Data Engineer,-1,"Our Data Engineers receive projects and deadlines from several departments. The ability to own tasks, clearly communicate requirements, delays, completion and prioritize a constantly shifting schedule of deadlines is paramount.This work is highly critical to successfully building our company. It is the lynchpin of the sales and onboarding process. Data concerns are a blocker for most of our customers, so delivering high quality, highly accurate transfers is absolutely crucial and greatly appreciated by both our customers and our company.

ServiceTitan is looking for a Data Engineer to join our data team. Strong candidates will have solid command of the SQL, ETL operations, and SSIS packages in addition to very strong analytical and critical thinking skills. The most critical portion of the role is deconstructing and re-interpreting databases from other software to translate them into our database. It also includes support of existing, and development of new automated import methods. The candidate will work closely with cross departmental resources to ensure on time delivery of transferred data for customers adoption of ServiceTitan.

As our Data Engineer, you will:
Map data from various legacy databases into the ServiceTitan platform, subsequently developing SQL scripts that will extract the information efficiently and accurately
Develop automated scripts to validate legacy database values and identify previously unmapped fields prior to loading them into the ServiceTitan platform
Apply feedback from customers and internal stakeholders on data import quality into previously developed extraction scripts
Discover opportunities to leverage information from legacy databases into the implementation process to avoid inquiring for additional information from customers
Establish quality working relationships with internal stakeholders
Contribute material input to go/no-go/continue decisions upon test completion
To be successful in this role, you'll need:
2-5 years of experience with SQL Server 2008/2012/2014/2016
Advanced knowledge and experience in T-SQL, complex ETL tools and operations, and SSIS
Given the experimental nature of this job, we will require very tight compliance when it comes to data - we need to focus on learning
Strong analytical thinking skills
Expert level understanding of database and data model concepts
Vertical SaaS experience is highly desirable
Results and solution oriented - we want to know how we can win, not why we can't
Ability to work independently and cross functionally
About ServiceTitan

ServiceTitan is the world's leading and fastest-growing software technology platform for the trades, a trillion-dollar global industry. We help small business entrepreneurs run and grow their businesses. For more information about ServiceTitan, visit www.ServiceTitan.com.

Perks & Benefits

1. Work/Life Balance: flexible work schedule, flexible PTO
Family-Friendly Benefits: extended parental leave, pregnancy support, 20k in adoption reimbursement, Snoo Smart Sleeper, back-up childcare credits, legal benefit, discounted pet insurance
Enrichment: ongoing learning culture with access to Linkedin Learning and professional development workshops, diversity charter groups, orientation program, career pathing opportunities, mentorship programs
Health & Wellness: company-paid medical/vision/dental/life insurance/disability, employer HSA contribution, free One Medical membership, care coordination support, 401(k) with company match, stipend for home office equipment/supplies, gym discounts, monthly cell phone stipend

Equal Opportunity Employer

ServiceTitan does not discriminate against employees based on race, color, religion, sex, national origin, gender identity or expression, age, disability, pregnancy (including childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical condition), genetic information, protected military or veteran status, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. At ServiceTitan, our mission is to help our Titans and customers achieve the extraordinary. We are an equal opportunity employer and we celebrate the diversity that each Titan brings to the table. We believe that the convergence of fresh, unique perspectives and experiences from all walks of life is what makes our product and culture so great - and there's always room for more.

CCPA Notice for CA Residents applying to Jobs at ServiceTitan

Please review the CCPA Notice here: ServiceTitan CCPA California Privacy Notice

Life at ServiceTitan

http://instagram.com/lifeatservicetitan | https://www.builtinla.com/company/servicetitan-inc | https://www.themuse.com/profiles/servicetitan

#LI-ES1",3.5,"ServiceTitan
3.5",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
38,Senior Principal Lead Systems Engineer - Electronic Warfare,-1,"The Electronic Warfare Systems Engineering Center is currently looking for a Lead Systems Engineer (LSE). The LSE has ultimate responsibility for the quality of the resulting architecture, requirements, design, integration, and tests. The LSE is the technical leader responsible for an integrated test strategy and the integration and verification of the system; assures technical integrity of the system throughout the program lifecycle, and compliance to engineering processes and procedures.

The LSE will also be the technical interface with the program managers, suppliers, engineering team, and chief engineer while being held accountable to the Program Area Chief Engineer (PACE) and SE Department Manager. Applicants must exhibit an exceptional degree of ingenuity, creativity and resourcefulness; and will apply and develop highly advanced technologies, scientific principles, theories and concepts and is viewed within the company and the customercommunity as knowledgeable in the Radar and EW technologies.

The LSE will have the responsibility to support various areas within a product line which include new business/proposals, program implementation, productivity and people. The responsibilities for these areas include opportunities to: 1) work with Business Development and Capture Management to provide input into technical solutions and approaches, lead technical proposals, trade alternative system solutions, and helpcustomersdevelop requirements, 2) lead multi-disciplined systems engineering teams to ensure the overall system design and architecture is balanced to meet the desired performance within the project constraints (cost and schedule), 3) lead / participate in program reviews including IRs, gate reviews and program direction review, and 4) encourage a diverse team by promoting diverseopinions and thought processes.

Required Skills:
Minimum 10 years related system engineering experience in Electronic Warfare or Radar programs including prior leadership experience.
Demonstrated technical leadership experience working with cross-discipline teams.
Demonstrated ability to determine, set, and monitor SE technical priorities to meet cost, schedule, and performance.
Responsible for the technical fidelity and quality of the systems engineering work products and associated analyses that document the technical baseline.
Experience coordinating with hardware and software design teams to resolve technical systems issues.
Experience to approve SE engineering work products and applicable SDRLs/CDRLs
Experience establishing and maintaining the system requirements including requirement decomposition and traceability, design and performance trades and analysis, and system requirements verification and validation through system sell-off.
Responsible for leading, monitoring and ensuring the SE technical budget is met (KPP, TPM).
Experience in proactive SE Risk and Opportunity management, including robust correlation between TPMs/KPPs, TBL Maturity, and technical Risks. Experience in the proper configuration management of SE work products is conducted, baselined at appropriate milestones and changes are coordinated, communicated and controlled across IPTs.
Participated in the development of cost and technical volumes for new business/proposals
Excellent communication and presentation skills with the ability to interface with senior level executives and customers.
Ability to support occasional business travel.
Accountable to the SEC Department Manager for all of the above requirements.
Must be a U.S. Citizen with Active (or active within past 24 months) DoD Secret Clearance
Join our EWS Talent Community: https://rtn.co.EWS_TACommunity

Desired Skills:
Advocate for proper product life cycle application of systems engineering to including test verticality, requirements development, flow, traceability, allocation, functional analysis & decomposition, and system architecture.
Experience in Functional Analysis/Design Synthesis System Architecture, System Model Development and Alignment (MBSE), Trades/analyses, Performance Analysis, Models, and Simulations.
Demonstrated ability to lead System and Performance Specifications and Interface Control Documents.
Demonstrated ability to track system performance while balancing program risks and opportunities.
Experience developing Measures of Effectiveness.
Experience developing a Technical Data Package.
Experience with Agile development methodology.
Development and submittal of technical publications and/or patents.
#OwnTheSpectrum

Required Education: Bachelors degree in a Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) discipline.
Desired Education: Master's degree in a Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) discipline.

This position requires a U.S. person or the ability to obtain an Export Authorization from the appropriate government agency for non-U.S. persons.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment. 170374

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Goleta, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
39,Sr Principal Systems Safety Engineer,-1,"Note: This is a position for experienced professionals. If you have completed your degree within the last 18 months please apply to RTX College jobs: https://jobs.raytheonmissilesanddefense.com/college-jobs

Check us out on YouTube:
https://youtu.be/kfHlc8GCzoU

At Raytheon Technologies (RTX), we are defining the future of aerospace and defense with ambitious technologies that push the limits of known science. Our technologies help our customers take on the world's biggest challenges. Together we are advancing research and development in both the defense and commercial aerospace sectors.

The Whole Life Engineering Directorate (WLE) is responsible for ensuring our products are Safe, Reliable, Maintainable, and delivered on time. WLE consists of multiple disciplines that support engineering, our program offices and our customers. Our WLE disciplines participate in the total life cycle of our products from conception to deactivation. Our focus area is product support, which includes the following disciplines: reliability, system safety, and supportability.

The System Safety Engineering Department is seeking candidates for a SeniorPrincipal System Safety Engineer position, located in Tucson, AZ.

Experienced engineers will lead our System Safety program efforts by conducting safety engineering tasks, while also providing direction and mentoring of junior system safety engineers. In addition, the Senior Principal System Safety Engineer will act as technical Subject Matter Expert (SME) and technical advisor within the System Safety Engineering Department.

System Safety Engineering ensures our Raytheon Technologies (RTX) products safely perform their required mission functions throughout their required lifecycle environments, while also meeting overall cost and schedule constraints. This position supports programs by working with missile engineering personnel to ensure that our products are designed with safety in mind.

The Sr Principal System Safety Engineer is an experienced engineer that will work with direction from Program and System Safety Department Leadership and will exercise considerable latitude in technical decisions to meet customer safety requirements. The Sr Principal System Safety Engineer will identify key safety issues and addressing them with optimal technical solutions.

The Sr Principal System Safety Engineer will be proficient in the following disciplines and processes: MIL-STD-882E System Safety management tasks and methodologies, MIL-STD-882E hazard analyses, software and firmware system safety, DoD system safety review boards. The Senior Principal System Safety Engineer will be familiar with Insensitive Munitions program activities, dangerous goods transportation, Explosive Hazard Classification, U.S. Government test range safety requirements, Explosive Ordnance Disposal data, and system safety tool sets.

The Sr Principal System Safety Engineer will be able to manage one or more System Safety programs. This position requires a high degree of self-motivation, communications and interpersonal skills to effectively interface with coworkers, RTX and external Program office customers; and the ability to prepare for and present the Safety program results to appropriate DoD system safety review boards.

Key Responsibilities:
Perform System Safety engineering tasks and analyses, applying technical knowledge to meet RTX and customer safety program requirements
Interpretation of system requirements, customer specifications and military standards to develop appropriate safety requirements for hazard mitigation or elimination
Design influence and verification via conduct of fault tree analyses, hazard analyses, sneak circuit analyses, and software and firmware safety analyses.
Prepare internal and customer reports describing various analyses relevant to the System Safety program
Collaborate with and function across multiple disciplines to gain a full understanding of the product architecture and design
Manage one or more System Safety programs; responsibilities include monitoring program technical execution, interfacing with stakeholders (e.g. customers, program offices, subcontractors, vendors, etc.), performing Earned Value Management System tasks and effectively managing System Safety engineering personnel as needed to support program tasks.
Act as Technical Advisor to the WLE Directorate and Mission Area Chief Engineers on matters relating to System Safety Engineering.
U.S. Citizenship status is required, as this position will require a U.S. Security Clearance as of day 1 of employment

Required Skills, Education, and Experience:
US Citizenship
Bachelors Degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM); Desired: ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
Ten (10) years of related DoD system safety engineering experience
Proficient in performing MIL-STD-882E hazard analyses, to include software safety, firmware safety, Fault Tree analysis, failure diagnosis and corrective action recommendations
Proficiency in MS Office, including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio, Access and Project
Effective preparation and presentation to Department of Defense Safety Review Boards to include: Software System Safety Technical Review Panel; Weapon System Explosives Safety Review Board; Fuze and Initiation System Technical Review Panel; Department of Defense Explosives Safety Board; Non-Nuclear Munitions Safety Board
Desired Skills, Education, and Experience:
Twelve (12) years of related system safety engineering experience
Masters Degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM); Desired: ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
Experience in Rocket Motor Ignition Systems and Fuzing Systems safety requirements and qualifications testing programs (MIL-STD-1901A, MIL-STD-1316 and JOTP-052)
Experience with application of Emotional Intelligence® concepts, techniques
Strong written, oral and presentation skills
Interface with customers and Safety Review Boards
Strong interpersonal and project management skills, with the ability to manage a safety program and provide direction to supporting safety personnel
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. Additional information can be found here: All about Security Clearances

170449

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
40,Principal Systems Integration Engineer,-1,"Raytheon Missiles and Defense is seeking an Integration Engineer to join the Systems, Integration, Test and Evaluation team. You will develop, plan, coordinate and integrate system-related requirements in support of BMDS operational Hardware-in-the-Loop (HWIL) needs. General knowledge of hardware integration and setup, test configuration, inventory and data management required.
Perform hardware installations, troubleshooting, and routine maintenance at Raytheon and government facilities
Support integration of systems into existing test suite following software updates and changes
Asset and inventory management including developing plans, partnering with internal Raytheon, government customers and co-contractors in the BMDS community and space/power allocation
Required Skills:
8+ years related system design, integration and test experience
Experience installing new or rebuilding existing servers both physical and virtual, and configure hardware, peripherals, services, settings, directories, and storage
Experience with performing technical assessments, identifying corrective actions on faulted equipment, installing and testing equipment modifications
Experience with the operation of standard test equipment such as oscilloscopes, spectrum analyzer, power meter, and multi meter
Experience in the maintenance of inventory management and associated databases (such as PRISM)
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.
Desired Skills:
Experience in Radar test lab Environment
Experience installing and operating Red Hat Linux operating systems
Ability to collaborate with multi-faceted teams in the configuration, operation, testing, and troubleshooting of the test assets and simulation equipment to support test objectives
Familiar with the operation and/or analysis at least one of the following radars AN/TPY-2, SBX or UEWR
Ability to independently and effectively execute tasks, resolve unexpected issues and meet challenging schedules in a research and development program environment
Ability to convey technical issues and provide status briefings to Raytheon leadership and government customer
Required Education:
Bachelor of Science in Engineering, Science, Mathematics or related STEM degree.
168749

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Huntsville, AL",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
41,Embedded Software Engineer II,-1,"***This position is for early career individuals who have less than 2 years of professional work experience and who will receive a degree during the current academic year or who received their degree within the last 18 months.***

Overview:
Raytheon Missiles and Defense (RMD) is a technology and innovation leader specializing in defense, security and civil markets where youll be part of a global team working together to solve some of the most demanding challenges on the planet. We are the world's largest developer, producer and integrator of weapon systems. In fact, we've produced over one million missiles in our history. Military forces in more than 50 countries look to us for a high-quality product portfolio that includes missiles, smart munitions, projectiles, kinetic kill vehicles and directed energy weapons. We are able to accomplish this feat because our employees live our Values of Trust, Respect, Collaboration, Innovation and Accountability. Diversity is a part of our culture and a key to our success. When world-class talent works together in a place that is respectful and inclusive, we solve some of the world's hardest problems.

We know that a diverse company is a strong company. The people of Raytheon Technologies come from different backgrounds. We value our different perspectives and styles of tackling the worlds most complex challenges and toughest threats. Through Employee Resource Groups (ERGs), our employees are empowered to impact business results, build professional networks, advocate for causes that matter to them and contribute to their local communities. Diversity of thought is critical to the future of innovation. We leverage these unique voices to generate solutions toward a united and singular purpose: to define the future of aerospace.

Job Description:
The Software Products Engineering (SPE) organization develops flight software applications, including integration and test on missiles, launchers, fire control and other complex systems. Our precision software and firmware integrates operating systems, device drivers, networking, and control software to bring together sensor, guidance, and flight control processing features to complete the mission. Our engineers design, develop, and build innovative solutions for the U.S. Government. Experience all aspects of a software development life-cycle as a member of a fast-paced agile team on the leading edge of:
Real-time systems design
Digital signal processing
Machine Learning and Autonomous Systems
Cyber Security
DevOps technologies and methods
We encourage curious, creative problem solvers to join our team of bright, dedicated software craftspeople in designing and implementing highly innovative systems. You will learn advanced software engineering practices and apply new technologies to develop next generation capabilities and help keep our country safe.

As an entry-level Software Engineer, you will:
Assist and participate in the research, design, development and testing of real-time embedded software, firmware, and tools, to include development of new work products or enhancement of existing applications and systems
Design, code, test, integrate and document software solutions
Participate in internal review of software components and systems
Collaborate with project leaders and other professionals within Engineering
Work on problems with defined scope, schedule and expectations
Follow established development practices and processes to maintain the configuration management of software products
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Required Education/Skills:
Master of Science or Master of Arts degree in Computer Engineering or Software Engineering; or
Master of Science or Master of Arts degree in a related Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) discipline (such as Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Systems Engineering, Math or Physics) with experience with C, C++, or Java
Must be either currently pursuing degree or degree must have been granted in the last 18 months
U.S. Citizenship is required
Desired Skills:
College coursework covering modern software languages (such as C, C++, or Java)
1 year or more of calculus, physics and computer science studies that include assembly level programming
Knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Knowledge of systems software design, operating systems and architectures
ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard. 3.0 cumulative GPA desired
Demonstrated ability to work effectively with individuals from diverse communities and cultures
Demonstrated ability to work with colleagues who represent a diversity of work and conflict resolution styles
Location:
This position is located in beautiful Tucson, AZ. Tucson has a friendly,caring and laid-back atmosphere, combined with the innovation and energy of ametropolitan region and recognized as one of Americas 10 Best Small Cities. Surrounded by beautiful mountains, colorful Sonoran Desert landscape andmajestic saguaro cacti, Tucson is blessed with some of natures best work.Tucson is known for its bright blue skies, and with more than 310 sunny days peryear, Tucsons fantastic weather lets residents enjoy the outdoors year-round.

Benefits:
Full-time and Part-time opportunities are available
Student Loan Repayment Contribution Program
Paid Parental Leave
Educational Assistance
9/80 work schedule Every other Friday off
Onsite Wellness Program Health Screenings/Flu Shots
401K Savings & Investment Plan
Paid Time Off
Rstars is an enterprise-wide recognition program that allows you to give and receive thanks for notable and exceptional performance.
Clearance:
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. https://www.state.gov/m/ds/clearances/c10978.htm
*Please upload a copy of your most recent transcripts with your resume when applying to this requisition. Please include your cumulative GPA and projected graduation date on your resume. ***

167597

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
42,CMT Staff Engineer,$40k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

We’re growing.
Froehling & Robertson, Inc., (F&R) has been proudly engineering stability in the country since 1881. In addition to being one of the oldest, independent testing/engineering companies, F&R is also a minority-owned business offering competitive compensation/benefits, and a positive work environment designed around the philosophy of mutual respect for all! Our shared F&R/Employee values include: fairness, integrity, and high ethical standards.

And. You’ve made it just in time!

We’re always on the lookout for FRESH and ENERGIZED talent; individuals and professionals who are not afraid to get their boots and hats a little dirty from the ruffles of the journey to engineering stability together.

Come be a part of this talented and dedicated team.
Join stability. Apply now!

Who we’re looking for

F&R is seeking a leader with a background in private sector and governmental construction projects to provide construction materials testing and special inspection services, and project management. You are responsible for coordinating of the efforts of other engineers, technicians, special inspectors, and sub-consultants to deliver results that ensure our goal of exceeding our clients’ expectations on every project.

Responsibilities:

What you’ll be doing

Including but not limited to:

Project management of construction materials testing and special inspection projects addressing building materials such as soils, asphalt, concrete, masonry.
Reviewing reports, plans, drawings, specifications and other project data.
Adhering to project budgets, record keeping, materials testing, and inspections.
Coordinating and communicating with contractors and clients.
Supervising and directing engineering technicians, special inspectors and subcontractors.
Evaluating, selecting, and applying standard engineering methods, techniques, procedures, and criteria during the performance of engineering services.
Work with staff of engineers, technicians, and admin personnel to provide service.
Satisfy multiple and unrelated deadlines.
Preparing technical reports and letters
Qualifications:

What you need to have:

BA in Construction Management, Civil Engineering or related field
PE License required, or ability to obtain within 1 year
Multiple years of experience in construction materials testing and inspections desired
Must be a team leader who can lead growth and success through F&R values
Excellent communication and presentation skills (oral and written)
Ability to multi-task and meat deadlines
Ability to work independently and within cross-functional teams to achieve goals
Excellent attention to details
Valid driver’s license and good-standing driving record
Some travel will be required
Must be willing to participate in and pass F&R’s pre-employment screening including a background investigation, drug screening and driving record

Check out our perks + Benefits:

In addition to our welcoming company culture and competitive compensation packages, our employees enjoy the below benefits:

Comprehensive group medical insurance, including health, dental, vision and life
Opportunity for professional growth and advancement
Tuition reimbursement
Paid time off
Company–observed paid holidays
Short and long-term disability coverage
401K retirement
Company Cell Phone + tablet
Use of Company Vehicle

We are an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer, and highly encourage resumes from all interested parties including women, minorities, veterans and persons with disabilities. We extend equal employment opportunities to qualified applicants and employees on an equal basis regardless of an individual’s age, race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy status, marital status, military or veteran status, genetic information or any other reason protected by federal, state or local law. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

F&R participates in the USCIS E-Verify Program to verify that all new hires are authorized to work in the United States.

EOE M/F/D/V/SO. Drug Free Workplace.",3.4,"Froehling & Robertson Inc
3.4","Sterling, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1881,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
43,Principal Software Engineer (Clearance Required),$117k-$230k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the job:

CollabraSpace PRIME contract is seeking a Software Engineer to join the software development team who will develop and sustain integrated, feature-rich capabilities that promote modernization of visualization and presentation tools. The software development team will provide application development and support to tools that allow mission analytic users to view existing data or contribute new information in a collaborative environment.

The Software Engineer for this position may be professionally focused on services or may be a full stack SWE with an interest in supporting services. The Software Engineer should have documented work experience using Java8 (including generics, lambdas, streams), Spring, Jersey REST, Git, Maven, jUnit and Mockito.

Additional information:
Approximately 15 team members made up of software, system, and test engineers
Requirements:
Twenty (20) years experience as a SWE in programs and contracts of similar scope, type, and complexity is required.
Analyze user requirements to derive software design and performance requirements
Debug existing software and correct defects
Provide recommendations for improving documentation and software development process standards
Design and code new software or modify existing software to add new features
Integrate existing software into new or modified systems or operating environments
Develop simple data queries for existing or proposed databases or data repositories
Write or review software and system documentation
Serve as team lead at the level appropriate to the software development process being used on any particular project
Design or implement complex database or data repository interfaces/queries
Develop or implement algorithms to meet or exceed system performance and functional standards
Assist with developing and executing test procedures for software components
Develop software solutions by analyzing system performance standards, confer with users or system engineers; analyze systems flow, data usage and work processes; and investigate problem areas
Modify existing software to correct errors, to adapt to new hardware, or to improve its performance
Design, develop and modify software systems, using scientific analysis and mathematical models to predict and measure outcome and consequences of design
Design or implement complex algorithms requiring adherence to strict timing, system resource, or interface constraints; Perform quality control on team products
Implement recommendations for improving documentation and software development process standards
Oversee one or more software development teams and ensure the work is completed in accordance with the constraints of the software development process being used on any particular project
Confer with system engineers and hardware engineers to derive software requirements and to obtain information on project limitations and capabilities, performance requirements and interfaces
Coordinate software system installation and monitor equipment functioning to ensure operational specifications are met.
Recommend new technologies and processes for complex software projects
Serve as the technical lead of multiple software development teams
Select the software development process in coordination with the customer and system engineering
Ensure quality control of all developed and modified software
Delegate programming and testing responsibilities to one or more teams and monitor their performance
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Four (4) years of SWE experience on projects with similar software processes may be substituted for a bachelor’s degree.
Clearance: Applicants must be U.S. Citizens possessing an active TS/SCI security clearance with a Polygraph.

About us: Collaboration is the fusion of people and ideas toward a common goal; and at CollabraSpace it’s part of everything we do. It's the foundation upon which Collabraspace was created, at the core of our corporate philosophy, and even represented in our logo where different pieces of one circle work together. As a technical services and product company, Collabraspace supports the critical mission of our nation’s security through ongoing collaboration with our team members, customers, and partners.

Across our 20+ programs we provide enterprise software development solutions and real-time collaboration to both government and private industry. CollabraSpace is headquartered in Annapolis Junction, MD, close to the majority of our work and therefore, close to you.

CollabraSpace Facts:
Team. At CollabraSpace, we truly believe in the team. We’ll always do our best to find a position that makes you happy to go to work every day, support the charitable causes that are important to you, and encourage your involvement with the company by providing events for the whole family.
Security. We offer competitive salaries but more than that, we make sure the salary we are offering you can be supported by multiple programs. Why is that important? See bullet #1; if you’re not happy we will do our best to find something that does make you happy.
Benefits. Our comprehensive benefits package means you pay very little for a full suite of coverage.
100% company paid premiums for Health and Dental plans for employees and eligible dependents.
100% company paid Life & Disability plans.
401(k) & Roth plan with company contribution immediately vested.
Annual bonus plan, spot bonuses for a job well done, and referral bonuses.
Paid Time Off (PTO) allowing you to use your time off as you see fit.
Formal education and training benefits.
Transparency. You have heard it before but here you’ll truly experience it. The management team “puts it all on the table” and always has an open door.
Training and Education. It’s part of our collaborative environment. Besides the traditional off-site training which we pay for upfront, CollabraSpace offers in-house Technical Exchanges on a range of topics presented by our own technical staff or industry partners.
Honors. We earned the Alliance for Workplace Excellence Award for 4 years running and have been named to the Baltimore Sun’s Top 100 Workplaces 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, and 2018; an award given based on survey responses from our team members. We are consistently ranked as one of the Top IT Firms in Baltimore by the Baltimore Business Journal.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

CollabraSpace is an equal opportunity employer. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.

Make a life at CollabraSpace, not just a living!",5.0,"CollabraSpace, Inc.
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
44,Junior Engineer Virtual Hiring Event,-1,"MOUNTAIN, LTD. Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Junior Engineer

Intake Details:

Requirements

Strong computer skills

Strong verbal communication skills

Ability to multitask

Must be analytical, detail oriented, and conscientious

Must have a high level of initiative and follow-up support

Capability working with limited supervision

What to bring to this event

Apply to the job on our career portal

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About MOUNTAIN, LTD.

Since 1979, MOUNTAIN, LTD. has successfully created and supported turnkey engineering solutions for traditional and wireless telecom providers across the United States. We are a national leader in the industry, providing high-quality engineering, on-time service delivery, and skilled personnel paired with innovative technology and creative solutions. Specialties include OSP/ISP engineering, design, permitting, right-of-way and CAD for traditional and wireless telecommunications companies.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Daily Responsibilities:

The Engineering Assistant performs duties such maintaining complex files, keeping records, preparing schedules, compiling and checking reports, searching and investigating information contained in file, processing departmental documents requiring specific knowledge of functional operations, posting records including accounting and continuing property records, typing correspondence and reports from rough drafts and assisting engineers as requested. Upon request, the Engineering Assistant, using various formats, will gather and coordinate associated statistical data for use in departmental or project specific reports.

Qualifications:

Strong computer skills including but not limited to Microsoft office products (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, etc.).
Ability to multi-task and strong verbal communication skills.
Must be analytical, detail oriented, and conscientious.
Must have a high level of initiative and follow-up support capability working with limited supervision",4.5,"MOUNTAIN, LTD.
4.5","New Gloucester, ME",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
45,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"About SecurityScorecard:


SecurityScorecard is an industry-leading cybersecurity company backed by Google, Sequoia, and Riverwood. Our mission is to make the world a safer place. We measure your and your vendors' cyber-health by assigning a security rating of ""A"" through ""F"" based on outside-in, non-intrusive data. Our Comprehensive security ratings, advanced data analytics, and actionable insights discover Third-Party Vulnerabilities & Security Gaps In Real-Time.
We are headquartered in NYC with over 200+ employees globally, raised over $110M USD, used by 1,000+ enterprise customers, and rating 1.5 million companies. We have created a new category of enterprise software, and our culture has helped us be recognized as one of the 10 hottest SaaS startups in NY for two years in a row.
Our vision is to create a new language for companies and their partners to communicate, understand, and improve each other's security posture.

What you will do:


As a Senior Software Engineer on the Data Pipeline Platform team, you will help us scale, support, and build the next-generation platform for our data pipelines. The team's mission is to empower data scientists, software engineers, data engineers, and threat intelligence engineers accelerate the ingestion of new data sources and present the data in a meaningful way to our clients.

You will design and implement systems for ingesting, transforming, connecting, storing, and delivering data from a wide range of sources with varying levels of complexity and scale. You will enable other engineers to deliver value rapidly with minimum duplication of effort. Automate the infrastructure supporting the data pipeline as code and deployments by improving CI/CD pipelines. Monitor, troubleshoot, and improve the data platform to maintain stability and optimal performance.

Who you are:
Bachelor's degree or higher in a quantitative/technical field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Math
6+ years of data pipeline software development experience
Exceptional skills in at least one high-level programming language (Scala, Java, Go, Python or equivalent)
Actively using and a strong understanding of big data technologies such as Kafka, Spark, Storm, Apache Flink, Databricks toolkit and Cassandra
Experience with Dataflow orchestration in Google Cloud Flow, Airflow, or Conductor
Experience with AWS services including EMR, S3, Redshift, and RDS
Excellent communication skills to collaborate with cross-functional partners and independently drive projects and decisions
Previous experience working in distributed teams. We are a remote-first company!
Located in the U.S. or Canada
Benefits:
We pay people well and give them challenging problems to solve.
World-class health benefits
Stock options
401K
You are always welcome to work from home
$3000 per year education fund
#1 Ranked Cybersecurity Analytics company in the word
SecurityScorecard embraces diversity. We believe that our team is strengthened through hiring and retaining employees with diverse backgrounds, skillsets, ideas, and perspectives. We make hiring decisions based upon merit and do not discriminate based on race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.",4.1,"SecurityScorecard
4.1",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
46,Senior Software Engineer II -,$98k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a telented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication Risk Mitigation Platform The candidates selected for these roles will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer II, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Rails Core application in our EOM Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
10+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
47,Senior Software Engineer - EOM,$98k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tabula Rasa Healthcare– TRHC is a family of companies that leverages technology to improve healthcare. TRHC works with providers and insurers to identify multi-drug interactions and to reduce risk of medication-related problems. We have developed the first multi-drug interaction tool that identifies risk across a variety of safety factors and presents meaningful opportunities to mitigate that risk. This technology can be used to assess safety at the individual patient-level or to stratify medication risk at the population-level, and can be embedded within any EMR or other healthcare IT system.

A Tabula Rasa Healthcare Co., CareKinesis, is looking for a talented and experienced Senior Software Engineer to contribute to our cloud-based medication Risk Mitigation Platform. The candidate selected for this role will work together with a Scrum team to take requirements through the development lifecycle and transform into high quality, valuable deliverables. As a Senior Software Engineer, he or she will take a paramount role as a tech lead in cultivating technical guidance, architecture, best practices as well as assisting the team and growth through mentorship. He or she will also be a key member in the overall assessment, vision, and implementation of our technical decisions by participating in cross-team committees.

Location: Mount Pleasant, SC

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Function as a tech lead in an agile environment developing on both full-stack Javascript applications / services as well as a Rails Core application in our EOM Platform. (Node.js, Angular.js, React.js, Ruby, Rails preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform)
Participation and ownership in all stages of development process: requirements, design, implementation, testing, deployment, and support.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Perform challenging work in designing, writing, editing, modifying, and debugging software applications and services.
Participation in cross-team architecture, design, process discussions and decisions within established committees.
Self-motivated with the ability to design and write high-performance, reliable, and maintainable code.
Learn new technologies and resolve challenges involved with integrating them with our infrastructure.
Update and modify systems to improve efficiency.
Work closely with Product Team in evaluating current systems and making decisions on future development.
Developing, testing and documenting RESTful APIs; with event-driven design patterns utilizing message queues; with SQL and/or NoSQL data stores; with designing, developing and deploying distributed systems.
Comfortable with large projects in source control (git), continuous integration (Jenkins) and writing unit tests and integration tests.
Design, develop and implement solutions around both a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
Experience:
6+ of professional software development experience.
Expertise in two or more general purpose programming languages.
Preferred Experience in Healthcare Technology and/or Pharmacy Operations.
Preferred Experience with EHRs, integrations, system validations (EPIC, Cerner, QS/1, etc.).
Interest and ability to learn other coding languages and technologies as needed.
Knowledge of e-prescribing standards certifications a plus. (Meaningful Use, FHIR)
Familiarity with ontologies such as SNOMED, RxNorm, LOINC, ICD-10, NDC a plus
Qualifications:
Ideal candidates must be innovative, creative, flexible and be passionate about building quality software.
Ability to architect, design, develop and implement solutions around a micro-service and monolithic architectures.
Highly skilled in written and verbal communication.
Has exceptional initiative and follow-through on projects with minimal supervision or guidance.
Passionate about knowledge sharing and has the skills to help develop and advance the team through mentorship.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with clients, end-users, and team members.
Experience using platform provided tools preferred (Docker, Cloud Foundry, AWS, NewRelic, Sentry).
Experience with performance optimization, especially the use of asset pipelines and CDNs, as well as tools used to analyze front end performance bottlenecks.
Preferred experience with database re-factoring and decomposing existing systems from a monolith to a micro-services architecture.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Fast paced environment.
Collaboration across remote sites within the company.
New office located on Shem Creek.
Flexibility to work remote when warranted.
Office health and wellness initiatives, for those interested. (on-site private shower)
Celebrating success!
#DICE

#DICE",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Mount Pleasant, SC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
48,Electrical Controls Engineer,-1,"JOB DESCRIPTION: *
Responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining electrical control systems for all custom industrial deburring, parts washing, metal finishing machines and panel building equipment. Works on multiple equipment projects at the same time and is responsible for all electrical – related aspects of each project, from initial electrical design to installation and commissioning. Will use SolidWorks electrical software to model various electrical components, enclosures, panel layouts and wiring schematics as needed for new designs and re-design of existing machines. Works with various customer-submitted industrial equipment specifications as they relate to the electrical portion of the equipment order, write programmable logic controller (PLC) programs along with programs for operator touch screens that are used in the machines, inspect the electrical portion of used equipment that is returned for rebuild, confer with vendors and work with purchasing to specify electrical components needed for projects, and work with customers during equipment build and commissioning. Travel as required to troubleshoot and service equipment in the field. May require international travel.
Essential Functions: *
· Design functional electrical systems through the development and testing of components.

· Research and specify components for electrical equipment and systems.

· Devise testing methods and properties to confirm the functionality of electrical components and systems.

· Uses standard product engineering data to develop electrical controls.

· Develop electrical products and systems to meet customer specifications.

· Develop schematics for electrical controls, model enclosures and electrical assemblies based on schematics.

· Research manufacturing processes to find innovative processes to improve or modify current methods.

· Communicate engineering information across departments to facilitate successful completion of projects.

· Perform detailed calculations using algebraic, trigonometric, and geometric formulas to establish standards and specifications.

· Inspect installations and observe operations to ensure compliance with design and equipment specifications and safety standards.
OTHER DUTIES: *
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Qualifications: *
· Bachelor’s Degree in electrical engineering, electrical engineering technology or related field is required.

· Experience with three-phase industrial electrical system design and a general working knowledge of industrial machinery is required.

· Preferred experience in wiring and panel building.

· Preferred experience in programming and troubleshooting a variety of PLC’s and operator touch screens.

· Computer skills to include a working knowledge of SolidWorks software and Microsoft Office products.

· Experience programming FANUC robots beneficial.

· Knowledge of ISO/QS certification – preferably with and through ISO/QS certification.

· Ability to analyze problems and select proper corrective action.

· Good written and verbal communications.

· Ability to organize tasks and work independently.

· Knowledge of UL, ULC, CE, CSA, NEC, NFPA requirements

This description reflects the principal functions of the job for the purpose of job evaluation. It should not be construed as a detailed description of all work requirements of the job nor shall be construed as giving exclusive responsibility for every function described.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.7,"Almco Innovance Inc
2.7","Albert Lea, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1972,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
49,Senior Hydraulic Engineer,-1,"Senior Hydraulic Engineer*
Alden Research Laboratory is a recognized leader in the field of fluid dynamics engineering, consulting, research and development. Founded in 1894, Alden is headquartered in Holden, MA, with hydraulic modeling laboratories in Holden, MA and Everett, WA, and offices in Portland, OR; Fort Collins, CO; and Littleton, CO. The hydraulic modeling group uses reduced-scale physical model testing and computational fluid dynamics to solve a wide range of flow-related civil and mechanical engineering problems.
General Position Description*
Alden’s hydraulic modeling group is seeking a senior hydraulic engineer for its Everett, WA office with a minimum of 10 years of experience in computational fluid dynamics (CFD) and its application in water resources engineering including open channel flow, closed conduit flow, river mechanics, spillways, fish passage, pump stations and other civil hydraulic structures. The candidate must have strong leadership qualities and be comfortable working independently or as part of a team. The position will provide an opportunity to grow the hydraulic modeling practice in the Everett, WA office.

Day-to-day responsibilities for the position will include meeting/speaking with prospective clients to learn their needs and develop business opportunities; management and execution of modeling projects from start to finish (development of technical approaches and costing, model set up, grid generation, simulations, analysis of data, interpretation of results, hydraulic design); technical writing (proposals, memos, reports, presentations, conference papers); mentoring junior engineers; and attendance of industry conferences and trade shows.
Qualifications*
The preferred candidate will demonstrate the following qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Hydraulic, Civil, or Environmental Engineering

Professional Engineering license or the ability to obtain licensure within 6 months

Proficiency using commercial software: FLOW-3D, STAR-CCM+, Fluent, Rhino, Tecplot, and CAD

Experience working as a consultant for both private and public sector clients in the field of civil hydraulic engineering

Fiscal and technical project management experience

A desire to network within the engineering community via technical publications, oral presentations, etc. to develop new business opportunities

Supervisory experience or an interest in mentoring junior engineers

US citizenship or permanent residence status is required.
AA/EOE Minorities and Women are strongly encouraged to apply.*
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
PE (Preferred)
EIT (Preferred)",5.0,"Alden
5.0","Everett, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
50,Big Data Analyst BSLEP7,$44k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings requires the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel.
Through the use of effective “big data” technologies and solutions, CBP ensures that the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure. In response to this challenge, ManTech, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified and versatile data analysts to facilitate data-driven decision making in response to national security threats.
The primary objective of the data analysis team is three-fold: 1) Support the development of predictive models via the identification of behaviors and attributes that inform illicit activities; 2) Provide on-demand analysis to support emergent operational needs; and, 3) Develop performance dashboards and artifacts to inform resource allocation, justify requirements, and support statutory reporting mandates.
In all three areas, data analysts must be capable of transforming large volumes of raw data, both structured and unstructured forms, into mission-focused insights that enhance understanding of mission performance, workload, and/or behavioral trends (i.e., strategic, tactical, and operational insights). Analysts may be called upon to support a diverse array of initiatives involving complex queries in support of network analysis, entity resolution, threat research, visualization, and impact assessments.

The strongest applicants will engage in highly dynamic, threat/risk driven operating environments. They will bring a proven track record of working with decision support tools and applications operationally employed by mission-support entities. Within three to six months of joining the project, we expect analysts will:
Master relevant data schemas, reference data, joining conditions, and relationships of existing databases, as well as associated warehouses and data marts, involving trade, travel, national security, and law enforcement data.
Conduct exploratory analysis demonstrating: a refined understanding of the strengths and weaknesses of the underlying data; a willingness to explore non-traditional data sources and evaluation methods; and a clear link to mission need.
Construct query code as well as run, save, edit, optimize, and document queries using SQL and other languages including Spark to extract mission-critical insights.
Design, develop and deliver analytic artifacts such as dashboards, scorecards, and structured Excel reports that: support executive-level, at-a-glance findings; empower non-technical users to explore user-specific equities (e.g. PowerBI); and/or provide detailed information informing operational outcomes.
Assess validity, accuracy, completeness, consistency, and uniformity of data as well as develop mitigation steps and processes to address data quality issues in support of clean data.
Translate findings (e.g. mission impacts, limitations of findings/ analytical confidence, analytical methods and techniques employed) to clearly articulate the “so what” within the context of mission performance to technical and non-technical audiences in the form of written reports and in-person briefings.
Engage internal and external stakeholders in a professional and informed manner to collect analysis requirements and ensure alignment of expected outcomes.
Integrate with, and materially contribute to, portfolio teams as a matrixed resource to provide data analytics expertise in support of modeling, ad hoc query support, or performance assessment initiatives in collaboration with data scientists, intelligence analysts, developers, and other participants under the direction of a project manager.
Applicants should note that while some formal training exists to support building knowledge of missions and the implementation of data-driven solutions, but much of the knowledge must be gained through on-the-job training and individual initiative. Technical knowledge is insufficient to achieve effectiveness in this operating environment; expertise must be enhanced with rapid acquisition of mission knowledge and demonstrated commitment positive mission outcomes. Therefore, we seek self-starters who are capable of independent exploration and knowledge acquisition, willing to develop informal support networks, and with an appreciation for the immense challenge of safeguarding the Nation’s borders.

BS Degree in a related technical fields (Computer Science, Math, Statistics, etc.)
Hands on experience working with data-mining, analysis or statistical software such as R, Matlab, SAS Enterprise Miner, SPSS Modeler, or SQL Developer for data analysis
Hands on experience with at least one of the following technologies: Hadoop eco system, including HDFS, YARN, Cassandra, Hive, Pig, and Spark
Hands on experience with Batch-oriented and streaming distributed processing methods such as Nifi, Spark, Kafka, or Storm
Hands on experience with distributed search engines like Elasticsearch or Solr
Conceptual understanding of – and/or prior experiences related to – data profiling, fuzzy matching, entity resolution, and signal detection theory (specifically with respect to SD theory: designing and improving upon systems that monitor, minimize, and balance false positive and false negative outcomes)
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with programming languages such as Java, Python, and SQL
Unix / Linux experience
Experience working in field of entity resolution, analytics, data mining or name matching.
Delivering solutions using Amazon Web Services (e.g., AWS EC2, RDS, S3)
Experience with Javascript frameworks like Angular, React and JQuery is a plus
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI)

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
51,"Lead Software Engineer, Dir.",$131k-$257k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

Acts as a team lead of a software development team and provides business support for the production systems in assigned business units. Leads in all phases of the system development life cycle. Plans, monitors, designs, develops, integrates, and implements custom and packaged solutions to achieve business goals. Architects solutions that are fit for purpose and mentors more junior staff to ensure overall quality. Manages internal client relationships to resolve complex support issues.

Major Accountabilities :

Engineer Responsibilities:

Lead in project analysis, design, and implementation phases
Analyze project requirements and accordingly decide on technical and functional direction
Prepare user requirements, technical specifications, and design specifications
Develop new software and modify existing software when required
Lead in the definition of coding standards and lead the Peer Code Review processes
Lead technical support of system acceptance testing and validation activities
Define the appropriate agile processes to be adopted for a given project and provide leadership as required
Drive the continuous improvement of engineering processes
Lead system maintenance and oversee periodic review processes
Review and decide upon improvements to existing system designs
Deliver solutions to improve system performance and reliability
Respond to customer queries and concerns in a timely fashion. Track issues, determine trends, and drive new designs to eliminate future issues.
Lead meetings with teammates and business partners to discuss new ideas, issues and projects
Perform system failure analysis and drive corrective actions. Lead root cause analysis and determine long term solutions.

Lead Responsibilities:

Lead a team of employees/consultants
Delegate tasks and set deadlines
Monitor team performance and report on metrics
Discover training needs and provide coaching
Ensure that the team is consistently delivering working software to the highest standards
Verify that the team is adhering to our commitment of principles and practices
Understand and communicate process methodologies used in the bank
Provide technical guidance in planning and executing assigned projects
Communicate information to management including escalation of key issues and risks

Education/Experience/Skills/Knowledge :

Education: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Accounting, and Finance, or a related field, or equivalent work experience, is required.

Experience:
Minimum of 10 years of computer systems experience involving installing, supporting, and using information technology in a large, regulated financial services (preferably banking) environment is required.

Skills & Knowledge :

Working knowledge of Treasury and Capital Markets is highly desirable.
Understanding of operating systems, application security configurations, and best practices in Windows and UNIX environment is required.
Ability to take the initiative to pursue assignments, responsibilities, and support requests to a logical and final solution and to employ System Development Life Cycle (SDLC) standards is required.
Demonstrated knowledge and experience:
Minimum of 6 years of Microsoft .Net experience of proposing, documenting technology solutions and development experience of client applications, web services, and web applications.
Minimum of 2 years of java experience of proposing, documenting technology solutions and development experience of client applications, web services, and web applications
Minimum of 2 years knowledge of VBA with Microsoft Excel, Access.
Relational Database Management Systems: Oracle and SQL Server, including PL/SQL and expert SQL
Implementing code using design patterns, unit testing and mocking frameworks
Market data and market platforms such as Reuters, Bloomberg and Intex
Knowledge of fixed income and derivatives instruments
Experience with the integration of custom financial applications with packaged systems would be beneficial.
Experience with third party valuations and risk systems such as: Numerix, QRM, Polypaths or any other valuation and risk system would be beneficial.
Understanding of fixed income and derivatives instrument valuation would be advantageous.
Knowledge and experience of full stack web application development and client-side frameworks would be advantageous e.g. HTML5, JQuery, AngularJS, Bootstrap, Typescript/Javascript.
Experience with cloud-based technologies would also be advantageous e.g. CloudFormation, API Gateway, Lambda etc.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and strong analytical and problem-solving skills

Qualifications:

The Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer and is committed to a diverse workforce. We value and actively seek to recruit, develop, and retain individuals with varied backgrounds and experiences reflecting the full diversity of the communities that we serve. It is the policy of the Bank to comply with all applicable laws concerning the employment of persons with disabilities.",2.5,"FHLBank San Francisco
2.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
52,"Senior Staff Engineer, and Test Engineer Manager",$101k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"pSemi Corporation is a Murata company driving semiconductor integration. pSemi builds on Peregrine Semiconductor’s 30-year legacy of technology advancements and strong IP portfolio but with a new mission—to enhance Murata’s world-class capabilities with high-performance semiconductors. With a strong foundation in RF integration, pSemi’s product portfolio now spans power management, connected sensors, optical transceivers, antenna tuning and RF frontends. These intelligent and efficient semiconductors enable advanced modules for smartphones, base stations, personal computers, electric vehicles, data centers, IoT devices and healthcare. From headquarters in San Diego and offices around the world, pSemi’s team explores new ways to make electronics for the connected world smaller, thinner, faster and better.

Job Summary

The Senior Staff Engineer, and Test Engineering Manager will oversee and provide leadership to a small team of junior and senior level test engineers while reporting into the Senior Manager, Test Engineering. As a technical leader and manager, this person will be responsible for organizing the team to successfully complete assigned projects which will include planning test development activities to support new products, participating in long term road mapping for production test capabilities and presenting project updates in manger level project reviews. This person will be making decisions that allow for the highest quality products while staying aligned with corporate strategies. There will be times when the person will be expected to be hands-on with their team to solve difficult problems in order to keep projects on track. This position requires proven experience in developing ATE test solutions for high volume production of RF, Analog or Mixed-signal Integrated Circuits. This position will be responsible for all aspects of test development for new products, including: development of load boards, probe cards, software, and working through ATE qualification process to prove the solution is stable for production. This position works closely with Design Engineering, Product Engineering, Program Management, and Manufacturing to deliver the highest quality products.

Roles & Responsibilities

This position has responsibility for:

This position has Management responsibility for:
Optimizing team performance by motivating team by example, influence, training and structure
Managing the career development of team members through goal setting and providing feedback
Helping recruit, select, and train new employees
Assigning and prioritizing tasks for team members such that overall project plans can be supported
Incorporating corporate strategies and technical data when making decisions that impact new products or projects
Representing team with presentations in manager level project reviews
Practicing hands-on training with team to solve difficult problems
This position has Technical responsibility for:
Leading efforts for continuous improvement of processes followed by the test engineering team
Owning TE responsibilities for products assigned to the group
Reviewing results and reports provided by team, provide constructive feedback
Responsible for following processes & procedures relating to new product development
Participating as a hands-on contributor for projects that are assigned to the team
Designing and developing necessary hardware and software to create a complete test solution
Transferring production test solution to off-shore test facility when necessary
Working closely with OSAT’s on turnkey test developments, performing test feasibility studies, test planning and providing technical oversight
Understanding schematic design while working with vendors through the layout and fabrication process for load boards and probe cards
Measurement system analysis (GRR)
Competency Requirements

In order to perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Displaying Technical Expertise: Keeps his/her technical skills current; effectively applies specialized knowledge and skills to perform work tasks; understands and masters the technical skills, knowledge, and tasks associated with his/her job; shares technical expertise with others
Driving for Results: Aggressively pursues challenging goals and objectives; will to put in considerable time and effort to accomplish objectives; takes a highly focused, goal driven approach toward work
Critical Thinking: Skilled at finding logical flaws in arguments and plans; identifies problems and solutions that others might miss; provides detailed insight and constructive criticism into problems and complex situations
Delivering High Quality Work: Critically reviews work processes to ensure quality; addresses problems that could impact quality; makes sure project deliverables and services meet all requirements and expectations; does not make the same mistakes twice
Working with Ambiguity: Achieves forward progress in the face of poorly defined situations and/or unclear goals; able to work effectively with limited or partial information
Minimum Qualifications (Experience and Skills)
12 years of relevant experience in test development or 8 years with Master’s degree
2 years of experience with direct management of ATE test development projects and resources
Demonstrated record of releasing high volume products into production environment, including wafer sort and package / module test
In-depth knowledge of RF, Analog or Mixed-signal Integrated Circuits
Demonstrated understanding of test methodologies for Analog, Digital and RF circuits
Experience with Rack and stack ATE systems including VXI / PXI and/or commercial ATE platforms; LTX (Cohu), Teradyne, Advantest
Demonstrated ability to release new solutions off-shore
Excellent software skills with demonstrated proficiency using a high level programming language such as C/C++, VB/VBA, Python, etc.
Proven experience in developing ATE test solutions for high volume production of RF, Analog or Mixed-signal Integrated Circuits
Exceptional organization and attentiveness to detail
Must be a team player
Must be punctual
Preferred Qualifications
2 years of experience leading or managing individuals and/or teams
Experience working with OSAT’s on turnkey test developments
Education Requirements
BS in Electrical Engineering or MS in Electrical Engineering with relevant experience
Work Environment

This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment.

Physical Demands

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus. This position requires the ability to occasionally lift office products and supplies, up to 20 pounds.

pSemi Corporation supports a diverse workforce and is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity for applicants and employees. pSemi does not discriminate on the basis of age, race, color, religion (including religious dress and grooming practices), sex/gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions or breastfeeding), gender identity, gender expression, genetic information, national origin (including language use restrictions and possession of a driver’s license issued under Vehicle Code section 12801.9), ancestry, physical or mental disability, legally-protected medical condition, military or veteran status (including “protected veterans” under applicable affirmative action laws), marital status, sexual orientation, or any other basis protected by local, state or federal laws applicable to the Company. pSemi also prohibits discrimination based on the perception that an employee or applicant has any of those characteristics, or is associated with a person who has or is perceived as having any of those characteristics.

Note: The Peregrine Semiconductor name, Peregrine Semiconductor logo and UltraCMOS are registered trademarks and the pSemi name, pSemi logo, HaRP and DuNE are trademarks of pSemi Corporation in the U.S. and other countries. All other trademarks are the property of their respective companies. pSemi products are protected under one or more of the following U.S. Patents: http://patents.psemi.com",3.7,"pSemi
3.7","San Diego, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
53,Sr Systems Safety Engineer II,-1,"Note: This is a position for experienced professionals. If you have completed your degree within the last 18 months please apply to RTX College jobs: https://jobs.raytheonmissilesanddefense.com/college-jobs

Check us out on YouTube:
https://youtu.be/kfHlc8GCzoU

At Raytheon Technologies (RTX), we are defining the future of aerospace and defense with ambitious technologies that push the limits of known science. Our technologies help our customers take on the world's biggest challenges. Together we are advancing research and development in both the defense and commercial aerospace sectors.

The Whole Life Engineering Directorate (WLE) is responsible for ensuring our products are Safe, Reliable, Maintainable, and delivered on time. WLE consists of multiple disciplines that support engineering, our program offices and our customers. Our WLE disciplines participate in the total life cycle of our products from conception to deactivation. Our focus area is product support, which includes the following disciplines: reliability, system safety, and supportability.

The System Safety Engineering Department is seeking candidates for a Senior System Safety Engineer II position, located in Tucson, AZ.

Entry-to-mid level engineers will work under the direction and mentoring of senior Safety Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) and their Engineering Leadership in handling System Safety Engineering tasks as members of the System Safety Engineering Department.

System Safety Engineering ensures our Raytheon Technologies (RTX) products safely perform their required mission functions throughout their required lifecycle environments, while also meeting overall cost and schedule constraints. This position supports programs specifically by working with experienced System Safety practitioners and missile engineering personnel to ensure that our products are designed with safety in mind.

What are the hazards in our products and what are all the energetics (explosives, gas vessels, lasers, springs, lithium batteries, etc.) contained within them? Do we have all the data and information needed to develop a safety assessment and support U.S. Government Safety Review Board approval? SSE answers these questions on a daily basis.

So what does a SSE do? They analyze engineering drawings, Bill of Materials (BOM), procedures, and work instructions to identify hazards; as well as safety significant components, subsystems, and interfaces (to include software, firmware, hardware, procedures and supporting training). The SSE develops and submits safety data to the proper safety approval authorities and archives the documents and supporting data within an internal document management system. The SSE are responsible for interacting with the Program Management, Engineering, EHS, and government approval authorities from program startup operations, until safety approvals are obtained, through Production and demilitarization and disposal activities. The SSE requires a high degree of self-motivation and effective ability to interface with co-workers across all RMS product lines, Engineering, Operations and Supply Chain Management.

Key Responsibilities:
Perform MIL-STD-882E System Safety Program System Safety engineering tasks and analyses, applying technical knowledge to meet Raytheon and customer requirements
Interpretation of system requirements, customer specifications and military standards to develop appropriate safety requirements for hazard mitigation or elimination
Design verification (fault tree analyses, hazard analyses, sneak circuit analyses, software system safety analyses)
Exercise considerable latitude in technical decisions to meet customer requirements relevant to the System Safety program
Prepare internal and customer reports describing various analyses relevant to the System Safety program
Represent the System Safety Engineering Department as a member of the program, responsible for identifying key issues and addressing them to achieve optimal technical solutions
Take an analytical approach and utilize technical knowledge to solve challenges with optimal solutions
Collaboratively interface with and function across multiple disciplines to gain a full understanding of the product architecture and design
Some U.S. domestic travel may be required.
U.S. Citizenship status is required, as this position will need a U.S. Security Clearance within day 1 of employment.

Required Skills, Education, and Experience:
US Citizenship
B.S. in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM); Desired: ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
A minimum of six (6) years of professional systems safety engineering experience (not including internships)
Proficient in DoD System Safety standard practice: MIL-STD-882E
Experience reading, reviewing, and understanding technical engineering drawings for the identification of energetics and associated safety significant components used in product configurations
MS Office: Word, Excel, PowerPoint
Desired Skills, Education, and Experience:
M.S. in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM); Desired: ABET is the preferred, although not required, accreditation standard
Eight (8) years of professional systems safety engineering experience (not including internships)
Have experience with software and firmware development to include: C, C++, Java, VHDL, and assembly languages
Self-starter with the ability to independently pursue technical information and problem solve
Experience with application of Emotional Intelligence® concepts, techniques
Multi-task in a fast-paced work environment
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. Additional information can be found here: All about Security Clearances

170452

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
54,ETL Developer,$54k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of the
Position:

This role builds data storage systems,
works to fill them with data and supervises a process of loading big data into a data warehousing software. Job
assignments will include analyzing, development,
and delivery of data using ETL tools
from operational systems and files into a staging area, operational data stores, data warehouse,
data marts and files and developing ETL mapping, mapping
documents and SQL queries.
The ETL Developer will also assist
in the development and implementation
of the enterprise integration architecture and will provide ETL expertise to other areas of the organization.

Key Accountabilities:

Uses different data warehousing concepts.Develops modern metadata-driven Data Warehouse solutions using Azure
Stack (such as Microsoft Azure Service Bus, Azure Data Factory, Data Lake
Storage, Azure OCR, Azure Search, Databricks, Azure Monitor, Azure logging,
Azure auditing, Azure Data-Lake Storage Gen2, Azure SQL Data Warehouse, Power BI).Creates tools to generate Azure and other scripts to configure the
Azure Stack Platform.Creates and enhances prototypes and data solutions enabling seamless
delivery of data and is responsible for collecting, parsing, managing and
analyzing large sets of data.Builds the logical data model and implements the physical database structure and constructs and
implements operational data stores and datamarts.Designs develop, automates, and support complex applications to
extract, transform, and load data.After development work completes, developers also must test their
designs to ensure the system runs smoothly.Ensures data quality.Design, develop and maintain database objects such as the tables, views
and stored procedures needed to
support reporting and/or analytics solutions.Develops logical and physical data flow models for ETL applications.Translates data
access, transformation, and movement requirements into functional requirements and mapping designs.
Position: ETL Developer | Division:
Information Technology

Work Days:
Monday - Friday | Work
Hours: 8am-5pm

Purpose of the
Position:

This role builds data storage systems,
works to fill them with data and supervises a process of loading big data into a data warehousing software. Job
assignments will include analyzing, development,
and delivery of data using ETL tools
from operational systems and files into a staging area, operational data stores, data warehouse,
data marts and files and developing ETL mapping, mapping
documents and SQL queries.
The ETL Developer will also assist
in the development and implementation
of the enterprise integration architecture and will provide ETL expertise to other areas of the organization.

Key Accountabilities:
Uses different data warehousing concepts.
Develops modern metadata-driven Data Warehouse solutions using Azure
Stack (such as Microsoft Azure Service Bus, Azure Data Factory, Data Lake
Storage, Azure OCR, Azure Search, Databricks, Azure Monitor, Azure logging,
Azure auditing, Azure Data-Lake Storage Gen2, Azure SQL Data Warehouse, Power BI).
Creates tools to generate Azure and other scripts to configure the
Azure Stack Platform.
Creates and enhances prototypes and data solutions enabling seamless
delivery of data and is responsible for collecting, parsing, managing and
analyzing large sets of data.
Builds the logical data model and implements the physical database structure and constructs and
implements operational data stores and datamarts.
Designs develop, automates, and support complex applications to
extract, transform, and load data.
After development work completes, developers also must test their
designs to ensure the system runs smoothly.
Ensures data quality.
Design, develop and maintain database objects such as the tables, views
and stored procedures needed to
support reporting and/or analytics solutions.
Develops logical and physical data flow models for ETL applications.
Translates data
access, transformation, and movement requirements into functional requirements and mapping designs.
Competencies and Skills:
Proficient with MS SQL and SQL structures on Windows Server platform.
Expertise in Any ETL tool i.e. (SQL queries, SSRS, SSIS Informatica, Data Stage).
Hands-on experience in Azure stack (Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Databricks).
Expertise to Implementing Data warehousing Solutions.
Experience as a Data Engineer in Azure Big Data Environment.
Proficient in HTML, React, .NET, MS Visual Studio, ASP .NET, CSS, Angular Mean Stack, Neo4j, JavaScript, C# development.
Communication skills - able to communicate in a clear, articulate, and professional manner on a daily basis via written and oral.
Interpersonal and Customer Relations skills - able to maintain a professional and courteous attitude with employees and third-party individuals at all times to resolve conflicts and address any issues within the contractual structure and regulations.
Planning/Organizational skills - able to prioritize work activities, use time efficiently and work through projects in a self-motivated manner balancing effort between contracts, vendor agreements, and pricing requests.
Adaptability - able to adapt to rapid changes in the work environment, manage competing demands and able to deal with frequent change, delays or unexpected events.
Problem-solving skills - able to identify and resolve problems in a timely manner; gather and analyze information skillfully; able to apply independent judgment on a regular basis in making decisions.
Time Management skills - able to use time effectively in a semi-supervised fashion, pursuing other activities when regular duties have reduced in volume; able to complete projects in a timely manner.
Work Experience Requirements:
8+ years in Information Technology
5+ years hands-on experience in DW/BI design, development, and implementation
5+ years experience programming (Design/Develop) in SQL, integrations
Experience with a major ETL tool, preferably Azure Data Factory
Experience maintaining source code in Git and managing a CI/CD
pipeline, preferably with Azure DevOps
3+ years experience
troubleshooting, diagnosing and debugging software programs
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, MIS, Computer Engineering or other technology focused discipline or equivalent work experience
Other Qualifications:
Microsoft Azure
Microsoft Windows Server Administration 2012-2019
Jira Core/Software
Git – version control
Microsoft Team Foundation Services
Other Requirements:
Some travel required
May need to be
available nights and weekends
This job description is not designed to be a comprehensive listing
of duties, responsibilities, or activities that are required for this
job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with
or without notice.


Broadway Bank is proud to be an Equal Opportunity
and Affirmative Action Employer. Broadway Bank is a drug-free and tobacco-free
workplace, with a nicotine-free hiring policy. All qualified applicants will receive
consideration for employment without regard to race, color, ethnicity,
religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin,
disability, veteran status, genetic data or other legally protected status.


Member FDIC",3.7,"Broadway Bank
3.7","San Antonio, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1941,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
55,Senior Data Engineer,$93k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Senior Data Engineer.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

As a Senior Data Engineer, you will providing leadership to complex data analysis, uses and explores data, languages, tools and software to best construct data for predictive modelling, tests the model, trains data to deploy the modelling within a complex R&D, Medical, Mathematical environment and a large complexity of IT systems and data.

OBJECTIVES:

Provides leadership to complex data analysis, uses and explores data, languages, tools and software to best construct data for predictive modelling, tests the model, trains data to deploy the modelling within a complex R&D, Medical, Mathematical environment and a large complexity of IT systems and data.
Manages and influences technical existing and new computer science platforms to design, to analyze and implement complex and new data driven solutions, with an impact on the IT Structure and Architecture.
Interprets and impacts advance techniques in partly structured and unstructured big data across different partner organizations.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Manages and influences the data analysis approaches, uses different technologies, big data preparations, programming and loading as well as initial exploration in the process of searching and finding data patterns.
Uses data science input and requests, translates these from data exploration - large record (billions) and unstructured data sets - to mathematic algorithms and uses various tooling from programming languages to new tools (artificial and machine learning) to find data patterns, build and optimize models.
Leads and implements ongoing tests in the search for solutions in the data modelling, collects and prepares the training of data, tones the data, optimizes algorithm implementations to test, scale, and deploy future models.
Conducts and facilitate analytical assessment conceptualizing business needs and translate them into analytical opportunities.
Makes recommendations to design/build/deploy complex data models related to R&D questions independently.
Leads the development of technical roadmaps and approaches for data analyses to find patterns, to design data models, to scale the model to a managed production environment within the current or a technical landscape to develop.
Influences and manages data exploration from analysis to scalable models, works independently and decides quick on transfers in complex data analysis and modelling.
Impacts on IT structure and architecture and provides leadership to this discipline.
Independently use own judgement to identify data requirements and influences the design and implementation of the IS/IT data strategy.
Ensures execution and documentation to Takeda Quality Management System (QMS), suggest adjustments to the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) and other standards, policies and procedures.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with little guidance in only most difficult problems.
Leads a team of engineers to deliver analysis and data modelling that fits into the IT landscape.
Coaches or leads lower level engineers and other technical groups.
Maintains up-to-data knowledge on modern data technologies, explores new platforms and beta tooling.
Represent the team while working on project across R&D and commercial. Is internal and external expert to-go-to in how to drive advanced Computer Science and Engineering skills and techniques.
Influences and maintains relationships with partner organizations in support of data analysis, modelling and deployment.

COMPETENCES, EDUCATIONAL AND SKILLS

Required:

Bachelor Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
5+ years’ experience or relevant project / coursework
Ability to write and speak in the English languages
Excellent oral and written communications skills, business acumen and excels in problem solving and analytical skills
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies to affect change across business units.
Ability to manipulate voluminous data with different degree of structuring across disparate sources to build and communicate actionable insights for internal or external parties.
Possesses strong personal skills to portray information.
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables.
Experience with two of the following languages: Java, Scala or Python
Experience with data formats including Parquet, ORC or AVRO
Understanding of Web Services as well as JSON formats
Working knowledge of SQL and Relational Databases
Experience with Multiple NoSQL datastores (Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4J, …)
Experience using a “Data Lake” environment.
Experience using Spark (Scala or PySpark)
Architectural understanding of Horizontally Scalable solutions

Preferred:

Additional Languages: Chef, R, Javascript
Understanding of AWS (S3, EC2, Redshift, EMR, Athena)
Experience with a Rapid UI tools: EX: Tableau
Experience with any of the following Frameworks: Spring, Django, R Shiny, Tensorflow, MXNet
Understanding or Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning
Experience in a scientific environment.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Access to transportation to attend meetings
Ability to fly to meetings regionally and globally, up to 10% of the working time during projects phases

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
56,Manufacturing Engineer/CNC Programmer,$36k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title:
Manufacturing Engineer
Date:
8/12/2020
New/Revised:
Supersedes:
Job Code:
FLSA Exemption:
Exempt
Reports To:
Manager, Technical Operations & Continuous Improvement
Grade:

Role Summary:
The Manufacturing Engineer is an essential position on the plant operations team. This position has responsibilities for leading and supporting plantwide continuous improvement activities, quality, and problem-solving processes. The Manufacturing Engineer must also ensure equipment and tooling are developed and maintained per engineering and customer specifications. Finally, this position also must create and update routings through time studies to support the plant master production schedule.
Key Accountabilities:
Identify, lead, manage, and contribute to projects which may include design, development, rebuilding, cost savings, and continuous improvements.
Lead the improvement of tooling, equipment designs, and machine shop output as measured by takt time or productivity.
Directs and coordinates fabrication and assembly activities to ensure quality products and systems conform to engineering design and customer specifications.
Act as a technical resource and subject matter expert for manufacturing departments.
Program CNC lathes and mills and coordinate corresponding maintenance of process equipment.
Adjust programs to eliminate errors and retest programs to check that problems have been solved.
Analyze job orders, drawings, blueprints, specifications, and design data in order to calculate dimensions, tool selection, machine speeds, and feed rates.
Determine reference points, machine cutting paths, hole locations, and compute angular and linear dimensions, radii, and curvatures.
Observe machines on trial runs or conduct computer simulations to ensure that programs and machinery will function properly and that products meet required specifications.
Support company capital plans through the design and development of machines, fixtures, and tooling.
Manage inventory on items stored in tool crib and order items not included on automatic replenishment system.
Establish and maintain routings through time studies to support the production schedule.

Competencies:
Ability to calculate figures and amounts such as discounts, interest, commissions, proportions, percentages, area, circumference, and volume. Ability to apply concepts in algebra, geometry, trigonometry, physics, hydraulics and pneumatics.
Ability to apply common-sense understanding to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or diagram form. Ability to deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situations.
Drive to support a continuous improvement culture within the plant operations.
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively before customers or employees of organization.

Success Measures:
Maintains a collaborative, team relationship with colleagues in order to effectively contribute to the groups achievement of KPI goals while promoting a positive work environment.
Demonstrates a friendly, responsive, service-minded attitude to all internal and external customers.
Demonstrates a willingness to accept change and new approaches, including additional responsibilities.
Sets work plans and considers priorities for completing assignments in order to meet deadlines.
Maintains compliance with all company, state, and federal regulations.

Qualifications:
BS in Industrial, Manufacturing, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering and 3-5 years of relevant work experience. CNC programming or tool and die experience is also required. Any machine tool apprenticeship or development training is a plus.

Special Position Requirements:
Travel may be required within Columbus McKinnon Corps domestic footprint

Travel Percentage <20>

Work Requirements:
While performing the duties of this job, this employee is regularly required to use hands to feel objects, tools, or controls while talking and listening. This position will regularly require a personal computer using keyboard and mouse. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; reach with hands and arms.

The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.

Columbus McKinnon Corporation promotes a diverse and inclusive workforce and is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate against employees or applicants for employment on the basis of race, color, national origin, ancestry, age, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military or veteran status, marital status, or any other Federal or State legally-protected classes. We also value the safety of all associates and work hard to maintain a Drug Free Workplace.",3.1,"Columbus McKinnon
3.1","Wadesboro, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1887,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
57,Engineer with Link-16/Data Links,$65k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sabre is seeking an Engineer with Link-16 and Data Links experience to join our team located at NAS Patuxent River, MD. We are committed to developing and empowering a high-performing workforce that is passionate about what they do and dedicated to our customers’ mission. The ideal candidate is a critical thinker who is highly versatile and excited to roll up their sleeves to tackle complex and important problems. You will work with a team on deploying and operating existing platforms and build mission-critical systems to support the PMA 209 Air Combat Electronics team. Qualifications Required Skills: * BS in a relevant Engineering /Science field. * 6 years of experience in a relevant Engineering /Science field. * Applies engineering principles to investigate, analyze, plan, design, develop, implement, test or evaluate military weapons systems. * Reviews and prepares engineering and technical analyses, reports, change proposals, and other technical documentation. * Applies engineering experience to perform functions such as system integration configuration management, quality assurance testing, or acquisition and resource management. * Analyzes, designs, develops, implements, tests or evaluates software, components, or system related to engineering or functional requirements of military weapons systems associated support systems, or management information systems. U.S. Citizenship required. Candidate must have an active DOD Top Secret Clearance. Candidates will be required to pass a background check for this position. Desired Skills: * Experience Integrating, planning, coordinating, and facilitating design, development, and implementation of aircraft data networks. * Knowledge of the implementation of Link-16 data networks, associated aircraft component hardware and software, and understanding data interoperability between network users. * Understanding and awareness of other viable aircraft data networks, to include Internet Protocol (IP) based systems, and their associated capabilities, limitations, or vulnerabilities. * Analyzes designs, develops, implements, tests, or evaluates software, components, or systems related to functional requirements of military data network systems, associated support systems. Overview: Sabre Systems, Inc. is a quality driven, customer focused large business providing innovative solutions in the areas of Cyber, C4ISR, Business Intelligence and Data Analytics, and Enterprise Modernization to federal and civilian customers. Our mission is to ensure our customers have the technology, services, and expertise to overcome threats, maintain superiority, and quickly adapt to emerging obstacles. At Sabre, we're more than just a job - we're a team - and we care for and nurture our employees like family. If you want to be a part of creating and implementing enduring solutions that transform mission challenges into mission success – join *#TeamSabre*! Sabre provides an excellent benefits package, which includes healthcare, paid days off, tuition reimbursement, and a 401K plan. We respect the unique perspectives that a diverse workforce of minorities, women, individuals with disabilities, and protected veterans brings not only to our company, but also to our customers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. EOE Minorities/Females/Disability/Veterans; VEVRAA Federal Contractor Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Disability insurance * Employee assistance program * Flexible spending account * Health insurance * Paid time off * Professional development assistance * Referral program * Retirement plan * Tuition reimbursement * Vision insurance Education: * Bachelor's (Required) Security Clearance Required: * Top Secret (Required) Work Remotely: * No",4.8,"Sabre Systems
4.8","Patuxent River, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
58,Network Engineer w/Secret Clearance,-1,"Oneida Technical Solutions, LLC (OTS) has a rich history of providing IT support and associated services in highly complex, highly regulated, highly secure environments, including the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), law enforcement, health care, retail, and the casino gaming industry. OTS is a wholly owned subsidiary of Oneida Nation Enterprises, and is the parent company of Croop-LaFrance (CLF), an experienced federal contracting firm.

We have a current opportunity to join our existing team at Ft. Bragg at Pope Air Field. We are seeking a Network Engineer with prior experience in a DOD environment with a current Secret Clearance.

Position Responsibilities:

Provide organizational support to enable the effective and efficient transfer of data through physical and wireless transmission. Proficient with all forms of communications wire and cable, wireless technologies, and network layer devices.

Drafts, manages, distributes information, and maintains records concerning network outages, planned and unplanned.

Draft and update network diagrams and visual representations for both logical and physical aspects of the high/low networks through the use of such tools as Microsoft Visio.

Proficiently assists in the management of routers, switches and other network layer devices  Has a working knowledge Cisco operating system.

Has a working knowledge of scripting and able to author and execute as required.

Provides for the installation, maintenance, troubleshooting and accountability of Generation-II (GEN-II) or newly acquired wireless systems when necessary.

Develops wireless network coverage maps through use of such tools as Flying Squirrel or other authorized mapping programs.

Basic experience with fiber optic communications.

Capable of testing the validity of communication links, to include fiber optic cables, network drops, etc. and provide expertise on remediating failed connections.

Recommends improvements to wireless network, and availability and implements as directed.

Provides management of Tactical Local Area Network Encryption (TACLANE) or other network encryption devices to include the maintenance, programing, and keying as required.

Provides technical support for Video Teleconference Equipment to include products from Tandberg, Polycom or others on hand or acquired.

Management of Internet Protocol (IP) address book and use of IP addresses within network.

Provides assistance with VoIP / VoIP SIP as needed.

Troubleshoot network outages, provides technical feedback and expertise to remediate conflicts.

Assists with the Enclave Non-classified Internet Protocol Router Network Firewall and Automated Security Incident Management Sustainment (ENFAAS) program.

Requirements:

Must possess IAT II (Security+) DoD 8570 certification.

Industry certifications (Cisco, Microsoft, etc.) preferred.

Must be proficient in Microsoft Visio or similar drawing and mapping software.

Must possess a minimum SECRET security clearance.

Remarks: This job description is intended to be illustrative of the position's duties and should not be construed to be an exhaustive statement of the essential functions of the job.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $37.00 - $45.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Location:
Fayetteville, NC 28301 (Required)
License:
IAT-Level II (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.oneidatechnicalsolutions.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Oneida Techical Solutions,"Fayetteville, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
59,Sr RF Systems/Hardware Field Engineer I,-1,"RISCSI provides Operations and Maintenance support for the Intelligence Community

Job Description:
Raytheon Technologies currently has an opportunity for a qualified and experienced Senior RF Systems/Hardware Field Engineer to provide engineering analysis, baseline management, operations and maintenance, system enhancement, and integration support. This position will be responsible for ensuring successful operation, maintenance, and sustainment of the RF hardware associated with a complex high priority operational communications system. Responsibilities also include establishing requirements for new software and system hardware enhancements, supporting efforts for new capabilities, and development and refinement of operational/engineering processes and procedures.

The RF Systems/Hardware Field Engineer will be expected to have the technical skills to troubleshoot, document, and resolving system outages and other issues that may be encountered during operation of the system. This includes the collection of diagnostic data, accurately documenting problems in logging and discrepancy reporting tools, restoring system operation, development of workarounds, and other activities necessary for recovery of the system. The RF Systems/Hardware Field Engineer will provide support to include store, retrieve, and manipulate data for analysis and troubleshooting of system capabilities and requirements; utilize analytic devices such as oscilloscopes and logic analyzers for troubleshooting; monitor functioning of equipment and make necessary modifications to ensure the system operates in conformance with specifications.

Required Skills:
Prior experience supporting Operations and Maintenance (O&M) and RF ground systems engineering activities for a satellite communications system
Proficient use of Spectrum Analyzers, Network Analyzers, Signal Generators, Oscilloscopes
Experience with RF systems engineering developing and maintaining schematics, analysis, block diagrams, system Bill of Materials (BOMs), and design review packages
Must be able to provide occasional after hour call-in support
Must be able to support occasional travel (both CONUS and OCONUS) to support emergency repair trips with little or no advanced notice
Highly articulate with strong written and verbal communications skills.
Support design performance & cost trade-off studies for proposed engineering changes
Must be able to work at heights and successfully complete Safety At Heights training/certification.
Desired Skills:
Experience working with multiple vendors for the timely repair and tracking of critical operational hardware
Experience upgrading hardware supported by Windows and Linux based systems
Required Education:


Bachelor degree in a related discipline with 4 years relevant experience; 12 years of on the job (military or other) experience can be considered in lieu of a formal degree.

Current TS/SCI w/ CI Poly is required

#Space2020

167546

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Aurora, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
60,Software Engineer TACNET,$51k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"ManTech is seeking a top talent Software Engineer. You will be part of an integrated technical team providing Post Deployment Software Support (PDSS) and Post Production Software Support (PPSS) for Army and Joint tactical communications systems. Working in our DevOps environment, you will have the opportunity to merge legacy systems and processes with current technology to provide premier support for the Army’s Tactical Network users. *As a Software Engineer on the TACNET program you will: * • Provide the essential software support for the Tactical network components including the configuration of the hardware devices and virtual machines, testing new software and designing the structure of the network. • Determine operational feasibility by evaluating analysis, problem definition, requirements, and proposed solution • Document and demonstrate solutions by developing software code and supporting documentation with a focus on performance tuning, improvement, usability, and automation • Solve IT engineering problems or managing the solution of the engineer problems in the functional area assigned. • Integrate software with existing systems • Test the Windows and Unix operating system software, networking software and computer hardware. • Provide support in resolving system / network issues with other teams. • Ensure long-term requirements of systems operations and administration are included in the overall information systems planning of the organization. • Handle the installation, maintenance, configuration, and integrity of computer software. • Implement operating system enhancements that will improve the reliability and performance of the system. • Administer, operate, manage, establish, configure, optimize, and monitor enterprise level applications and tools for monitoring management. • Administer network monitoring capabilities using government-provided monitoring tools (Orion Solarwinds, Microsoft SCOM, NetIQ AppManager) on large classified and unclassified network enterprises. • Assist the government with planning, setup, deployment, upgrade, maintenance and migration of network monitoring capabilities on large network enterprises. • Provide technical expertise in troubleshooting alerts/incidents, resolving issues based on mission priorities and working with PMOs / vendors to obtain support as required. • Support the remediation of network vulnerabilities. *Qualifications: * *• Must be a U.S. Citizen with an Interim or Active Secret Security Clearance.* • Requires a Bachelor's Degree or equivalent in related field and 7 to 9 years of relevant work experience. • Requires a Security + CE certification. • Must have knowledge of TCP/IP, information security / authorization profiles, or system administration of Unix and Windows systems. • Experience with Windows server systems administration, database management, general networking knowledge, basic understanding of Microsoft SQL and ability to troubleshoot / analyze data using information from multiple sources are required. • Requires solid technical, communications and collaboration skills. • Requires solid understanding of large-scale data center and network architectures, monitoring and fault management. *Preferred: * • Operational knowledge of the software development lifecycle. • Experience in writing and performing software test plans / procedures. • Scripting or coding experience – PowerShell preferred. • Operational knowledge of Virtual Machine environments. • Experience with automated testing applications. • Strong technical documentation skills. • Good communication and time management. • Experience with military tactical communications systems is a plus. • Linux and / or Microsoft computing environment knowledge / expertise. Job Type: Full-time Experience: * Software Development Life Cycle: 1 year (Preferred) * Post Deployment Software Support (PDSS): 1 year (Preferred) * DevOps: 1 year (Preferred) License: * CompTIA Security+ (Preferred) Security Clearance Required: * Secret (Required) Work Location: * One location Benefits: * Health insurance * Dental insurance * Vision insurance * Signing bonus * Paid time off * Flexible schedule * Relocation assistance * Professional development assistance * Tuition reimbursement * Other This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is: * Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous * People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects * Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture * Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity This Company Describes Its Culture as: * Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking * Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes * People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused * Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative This Job Is: * A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply * Open to applicants under 18 years old, provided it is legally allowed for the job and location Schedule: * Monday to Friday Benefit Conditions: * Waiting period may apply * Only full-time employees eligible Work Remotely: * No",4.2,"ManTech International Corporation
4.2","Aberdeen, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
61,ETL Developer,$43k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT MEDIACOM DATA WAREHOUSE:

The Mediacom Data Warehouse (DW) is looking for an enthusiastic individual interested in joining a growing team of professionals as it undertakes a complete refresh of its current DW environment. This is a unique opportunity to join a greenfield migration project at the ground level. The environment refresh includes Active Batch Automation and Scheduling, Informatica Data Integration tool, and Oracle Exadata running the latest 12c database. Mediacom’s Data Analytics tools of choice include Oracle OBIEE and Tableau. The right person for this position will be able to work and thrive in a truly collaborative environment, be an eager learner, self-motivated and not afraid to work in partnership in all areas of the DW as needed.

GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES

The Data Warehouse ETL Developer is responsible for application development tasks and assignments related to data integration as well as preparation of detailed specifications, diagrams and other programming structures related to ETL processes. This individual will design, code, test, debug and document moderately complex programs and applications in addition to performing application maintenance tasks.

Responsible for the design, development, documentation of ETL processes.
Work in a complex environment which includes Database, Job Scheduling/Automation/Performance Tools.
Participate in ETL Design sessions with the team.
Production support of new or changing mappings and workflows and produce technical specifications.
Responsible for the analysis, data profiling, development, and integration of disparate systems throughout all phases of the project life cycle.
Work as part of a team delivering high quality and efficient integration solutions.
Assist in ongoing development of technical best practices for data movement, data quality, data cleansing and other ETL related activities.
Implement best practices and tune for optimization.
Complete assignments in a timely manner.
Complete any other work as assigned.

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE/SKILLS

Must have a Bachelors in Computer Science or related field
At least 2-3 years of experience in technical development
At least 2-3 years of experience with Informatica PowerCenter – Additional Experience with SSIS or Talend is a plus
At least 2-3 years of experience with Oracle Database
Possess great attention to detail while also being flexible to adapt to a dynamic environment and changing priorities.
Excellent SQL, PL/SQL and Database Skills - Python / R are a plus
Some prior use of Toad for Oracle or any similar tools a plus.
Understanding of SQL and some experience in a database environment
Familiarity with data modeling – Star/Snow-flake schemas
Experience with erwin Data Modeler software
Experience working in a corporate IT or similar environment.
Strong communication skills.
Dependability and adaptability.
Ability to work in team/collaborative setting.
Technical proficiency.

Mediacom endeavors to make mediacomcable.com/careers accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our careers website, please contact careersassistance@mediacomcc.com or dial 845-443-2408. Any inquiries regarding employment application status, resume submittal, open positions and any other general inquiries will not receive a response.",3.4,"Mediacom Communications Corporation
3.4","Blooming Grove, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
62,Principal Cloud Network Engineer,-1,"Abacus Insights is a mission-driven, start-up technology company that is focused on improving health outcomes, lowering the cost of healthcare, and delivering a more seamless healthcare experience. At our core, we are passionate about advancing healthcare and improving people's lives through technology.

Abacus Insights provides a flexible, efficient, and secure platform that organizes and exchanges data from various sources and formats, allowing healthcare companies to uncover differentiated insights that address their customers' needs. Our employees know that they play an active role in keeping our customers data safe and are responsible for ensuring that our comprehensive policies and practices are met.

With our deep expertise in cloud-enabled technologies and knowledge of the healthcare industry, we have built an innovative data integration and management platform that allows healthcare payers access to data that has been historically siloed and inaccessible. Through our platform, these health insurance payers can ingest and manage all the data they need to transform their business by supporting their analytical, operational, and financial needs.

Through this mission and passion to aid people and population health, we have built a highly successful SaaS business that is heavily funded (since our founding in 2017 we have over 53 million) by leading VC firms who have deep expertise in the healthcare and technology industries. At Abacus, we are solving problems of massive scale and complexity in an industry that is not only ripe for disruption but requires innovation. We see massive growth in our future and would love for you to be a part of it!

Our Engineering team is looking to bring on an experienced Network Engineer. If you are interested in building and delivering a cloud-based, highly secured, and highly resilient networking infrastructure, this is the position for you. You will be exposed to every area of our platform as well as our corporate networking infrastructure, but even more so, help drive the evolution of it including automation, monitoring, and ongoing support of it. We believe heavily in designing infrastructure with scalability, automation, and security at the forefront.

Responsibilities:
Management, monitoring, and optimization of corporate infrastructure including office firewalls and routers as well as virtual firewall infrastructure hosted in Azure
Management, monitoring, and optimization of production infrastructure within AWS including native AWS services such as VPC, Transit Gateway, and EC2-related networking configurations as well as enterprise-grade virtual firewall infrastructure (Palo Alto)
Respond to network connectivity issues and resolve any wireless communication or client VPC issues
Develop expertise in cloud-native networking and cloud-based virtual firewall platforms such as Palo Alto VM-series firewalls to enhance the resiliency and scalability of the current infrastructure
Work with the engineering team to enhance automation that can be used within the CI/CD pipeline to enhance deployment efficiency for solutions using a centralized network fabric
Consult on network architecture to transmit and secure sensitive healthcare data among multiple customers for multiple projects within a multi-tenant environment
Build, manage, and monitor site-to-site VPN tunnels between Abacus and its customers
Mentor and work collaboratively with other team members both more and less experienced in networking and firewalling
Work closely with the Abacus Security team to ensure the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of sensitive customer data
What you bring to the Abacus Team:
5+ years of Network Engineering Experience
In-depth networking knowledge, notably core AWS networking services and basic routing protocols
Experience with firewall management including in-depth firewall management, VPN, and firewall-based security tools such as IPS, anti-malware, and threat detection
Experience with DNS most notable AWS Route 53 and Azure DNS
Experience working with infrastructure automation platforms such as Terraform or Cloudformation
Experience monitoring network infrastructure to identify and solve problems before they arise.
Experience performing root cause analysis to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement of the infrastructure and other tools
Strong troubleshooting skills to identify network latency or configuration issues.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.
Equal Opportunity Employer:
As a mission-led technology company that is helping to drive better healthcare outcomes, Abacus Insights believes that the best innovation and value we can bring to our customers comes from diverse ideas, thoughts, experiences, and perspectives. We are dedicated to building diverse teams, and as such provide equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment. As well as prohibit discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.",5.0,"Abacus Insights
5.0","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,Software Engineer (Scala),$57k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rewards Network (RN) is seeking a Software Engineer to work with a team of peers to build out a new platform from the ground up. As a member of the team, you will work closely with other software engineers, BAs, and stakeholders to design and develop a new rewards fast data platform and all the supporting applications. We are looking for a passionate problem solver that is highly focused, agile, and who thrives in a fast-paced, collaborative and team-centric environment using the latest technologies.
What technologies does a Software Engineer work with?
Underlying architecture: Kubernetes, AWS Fargate/ECS, Docker, Immutable infrastructure
Technologies: Scala, Cats, FS2, Kafka, Postgres SQL, Elastic Search, Kibana, AWS S3
Tools: Intellij, Gitlab (VCS/CI), Team City, Postman, Slack, Jira
What are you looking for?
Experience in development using Scala or other functional languages.
Working knowledge in an Agile delivery team.
Understanding of core functional and OOP programming principles.
Experience with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery.
A commitment to developing solid, tested, high performing valuable software.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to collaborate with a wide variety of people with varying technical skill sets and business knowledge.
Excellent problem solving and troubleshooting skills.
What are some of the perks of being part of a unique organization like Rewards Network?
Exposure to some of the most modern and innovative technologies.
Being able to work alongside other talented individuals in a collaborative and continuous learning environment.
The ability to apply technology to strategically solve business challenges and see your ideas come to life.
Being part of a collaborative environment with a team of peers to architect, design and implement our new platform and supporting applications in the latest technologies.
Actively participating in and helping evolve all adopted Agile/Lean/Kanban practices such as: TDD (Test Driven Development), BDD (Behavior Driven Development), stand-ups, retrospectives, continuous delivery, and knowledge sharing across team members.
Collaboration with BAs and Quality Assurance engineers in test case construction, issue identification, as well as remediation and automation.
Continuously improving, refining, and refactoring software.

Must Haves
BS in Computer Science, (or equivalent experience)
2+ years of general development experience
Experience on an Agile delivery team
Understand, articulate, and conform to core functional and OOP programming principles.
Experience working with and designing RESTful microservice architectures
Experience with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery using Git, Team City or similar tools
A commitment to developing solid, tested, high performing valuable software
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to collaborate with a wide variety of people with varying technical skill sets and business knowledge
Excellent problem solving and troubleshooting skills. Must be able to quickly assess problems and determine proper steps to resolution.
#LI-BM1

We connect diners to fantastic restaurant experiences by offering unique card-linked offers thanks to our ability to leverage advanced technology and powerful data analytics, while simultaneously providing value to our strategic partners' overall loyalty programs.

We work alongside our restaurant partners every day, sharing in the ebbs and flows of their business while helping them achieve their dreams. We provide marketing and financing that work with their business and are truly pay-for-performance. We help them increase revenue, traffic, and customer engagement. Importantly, our services do not require the merchant to discount or give away their products.

Even more, we enhance our partners' loyalty programs by offering a turn-key, scalable dining rewards program that is right for their business model and leverages their unique brand to help increase the value proposition for their customers.

Finally, we connect our millions of members to our participating restaurants, allowing them to earn the rewards they desire when dining out.

Rewards Network is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). We encourage and strongly support workplace diversity.",3.8,"Rewards Network
3.8","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
64,Data Engineer,-1,"*Senior Data Engineer*
*Type: *Full time / Direct Hire
*Location: *Remote until at least Jan 20201, but will probably be available long term. Main office is in *Wilmington, NC*.
*Salary: * $70-$80k/yr
*Senior Data Engineer Responsibilities: *

* Testing programs or databases, correcting errors and making necessary modifications

* Planning, coordinating and implementing security measures (including regular audits) to safeguard information in databases and computer files against accidental or unauthorized damage, modification or disclosure

* Assisting with automating ETL processes, data mining and data management

* Developing reference and workflow documents for documentation purposes

*Senior Data Engineer Qualifications: *

* Bachelor’s degree or Associates Degree with certifications

* 6+ years experience in database management or database reporting-related field

* Strong knowledge in SQL Server, including SSIS

* Strong knowledge of TFS (Team Foundation Server), Source Control, and Visual Studio

* Experience with .Net/C# or other object oriented programming languages preferred

* Experience in an Agile Scrum environment preferred

* Preferred certifications include MTA, MCSA, MCSE, ITIL v3, Note: applicable certification(s) may be substituted to equivalent degree requirements.


*Senior Data Engineer Benefits Include: *

* Flexible Work Schedules

* Health Insurance - no premium for employee coverage

* Flexible Spending Accounts

* Paid vacation and sick leave, plus 10 paid holidays

* Retirement pension, plus 401k with 3% employer match

* Student Loan Forgiveness - Qualifying Employer

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Work Location:
* One location

Work Remotely:
* Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Perspective Talent LLC
5.0","Charlotte, NC",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
65,Senior Data Architect and Engineer,-1,"Senior Data Architect and Engineer

New York, New York

$150,000-$170,000 base salary + competitive benefits

THE COMPANY

This health-tech SaaS platform leader is looking to bring in a Senior Data Architect and Engineer with a high proficiency and passion in Python and AWS to join their NYC engineering team to bring in new data sources and create pipelines!

Are you someone who enjoys working on high business impact real world-focused projects? Are you looking to join an immensely successful and cross collaborative environment in the heart of NYC?

If so, check out the job qualifications below to see if you're a fit!

THE ROLE

As the Senior Data Architect and Engineer for this business, you will have the opportunity to pave the path for your business to delve into further ML projects with current and new clientele by holding the following key responsibilities:

Designing data architecture
Building data pipelines to gather and organize data from a variety of internal and external sources
Interact closely with data scientists to understand requirements
Performing ETL functions on incoming data - cleanse, format, structure, etc.
Migrate data from on prem sources to AWS cloud
Primary tech stack: Python, SQL, AWS

YOUR SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE

You have senior level proficiency in data engineering
You have a high level of competency and commercial experience in Python and the AWS stack
You have commercial experience working on relational and non-relational databases
You have designed and built data pipelines in a professional setting
You have prior commercial experience collaborating with your team, ideally with ML and data science professionals
You come from a Software Engineering background

THE BENEFITS

$150,000-$170,000 base salary
Varied bonus structure based on experience level
Health benefits coverage
401 K
Competitive PTO and sick time off benefits

HOW TO APPLY

Please register your interest by sending your résumé to Kavya Kannan via the Apply link on this page.

KEYWORDS

Big Data, Data Engineering, Data Pipeline, Data Architecture, Design, Python, SQL, AWS, Real Time, Streaming, Batch Processing, ETL, ELT, Data Formatting, Data Structure, Data Modeling, Data Governance, Data Cleansing",4.1,"Harnham
4.1","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
66,Senior Building Maintenance Engineer - International Position,-1,"True North Equities is looking for an International Building Maintenance Engineer. *You must be willing to relocate (with or without family) to Middle East, North Africa, SE Asia (non-war Zone).* must have working knowledge of facilities management, asset life cycles, asset management and preventative maintenance procedures. A strong working knowledge of CMMS offerings and building inspection processes is desired. Candidate must possess the ability and desire to manage a small team of dedicated professionals in CMMS sales opportunities, implementations and/or building inspections. A background in Telecommunications is a plus. Strong multinational communication and presentation skills are required.

Requirements:
B.S in Engineering discipline, Master level or 10 plus years industry experience - Maintenance,
Telecommunications, Energy/Power preferred.
Multi-lingual: English & Arabic.
Willing to relocate (with family) to Middle East, North Africa, SE Asia (non-war Zone).
Willing to travel.
CMMS Experience a definite plus
Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of predictive, preventive, corrective and routine maintenance of facilities and
associated industries.
Knowledge of mechanical, electrical, plumbing, fire, HVAC, security, fire systems, and asset
interactions.
Proficient in the sale implementation, demonstration, and use of CMMS software systems and how
they can improve the efficiency of asset management and building maintenance.
Deep knowledge of asset tracking, work order scheduling, inventory control and energy management.
Ability to manage, motivate and lead a small team of dedicated multinational professionals.
Must possess business development and client management skills to include identify, acquiring and managing both SMB clients and key partners.
Must have excellent writing skills and a background in responding to RFP/RFQ’s.
Must be willing to be hands-on when necessary.
Must be capable of working independently and multi-tasking.
Experience in hotels, hospitals and data centers is desirable.
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Building Maintenance: 1 year (Preferred)
Language:
Arabic (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Required travel:
50% (Preferred)",4.3,"True North Equities
4.3","Downers Grove, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
67,Senior Systems Engineer - OSI PI & Data Systems Lead,$63k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"About NECI

NECI, an Emerson Impact Partner, is the leading Digital Automation solutions provider transforming manufacturing, lab operations, process development and process control across a range of process industries in New England. NECI relentlessly seeks to drive the outcomes that change the game for our clients and is seeking team members to join in our mission.

The Emerging Life Science team is part of the solutions group at NECI. The solutions groups are a cross functional organization responsible for fulfilling all aspects of customer obligations for their designated portfolio. These responsibilities include product development, innovation, engineering, support, and sales.

The Role

We are currently looking for a Senior Systems Engineer within the solution group to participate in all technical aspects the group is responsible for, including product development, project engineering, or site support. This role will typically provide project leadership as either an overall lead for smaller projects or as an area lead for larger projects.

Engineers in the Emerging Life Science team will receive a wide level of exposure to all aspects of the modern automated life science industry as well as be on the cutting edge of the industry working in partnership with startups and big biotech alike developing the newest technologies.

How Youll Be Successful
Passion for technology
Experience working in life science R&D
Understanding of Computer Networks
Project Delivery Experience
What Youll Do
Responsibilities will cover all technologies/platforms within the portfolio including DeltaV, Syncade, OSI PI, Matlab, SQL, servers, virtualization, networking, reporting, sensors, transmitters, and valves.
Leads others to execute a multi-discipline scope from concept through delivery (concept, proposal, project, close-out) for projects of any size
Team subject matter expert for OSI PI and data systems activities
Primary point of contact between the ELS team and the NECI Data Integration Team
Perform all activities with no supervision
Responsible for customer facing technical communications
Typical author for functional specifications / high level design
Identifies project risks and develops mitigation strategy
Works with Project Management to ensure project budget, schedule and quality
Networked within industry. Speaks at industry events.
May be asked to assist in racking servers and various other tasks associated with system deployment and setup
Travel within the Greater Boston area, minor additional travel within US or abroad
What Youll Bring
Engineering or Computer Science Degree with 6-10 years of industry experience
Experience with multiple of the relevant technologies / systems listed below:
Primary
OSI PI
DeltaV
Syncade
VMWare
Secondary
EMC / Dell / Cisco
Matlab
SQL / SSRS
LIMS (various)
Reporting Systems
C# / .NET
Rosemount
Micromotion
Related
PLCs (various)
SAP
General Knowledge Areas:

MES Systems, Process Control, Process Data Systems, Virtualization, Process Sensors & Transmitters (temperature, pH, DO, Weight), Process Control Devices (Mass Flow Controllers, Peristaltic Pumps), Process Engineering (bioreactor, chromatography)

Heres What Youll Get
Highly competitive Medical and Dental Insurance
Flexible Spending Accounts for medical expenses and dependent care expenses
3 Weeks of Vacation + Holiday's
401(k)
Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP)
Employee Referral Bonus
Professional Development Reimbursement
NECI paid Basic Life & Short-Term, Long-Term Disability Insurance
Voluntary Benefits - Accident, Term Life, Whole Life Insurance
Flu Shot Clinic & First Aid/AED/CPR Classes
Must be currently authorized to work in the United States.

Policy on Third-Party Unsolicited Resume Submissions: Please note that any third-party unsolicited resume submissions will immediately become the property of NECI. NECI will not pay any fee to a submitting employment agency, person, or entity unless a signed agreement is established.

Please Note: NECI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.2,"NECI
4.2","Mansfield, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
68,"Senior Software Engineer, Cloud Data Collection",$104k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Software Engineer - Data Collection

As a Senior Software Engineer working on our Data Collection team, you will be a hands-on engineer architecting, designing, and implementing a highly scalable data ingestion pipeline that processes hundreds of terabytes of data a day making petabytes of data available for search and forensic analysis in a fully cloud-native environment.

You will be helping us solve complex challenges in low-latency and zero data-loss scenarios that require demonstrated expertise in distributed systems, fault-tolerance, and multi-tenancy. This role demands technical excellence from design through implementation, and beyond into production operations.

What you will be doing:
Design and implement collection system that is extremely high-volume, fault-tolerant, scalable backend systems that process and manage petabytes of customer data.
Analyze and improve on the congestion control algorithms designed to elastically manage spikes in customer data.
Analyze and improve the efficiency, scalability, and reliability of our backend systems.
Write robust code; demonstrate its robustness through automated tests.
Work as a member of a team, helping the team respond quickly and effectively to business needs.
What we need from you:
BS in Computer Sciences or a related discipline (MSc, or PhD is a plus).
Minimum of 5+ years of experience deploying production level code, with a proven track record of ownership and delivery.
Experience developing scalable distributed data processing solutions
Experience in multi-threaded programming
Experience in running large scalable distributed services following a microservice architecture
Hands-on object-oriented programming experience (e.g., Java, Scala)
Interest in developing elegant frameworks for other developers
Excellent verbal and written communication
____________________________________

About Us: https://app.box.com/v/SLGeneralDossier

· What we do:
We are a cloud-native SaaS machine data analytics platform, solving complex monitoring problems for DevOps, SecOps and ITOps teams. Customers love our product because it allows them to easily monitor and optimize their mission critical, large scale applications.

· Massive Scale:
Our microservices architecture in AWS ingests hundreds of terabytes daily across many geographic regions. Millions of queries a day analyze hundreds of petabytes of data.

· Mission:
Democratize machine data analytics through the Sumo Logic platform, bringing real-time data insights securely through the cloud.",3.3,"Sumo Logic
3.3","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
69,Azure Data Architect,$95k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"Quisitive is a premier Microsoft solutions provider that helps enterprise organizations move, operate and innovate in the Microsoft cloud: Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics and Microsoft O365 as well as provide proprietary Software as a Service (""SaaS"") solutions such as CRG emPerform(TM), LedgerPay and business solutions from other technology partners that complement the Microsoft platform. With a legacy of deep technical and business expertise, Quisitive is empowering the enterprise to navigate the ever-changing technology climate their business relies upon. Quisitive helps customers harness the power of the Microsoft cloud and innovative technologies such as, artificial intelligence, machine learning, the Internet of Things (IoT) and blockchain through customized solutions.

Quisitive is uniquely comprised of experienced Microsoft partner leaders and technologists who share a deep understanding of market needs and the appropriate application of Microsoft cloud technology. The company's expertise and focus are on helping industries such as financial services, manufacturing, oil and gas, and retail, drive innovation using Microsoft cloud-based technologies.

Quisitive serves clients globally with locations in Austin, TX; Dallas, TX; Denver, CO; Los Altos, CA; Minneapolis, MN; Ottawa, ON; Toronto, ON, and Washington, DC. For more information, visit http://www.Quisitive.com and follow @BeQuisitive. TSXV: QUIS. Preference will be given to candidates in one of our key areas: Dallas, Austin, Houston, Denver, Los Altos, or Minneapolis.

As an Azure Data Architect at Quisitive, you will act as a trusted advisor for our clients by designing and building data and analytics architectures to enable better business outcomes for these companies. You will work across client stakeholders to determine solution requirements and rationalize architecture decisions. During implementation, you will collect, aggregate and analyze structure/unstructured data from multiple internal and external sources and present patterns, insights and trends to decision makers. Your goal is to support the use of data-driven insights to help our clients achieve business outcomes and objectives.

Day-to-day, you will:
Translate business requirements to technical solutions leveraging strong business acumen.
Analyze current business practices, processes, and procedures as well as identify future business opportunities for leveraging Microsoft Azure Data & Analytics PaaS Services.
Support the planning and implementation of data design services, providing sizing and configuration assistance and performing needs assessments.
Delivery of architectures for transformations and modernizations of enterprise data solutions using Azure cloud data technologies.
Design and build Modern Data Pipelines and Data Streams and build Data Service APIs.
Develop and maintain data warehouse schematics, layouts, architectures and relational/non-relational databases for data access and Advanced Analytics.
Requirements:

Must Haves 4-6 years experience with the following:
Relevant professional experience in consulting.
Hands - on experience with Azure Data & Analytics PaaS Services: Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL DW, and Azure SQL.
How to expose data to end-users using Azure API Apps or any other modern visualization platform or experience.
Knowledge of Azure DataBricks, Azure Cosmos DB, and Azure Stream Analytics, Azure Event Hubs, Azure Service Bus.
Experience with Git/Azure DevOps.
Knowledge of Lambda and Kappa architecture patterns.
Knowledge of Master Data Management (MDM) and Data Quality tools and processes.
Ability to help customers engineer Azure Data Solutions based on current on-premise data centers.
Working experience with Visual Studio, PowerShell Scripting, and ARM templates. Ability to conduct data profiling, cataloging, and mapping for technical design and construction of technical data flows.
The ability to apply such methods to solve business problems using one or more Azure Data and Analytics services in combination with building data pipelines, data streams, and system integration. Strong team collaboration and experience working with remote teams.
Preferred Capabilities:

Technical and non-technical skills include:
One or more of the Microsoft Azure role based certifications (https://www.microsoft.com/en-us/learning/browse-all-certifications.aspx?certificationtype=role-based)
Demonstrated experience of turning business use cases and requirements into technical solutions.
Experience in business processing mapping of data and analytics solutions.
Ability to conduct data profiling, cataloging, and mapping for technical design and construction of technical data flows.
The ability to apply such methods to solve business problems using one or more Azure Data and Analytics services in combination with building data pipelines, data streams, and system integration.
Demonstrated experience preparing data and building data pipelines for AI Use Cases (text, voice, image, etc.…).
Designing and building Data Pipelines using streams of data.
Preferred degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Analytics, Operations Research, Economics/Econometrics, Engineering or another relevant quantitative field.
US Citizens and those authorized in the US are encouraged to apply. We are unable to offer sponsorship at this time.

No agencies or third parties.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Everyone working remotely - meetings and calls via MS Teams

Experience:
Azure data platform: 4 years (Required)
Azure architecture: 3 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.1,"Quisitive
3.1","Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
70,AWS / Elastic Engineer,-1,"Lodestone Security is seeking a motivated, talented engineer in the AWS and Elastic space. In addition to supporting the build of a brand new AWS infrastructure, this individual will also have duties related to the deployment and administration of Elastic Enterprise and other services in AWS. An ideal candidate would also be able to contribute to the support of other information security related applications and devices in our world-class digital forensics lab.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities*
This position will have responsibilities in four key areas: AWS, Elastic, forensic lab, and other technology.

_Amazon Web Services (AWS)_

Be the go-to person for new deployments, support of existing deployments, and troubleshooting of issues with both. This includes multiple clusters with high availability serving database, application, and workspace workloads. AWS hosts our MDR, MSSP, and workspace virtual desktops, supporting not only our consultants and investigators but also our SOC and business operations staff.

_Elastic / Elasticsearch_

Lodestone has partnered with Elastic on multiple fronts, implementing multiple features at multiple license levels, including machine learning and endpoint defense. This role includes the administration of all of these functions, to include automation of regular tasks like data expiration and archival.

_Forensic Lab_

In our world-class forensic lab, we have purpose-built software and hardware designed specifically for use in Digital Forensics and Incident Response investigations. Our facility in Lewisville, TX had more than 1PB of physical storage, hundreds of processing cores, and many TB of RAM in dozens of on-premise servers and other computers. This is all connected to a 40Gb switching core with a minimum of 10Gb connectivity to endpoints. Our raised-floor datacenter has dedicated 3-phase power and approximately 10 tons of dedicated cooling. This lab requires occasional maintenance and other physical actions taken in order to ensure our ability to conduct forensic investigations in an efficient and timely manner. This role will ideally include attention paid to the forensic lab, as needed.

_Other Applications_

You may be called upon to exercise other parts of your skillset, including development and automation of infrastructure-related activity. Our Business Operations and ticketing platforms, our Customer Relationship Management (CRM) software, and many other one-off applications are all part of the core infrastructure at Lodestone. We welcome your contribution on any front.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities*
· 3-5 years of AWS Administration

· 1-2 years of Elasticsearch Administration

· Familiarity with Information Security concepts

· Strong organizational and documentation ability

· 5-10 years in related Information Technology areas

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
For the remainder of 2020, Lodestone employees are primarily remote, visiting our facilities on an as-needed with strict social distancing guidelines in place. We will continue this past the end of the year if needed - employee safety is our #1 priority.

Experience:
AWS: 3 years (Required)
Elasticsearch: 1 year (Preferred)
IT: 5 years (Preferred)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
http://www.lodestonesecurity.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Lodestone Security
5.0","Lewisville, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
71,Senior Embedded Software Engineer II -R-NAV Programs - Active SECRET clearance required,-1,"Are you a dynamic and experienced embedded software engineer interested in an opportunity to work in the Los Angeles area? Then join our Raytheon Intelligence & Space team and contribute to programs that save lives and enable the freedoms we enjoy. Every day at Raytheon Intelligence & Space, our extraordinary engineers are empowered for excellence and inspired to invent in an inclusive environment.

R-NAV programs provide affordable Position, Navigation and Timing (PNT) solutions by leveraging our existing products and technologies, focusing on research and development, and expanding our strategic customer and supplier partnerships. R-NAV programs also support all elements of military Global Positioning System (GPS) technology including aircraft GPS navigation, weapon GPS/Inertial Navigation System (INS) guidance, and advanced technology programs. R-NAV programs support a variety of applications such as amphibious assault vehicles, aviation, maritime, munitions and handheld devices.

R-NAV area programs are looking for software team members of a GPS Receiver development project in support of the Governments effort in the modernization of the GPS User Segment and Airborne GPS Receivers. Responsibilities include requirements analysis, software design, coding, testing, and documentation of the product development of a next-generation GPS Receiver that is P(Y)-code, M-code, and C/A-code (YMCA) capable as well as having Anti-spoof capability.

A qualified candidate for R-NAV Programs would possess proficiency with C/C++, real time embedded programming and signal processing. The candidate must be a self-starter, have the ability to work in a self-guided manner, and the ability to develop personal workload to meet assigned deadlines. The candidate should have experience successfully working in a collaborative environment. The candidate will be involved with the planning, conducting and coordination of software designs, software architecture, development, test, and documentation.

Required Skills:
Minimum 6+ years of related technical individual contributor experience in large team software engineering development with C/C++ programming or similar languages
Experience in Green Hills Integrity, WindRiver VxWorks, or related Real-time Operating Systems and board support packages (BSP)
Experience working with PPC or ARM processors
Experience in real-time development and architecture, communications systems, or signal processing
Understanding of software development best practices and processes
Experience with software test activities and planning
Strong written/oral communication and interpersonal skills
Applies and/or develops highly advanced technologies and concepts exhibiting an exceptional degree of ingenuity, creativity and resourcefulness in the architecture, design and concepts consistent with systems requirement and interface designs
U.S. Citizenship Status is required as this position needs an Active U.S. Security Clearance as of Day One of employment.
Desired Skills:
Experience with GPS and/or Radar test and Integration
Experience with DO-178B or DO-178C safety certification process
Working knowledge of MIL-STD-1553, IS-GPS-153 Serial Interface protocol, signal selection, acquisition and tracking, Position, Velocity, and Time (PVT) calculation, data demodulation, signal correction, jamming and spoofing or related application
Work related experience in algorithm and hardware design
Working knowledge of Microsoft Visual Studio and Matlab
Knowledge of MS Office or other presentation tools
Experience with software implementation of timing and controls
Experience with Configuration Management tools
Experience with tools such as JIRA and VectorCast
Experience with automated test tools, techniques, and practices
Experience with Agile-Scrum methodology
Required Education:
BS or STEM Degree in Engineering, Science, Mathematics, Physics, or equivalent from Accredited University.
164848

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
72,Process Control Systems Engineer,-1,"Description

We are seeking a Process Control Systems Engineer who can be the facility’s technical subject matter expert for process control systems. The desired candidate must also be passionate about mentoring and demonstrate economic thinking and problem-solving skills.

The Brewton Mill produces white top linerboard and solid bleached sulfate (SBS) paperboard. The SBS material is used to make a variety of cartons that require high-quality graphics and is a feedstock for Dixie® plate manufacturing. White top linerboard is used in production of white corrugated containers and displays.

Our culture is defined by the Market-Based Management® philosophy which guides everyday decision making and provides employees with opportunities to contribute and personally benefit from the value they create.

What You Will Do In Your Role
Work closely with mill personnel to identify opportunities and solve problems
Support of process operations through both the application of all levels of process control systems, optimization, and general troubleshooting of the processes
Support of the maintenance group in troubleshooting problems with the processes and the process control systems
Support of the project engineering group in planning and installing new process equipment and process control systems
Development of process control modifications that result in improved safety (capacity to fail to a safe state), create value, and improved efficiency through automation
Support of the mill safety program, both through personal conduct and performance of safety audits
Support of the mill OSI PI data historian and its users
Communicate findings and proposals
Assemble reports to document process status and changes.
Track metrics to ensure control systems are delivering expected results or to discover areas for improvement
Share department call responsibility
The Experience You Will Bring
Requirements:
Bachelor of Science Degree in Engineering OR Bachelor of Science Degree Pulp and Paper
Three (3) or more years of experience in Process Controls in a manufacturing or heavy industrial environment
Experience managing multiple projects simultaneously
What Will Put You Ahead
Engineering and application experience with process control systems: Honeywell TDC 3000 or Experion DCS and/or experience with Allen Bradley PLCs
Experience in supporting process control systems in a Pulp and Paper mill
Experience in installing process control systems, including construction, checkout, and startup of new systems
Experience with network technology
Experience with Advanced Process Controls such as model adaptive predictive controls
Experience with MS Office products (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Project) for use in analysis, communications, and presentations

Salary and Benefits Commensurate with Experience.
Equal Opportunity Employer.
Except where prohibited by state law, all offers of employment are conditioned upon successfully passing a drug test.

This employer uses E-Verify. Please visit the following website for additional information: www.kochcareers.com/doc/Everify.pdf

IND-GP-ENG",3.4,"Georgia-Pacific
3.4","Brewton, AL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1928,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
73,Civil Engineer/Design Technical Support Engineer,-1,"Overview


The primary objective is to provide engineering design technical support on behalf of the Department of Defense for a multi-billion dollar construction program in the Pacific.

Tasks shall include review of requests for information (RFIs), review of contract submittals, review of designs performing constructability analysis, review of design changes from the contractor (in design-build projects) and the AE of record (in design-bid-build projects), drafting minor designs to support contract changes, cost estimating, making recommendations to the Owner to expedite resolution of technical issues during construction and performing other general engineering services.

Responsibilities
Coordinate with team members to execute project scope, schedules, and budgets in conformance with the project and customer requirements.
Research codes, guidance, policies, procedures, processes, criteria and Federal laws and regulations and provide sound technical recommendations in writing.
Perform field investigations, including the review of as-builts, to determine existing conditions, document findings, and provide a report to include written summary of the observations, data collected and photographs.
Collect required data to provide recommendations, prepare documents, and/or review deliverables. This data collection is to assist with the preparation of cost estimates, schedules, reports, RFPs, SOW’s and other project documentation.
Coordinate and hold meetings, determine requirements, coordinate workflow processes, and schedule/coordinate plans of actions and milestones (POAMs).
Review technical reports, RFIs, designs, design changes for both design-build and design bid build projects, project deliverables, submittals, and cost proposals from contractors to ensure compliance with customer and RFP requirements.
Provide technical support for the review of the commissioning plan, design and construction submittals, and field inspections.
Provide technical support for the construction field activities and associated preparatory and quality control meetings.
Preparing reports, Requests for proposals, and/or scopes of work in the required format, including all applicable attachments as required.
Participating in briefings/conferences. Prepare and deliver briefs supported by necessary project documentation to project team members, base personnel, and senior management.
Providing submittals/deliverables include but are not limited to project reviews and recommendations, PowerPoint briefings, and presentations.
Qualifications
Be a graduate of an ABET accredited Civil Engineering college curriculum (four) 4-year degree minimum AND have a minimum of (ten) 10 years’ Design Management experience performing tasks identified herein.
Have their U.S. Professional Engineering Registration (P.E.).
Have completed and passed the Construction Quality Management (CQM) for Contractors course or obtain the CQM certification within 90 days after being assigned to the contract.
Must have the ability to communicate in English effectively both orally and in writing.
Must have at least one (1) year of specialized experience in performing the tasks identified here in for Capital Improvements related projects for NAVFAC or Corps of Engineers.
Have demonstrated experience in the use and application of Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, etc), Primavera, Costworks, and Success Estimator, etc. Have the ability to adapt to new software such as eCMS may also be necessary.
Be a United States citizen and be able to obtain security clearance as required.
Be capable of the physical exertion required to perform the necessary services such as long periods of standing; walking over rough, uneven or rocky surfaces; recurring bending, crouching, stooping and reaching; climbing upon ladders and other physical activity common to the performance of such duties.
MBP is an EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability Employer.",4.5,"MBP
4.5","Dededo, GU",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
74,"Engineer, Detector",$51k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION SUMMARY:

Under limited supervision performs germanium and silicon device research & development, design, physical layout, testing, and evaluation of processes, electronics, and electro-mechanical devices and systems comprising semiconductor manufacturing systems, vacuum systems, cryogenic systems, and others. Performs product development activities, including prototyping, implementation of customer specifications, and documentation requirements. Conducts engineering studies and may assign work
to technical staff. Normally receives general instructions on routine work and detailed instructions on new assignments.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES:
Support research and development of new silicon and germanium x-ray/gamma-ray devices, fabrication processes, and related equipment.
Project management for development activities.
Design, layout, support, and evaluate new products related to cryogenically cooled germanium gamma detectors and associated accessories.
Test and record data for development and sustaining efforts
Generate and revise documentation
Interact with Engineering Group and Fabrication group to solve day to day manufacturing problems related to germanium and silicon detector manufacture. Sustaining
Interact with Fabrication group to review and implement new processes and process modifications or revisions. Sustaining
Design and develop manufacturing aids.
Develop processes, procedures and fixtures for manufacture of detector products.
Conduct product and process development for germanium and silicon detectors and hardware.
ADDITIONAL DUTIES:
Assist in troubleshooting Production problems related to device fabrication.
ESSENTIAL REQUIREMENTS:
Must be a methodical and expeditious problem solver.
Must look forward to challenge.
Must have excellent communication skills, both oral and written.
Must be able to develop and execute work plans.
Working knowledge in general chemistry.
Working knowledge of electronics
Working knowledge of vacuum and cryogenic processes
Knowledge of semi-conductor / p-n junction theory
Ion implantation experience
Radiation measurement experience
Germanium and Silicon Gamma-Ray/X-Ray Device fabrication experience
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Working knowledge of Computer Aided Design Software and Management
Working knowledge of programming and scripting languages (e.g. C++, VB, Python, )
Experience with Monte Carlo and/or Finite Element Modeling techniques
AMOUNT OF EXPERIENCE REQUIRED:
3-5 yrs experience in device process engineering preferred.
EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
BS in engineering or related field.
Behaviors
Preferred
Enthusiastic: Shows intense and eager enjoyment and interest
Detail Oriented: Capable of carrying out a given task with all details necessary to get the task done well
Motivations
Preferred
Self-Starter: Inspired to perform without outside help
Goal Completion: Inspired to perform well by the completion of tasks
Ability to Make an Impact: Inspired to perform well by the ability to contribute to the success of a project or the organization
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractors legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.3,"Mirion
3.3","Meriden, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
75,Sr. Principal Cyber Engineer,-1,"Raytheon Technologies is a premier engineering company which provides technical solutions in software development and systems engineering that address security challenges and strengthen our customers. Raytheon hires industry-leading professionals, and we treat them like industry-leading professionals. We bring exceptional talent to an array of missions that includes computer network operations, vulnerabilities, characterization, information assurance, and emerging technologies to expand cybersecurity solutions. Raytheon Technologiesengineers are developing advanced analytics helping transform analysis by making sense of the massive amounts of data that must be processed at break neck speed. Our Knowledge Management expertise includes utilizing semantic web technologies, storage, indexing, retrieval of structured/unstructured data, and social network analysis to extract and build graphic representations.
Position Description:
CNO developers design custom software tools and techniques on Windows or Linux platforms; are responsible for end-to-end design and development of custom software; diagnose and debug issues using both COTS and GOTS tools; have a firm understanding of how networks work; develop documentation pertinent to operating and supporting developed software and techniques; mentor and lead junior-level developers to accomplish mission objectives sand solve real-time cyber challenges.

We take our work and our fun seriously. We are passionate about engineering, and we prove it by funding internal R&D concepts from early inception through product development and customer delivery. We believe the best ideas stand on their own merits, and we fund ideas from our most junior engineers to our most seasoned staff. We reward excellence early and often through monetary awards, raises, and promotions. We keep ourselves sharp through weekly engineer-driven technical talks, and we team up regularly to compete in CTFs.

Required Skills:
8+ years of professional experience with C or C++
Experience developing in one (1) or more of the following: Windows applications using Visual Studio or .NET environments, UNIX applications using make files or comparable build environments, Mission-applicable platforms
Experience with programming CNO tools and techniques
Experience with network sockets programming and expert packet-level understanding of IP, TCP, and application-level protocols
Experience debugging software
Experience creating and briefing technical presentations
Knowledge of Unix kernel internals and/or low-level Windows internals, including but not limited to, the OS runtime linker/loader, object file formats (e.g. PE, COFF, ELF), file system internals (e.g. NTFS, ext2, btrfs), OS-specific mandatory and discretionary access control mechanisms, and process and thread APIs and data structures
Security Clearance:
Qualified applicants will be subject to a security investigation and must meet minimum requirements for access to classified information. U.S. Citizenship and currently have a TS/SCI with a poly clearance.

Position-specific Experience Requirements:
Read and write C, C++, and Assembly
Trace code execution in a debugger (windbg/gdb/IDA Pro)
Reverse engineer with IDA Pro
Understanding of security protection mechanisms (ASLR, DEP, NX); how to defeat them; how to detect a defeat
Desired Experience:
Experience with Mobile development
Previous vulnerability analysis experience
Education Requirements:
Bachelors Degree and one (1) year of experience in computer science, information systems, or network engineering; five (5) years of total relevant experience can be substituted for a degree.

160632

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
76,Senior Data Analytics Engineer,$65k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Data Analytics Engineer
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uncover your full potential in a collaborative environment where you'll design, develop and deliver custom solutions to big challenges. And you'll be doing it for a proven industry leader that runs one of the largest e-commerce sites in the U.S.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
As part of Uline's data analytics engineering team, work closely with business customers in the development of our new enterprise analytics platform.
Leverage industry-leading integration and analytics tools to build a modern data warehouse that is accurate, reliable, high performing and easily accessible to our business departments.
Be responsible for the full life cycle of development, from requirements gathering through ETL coding and report/dashboard design and creation.
Work with business users to establish reporting and analytic requirements.
Translate business requirements into ETL and report specifications.
Provide technical and business knowledge support to the team.
Compile ad-hoc data and report requests.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT or related major.
5+ years related experience.
Excellent knowledge of data design, SQL and data warehousing.
Knowledge of IBM Cognos BI a plus.
Strong knowledge of Microsoft BI technology (SSRS, SSIS, SSAS).
Available for travel to Uline's domestic and international branches.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

Unfortunately, Uline is unable to offer US work sponsorship at this time.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-TE1
#CORP",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Pleasant Prairie, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
77,Field Engineer Technician II,$25k-$46k (Glassdoor Est.),"Associated Bank is an equal opportunity employer committed to creating a diverse workforce. We support a work environment where colleagues are respected and given the opportunity to perform to their fullest potential. We consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, religion, color, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or veteran status, among other factors. Applicants with a disability who need assistance applying for a position with Associated Bank are asked to email: careers@associatedbank.com

Job Summary
Participates in the planning, organizing, installation, relocation, and maintenance of computer systems, peripherals, communications, data circuits, network hardware, technology kiosks, digital signage, ATM's, IP telephones, and related equipment. Resolve medium level problems and situations. Assist in the training and coordination of Field Engineer I level technicians. Provide superior hardware installation, configuration, maintenance, and software support services.

Job Accountabilities

Respond to Customer requests for On-Site Hardware Repair Services, use company provided parts and tools to resolve such problems to the customers satisfaction. Expedite difficult service issues to appropriate IT support personnel to ensure timely resolution of the problem.
Configure, troubleshoot, and repair laptops for colleagues as requested. Manage laptop deployments and returns as colleague’s transition or new requests come in.
Troubleshoot computer & IP telephone connectivity or communication problems and determine if the problem is network related, the result of PC software/hardware failure, or Telephone hardware failure. Collaborate with other IT support personnel as necessary to resolve the issue.
Complete the functions of the Project Management system in responding to requests for removal, relocation, or installation of equipment. Discuss requests with all necessary parties, verify site for feasibility of the project, cost effectiveness, and make recommendation to Field Service Lead for completion.
Assist in the development of policies, procedures, and documentation on all IT hardware serviced by Field Engineering. Documentation on proper use of hardware (job aids) to be shared with the Training department.
Lead and/or participate in the installation and relocation of existing and new IT Technologies as determined by management, maintain pace with the schedule to ensure timely completion of the project.
Complete the necessary Preventive Maintenance and Inventory Audits on all IT equipment following the Field Engineer written procedures/guidelines. Assist in the administration of the Inventory system to ensure its accuracy.
Review hardware service history and recommend replacement or relocation of equipment with unsatisfactory performance. Present recommendation to Field Service Lead.
Provide Audio/Video/Laptop set up and technical support for the Executive Team and other Lines of Business as needed. Collaboration with key Executive members is critical to the success of the presentations.
Assist in the evaluation of all new hardware technologies for usability, functionality, cost effectiveness, and durability.
Participate to any extent necessary in the development and implementation of disaster recovery if it should become necessary
Review service/technical manuals and On Line Forums to maintain familiarity on the service of all Pc, Server, Operating Systems, Print Devices, Networking Hardware and wiring systems currently deployed at Associated.

Education

Associate's Degree or equivalent combination of education and experience Computer/Network Servicing or Electromechanical Technology Servicing Required
Associate's Degree or equivalent combination of education and experience Computer/Network Servicing or Electromechanical Technology Servicing. Technical writing experience. Preferred
Experience
2-4 years PC, Laptop, Server, Printer, & Multifunction hardware troubleshooting and repair; IP telephone installation and servicing; Microsoft Windows 7, Server 2008, & the Microsoft Office Suite; Network infrastructure cabling Cat 5e-Cat6. Required
4-7 years PC, Laptop, Server, Printer, & Multifunction hardware troubleshooting and repair; IP telephone installation and servicing; Microsoft Windows 7, Server 2008, & the Microsoft Office Suite; Cisco network hardware & communication troubleshooting and service; Network infrastructure cabling Cat 5e-Cat6; Apple Hardware knowledge; and Writing technical procedures and documentation. Preferred
Licenses and Certifications
Must have access to reliable transportation and the ability to lawfully drive self, if applicable. by start date, Required
Other HP, Data Card, and Lexmark Service certifications within 1 year, Required

Compliance Statement
Fully complies with all applicable enterprise policies and procedures. Acts in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations as outlined in training materials, including but not limited to Bank Secrecy Act. Responsible for reporting suspicious activity to Financial Intelligence. Responsible to report all customer complaints as prescribed and procedure violations to management or HR. Responsible to report ethical concerns as needed to Associated’s anonymous Ethics Hotline.

Associated Bank is committed to working diligently with any colleague who needs an accommodation perform the essential functions of the job. Please contact the Leaves & Accommodations office to request an accommodation.",3.7,"Associated Bank
3.7","Green Bay, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1870,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
78,Senior Electrical Design Engineer,-1,"Job Description:

The successful candidate will provide Systems Engineering support to the PATRIOT Missile and Launcher Product Office, specifically in the design and development of the seeker system for the family of PAC3 Missiles. This senior-level engineer will be responsible for analyzing missile system performance using high-fidelity 6-DOF simulations, telemetry data collected during pre-flight HWIL testing, and missile telemetry data collected during live-fire flight tests. This successful candidate will have strong communication skills, working directly with the customer to concisely summarize analysis results and providing recommendations to leadership.

Basic Qualifications:

Understanding of guidance algorithms using sensor fusion and advanced decision theory, Kalman filtering, and optimal guidance laws
Expertise with radar imaging waveforms and signal processing of pulsed Doppler seekers
Experience with modeling and design of interceptor missile systems using 6-DOF simulations
Knowledge of Missile embedded Software architecture design, integration, and implementation
Proficient with computer programming using C, C++, Ada, or other computer languages
Effective communicating and collaborating on multi-discipline teams
Experience managing and leading engineering projects

Job Requirements:

Education: BS Required from an accredited course of study in Electrical, Aerospace, or Computer Engineering (MS Desired)
Experience: 10+ Years with related experience in Systems/Electrical/Aerospace Engineering
Security Clearance: Current Active Secret Clearance is required (or ability to obtain one)

Since its founding in 1978, Delta Research has grown into a mature organization providing research, technology development, engineering, and test and evaluation services to the Military and Defense Community in a wide spectrum of scientific disciplines. Our highly-qualified, diverse staff skillfully analyzes all aspects of weapon system design, development and testing in a technically correct and professional manner.",4.3,"Delta Research Inc
4.3","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
79,Senior Data Engineer,$91k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Data Warehouse team is looking to add a Senior Data Engineer. Qualified applicants will have 5-7 years’ experience in a Data Engineer position with a background supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency, and workload management. Ideal candidates will be experts in Talend, Python, Snowflake, CID and SQL.

Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job duties
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, including building a data pipeline infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL , cloud based relational or non-relational databases employing Talend, and/or scripting languages like Perl/Python
Build complex data platforms, and large scale CI/CD data pipelines utilizing a variety of technologies (REST APIs, Teamcity, Jennkis) and cloud databases (Snowflake)
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements, including automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in the organization’s data integration platform
Collaborate with technical staff to identify, learn, and understand software problems
Follow established configuration/change control processes
Identify options for potential solutions and assessing them for both technical and business suitability
Work closely with peers, stakeholders, and end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Essential Skills
A minimum of 5 years of developing ETL processes using Talendnformatica including the processing of NoSQL and JSON formats. Talend Certification preferred.
Strong skills with Ant, Maven, GIT, Jenkins, TeamCity.
Experience in writing Jenkins, Teamcity pipeline groovy, PowerShell scripts
Strong skills in source code repository tools such as Clear Case, SVN, CVS, and Git.
Advanced working knowledge in scripting languages, including Python, Perl and Shell.
Deep understanding of ETL, ELT, Talend, Informatica, Hadoop
Demonstrate independence, creativity, and initiative; as well as the ability to master the company's product architecture and its business goals
Experience in working in an Agile project management environment
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills
Superb verbal and written communication skills
Location: San Jose, CA 95134

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position",3.2,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
80,Sr. Industrial Software Engineer II/Principal Industrial Software Engineer,-1,"The Automation Systems Integration (ASI) Team provides complex automation, as well as digital support systems to help factories meet cost, quality and schedule goals.

Position Overview:
Within the ASI team the Industrial Software Engineer is responsible for designing and developing complex SCADA, MES and PC based systems for application in industrial control systems. Software developed will include SQL based data collection and reporting systems, custom system design and programming of SCADA and MES software. They will also be responsible for increasing the knowledge and experience of junior programmers.

This position can be Sr. Industrial Software Engineer II or Principal Industrial Software Engineer depending on the candidate's qualifications as they relate to the skills, experience and responsibility requirements for the position.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Responsibilities:
Driving modernization and innovation across RMD and the enterprise through factory automation, process automation, and data analytics
Design intuitive, easy-to-navigate, aesthetically pleasing user interfaces within MES and SCADA systems
Act as a data and database subject matter expert
Develop error proofed solutions and ensure manufacturing focus is on cost, quality, schedule and safety
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Highly self-motivated
Comfortable working at all levels within the organization and across the Enterprise
Knowledge of and ability to apply industry standard software design practices and programming methodologies
Flexible, open minded, and able to think outside the box to solve complex operational issues while maintaining open communications and a cooperative work environment
Position Requirements:
Sr. Industrial Software Engineer II
Bachelor of Science in Computer Science Engineering, Engineering, or related field and six (6) years of related experience or Masters Degree in Computer Science Engineering, Engineering, or related field and four (4) years of related experience
Experience working with Microsoft SQL Server or Oracle Databases
Experience using various industrial SCADA packages
U.S Citizenship is required
Principal Industrial Software Engineer
Bachelor of Science in Computer Science Engineering, Engineering, or related field and eight (8) years of related experience or Masters Degree in Computer Science Engineering, Engineering, or related field and six (6) years of related experience
Experience working with Microsoft SQL Server or Oracle Databases
Experience using various industrial SCADA packages
U.S Citizenship is required
Desired Skills:
Experience with High level language programming for a variety of applications, i.e., .NET, Java, Python, C, C++, etc.
Understanding of automation control systems including PLCs
Experience developing applications in Ignition (by Inductive Automation)
Expert in the use of the .NET framework
Program using various industrial MES packages
Expert in the design, reporting and programming of SQL Server based databases
Expert in web based development and systems programming
Experience/knowledge of formal design methodologies such as Agile and/or Scrum
High proficiency in commonly used industrial communications hardware including Ethernet, RS-232, and RS-485
High proficiency in commonly used industrial protocols including Ethernet/IP, CIP, and TCP/IP
Strong project management and documentation skills
Six Sigma and / or Lean certification / training
Technical experience supporting factory operations and overall manufacturing knowledge
Experience leading in a team-based manufacturing environment and making decisions with minimal supervision
Current DOD Security Clearance
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization. 170130

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
81,Global Process Standardization Engineer,$46k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Dura-Line, we aspire to create a more connected world, because we believe every company, every community, every person deserves the chance to advance their lives through better access to high-speed broadband. We take pride in our state-of-the-art quality products and being recognized a key partner with all of the major telecommunications companies across the world. In one year, Dura-Line produced over 1.4 billion feet of digital network infrastructure. Dura-Line creates what connects us. Every time you pick up your cell phone, log into the internet, or use your i-anything, it’s because our HDPE pathways protect that delicate string of glass called a fiber optic cable that carries everything from precious pictures of your puppy to the latest sports scores. Your safety, health, family, work, entertainment…your whole life; that’s our connection.

Dura-Line is seeking a subject matter expert in Process Improvement Techniques that has lead kaizen events in a manufacturing environment to be our Global Process Standardization Engineer. In this critical role, you will work with plant leaders on prioritizing projects, influence and collaborate with global and remote cross-functional teams to orchestrate and train on initiatives, and develop a project team to implement standardized procedure at Dura-Line’s manufacturing sites around the world.

In this exciting and new role, you will get a chance to bring your firsthand work experience in coordinating multi-site rollout of processes related to Manufacturing, Safety, Quality, and Engineering. Work with various teams to develop SOP, procedures, and training guides that the sites will implement to improve efficiency and productivity. You will actively identifying gaps and optimization opportunities and manage large projects globally like machine guarding, new plant or line introduction, lean simplification, scrap productivity, safety enhancement on machines, new product introduction (activity, tools, process), maintenance programs, etc.

We need someone with strong project management and documentation skills to train and guide the onsite team members in creating a “packet” for initiatives they want to implement by developing work procedures and training materials of their proposed idea or new process implementation (guide, drawing, pictures, instructions, execution) from gathered data, and standardizing across the plant locations. As you collaborate with cross-functional teams, your goal is to develop a standardized packet that can be shared with other plants and can be used as a tool to implement a new process or equipment at their own plant. You will be responsible in creating a checklist with milestones, setting goals and accountability for the team, and keeping the teams on track for the process implementation. Are you up for the challenge?

Once an idea is proposed by the plants and aligned by multi-site leaders, there will be lots of data gathering across global sites to write and develop standardized documents, SOPs, training materials for proposed process improvement. A background in manufacturing floor and working in facilities where there was a strong discipline for standards and job instructions is key for this role.

The skill set needed for this position includes excellent written and verbal communication as it will require you to connect and lead remote teams to take on the process improvement initiatives and outline the process while managing the task at hand. You must have empathy, be respectful and humble when interacting with others- we need a confident and charismatic people-influencer. You will be an organized, proven leader with a creative and problem-solving mindset. Must have excellent computer skills, and familiarity in using SharePoint, Office 365 tools, and power automate since you will create SharePoint sites to share best practices, manage actions, and track standardization progress.

We empower you to be a change agent, enable people, and foster a culture of process improvements and setting up best-practice standards across global sites. You will lead process-based solutions to systematize the way in which we operate at the manufacturing sites globally and document our existing operating procedures and work towards standardization across all locations.

As a true leader, you will create and deploy process improvements (remote and on-site) to ensure sites stay on track, improve accountability, and implement initiatives that align with business strategies. This is your chance to lead the standardization effort and focus for Dura-Line globally… Ready to run water through the pipes?

We are a people-centric company, and collaboration is needed to succeed. You will work closely with multisite leaders and plant leaders to determine internal customers to develop an integrated and coordinated process improvement strategy, with objectives designed to departmental and company compliance.

What else can help you succeed in this role? A successful track record for defining and standardizing process improvement activities and projects (8+ years of work experience) in a global multi-site environment in the automotive, aerospace, consulting, or manufacturing industry. An ability to train, communicate, and influence multi-level teams remotely. A strategic focus and project management skills to identify and prioritize the most critical and impactful issues and opportunities to drive long-term success. You must be able to synthesize data and summarize outcomes to provide recommendations on a compliant path forward.

We offer medical, dental, vision, relocation assistance, tuition reimbursement, holidays, paid time off as well as many other benefits in a collaborative culture that focuses on innovation and teamwork.

JOIN THE TEAM: Discover how Dura-Line creates what connects us. Every day, in the little ways and the big ones, our lives depend on clear, consistent, reliable communication. Check out our products, history, and testimonials and apply today at www.Dura-Line.com

Develop… Uplift… Resolve… Audit… Lean…Identify…Negotiate…Empower…

Dura-Line is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participates in the federal E-Verify program to verify the work eligibility of all new hires.

Join Our Team: Dura-Line offers all its employees an exciting work environment and provides career opportunities in a continuously growing company. We are committed to attracting, developing, and retaining a diverse workforce that represents our global customer base. Check out our products, history, and testimonials at www.Dura-Line.com

Dura-Line is part of a community of companies, known as Orbia, bound together by a shared purpose: to advance life around the world. Orbia’s business groups have a collective focus on insuring food security, reducing water scarcity, reinventing the future of cities and homes, connecting communities to data infrastructure, and expanding access to health and wellness with advanced materials. The business groups include Precision Agriculture, Building and Infrastructure, Fluor, Polymer Solutions, and Data Communications, which collectively pursue human centric solutions to global challenges.",3.0,"Dura-Line
3.0","Knoxville, TN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
82,Mechanical Engineer/Design Technical Support Engineer,-1,"Overview


The primary objective is to provide engineering design technical support on behalf of the Department of Defense for a multi-billion dollar construction program in the Pacific.

Tasks shall include review of requests for information (RFIs), review of contract submittals, review of designs performing constructability analysis, review of design changes from the contractor (in design-build projects) and the AE of record (in design-bid-build projects), drafting minor designs to support contract changes, cost estimating, making recommendations to the Owner to expedite resolution of technical issues during construction and performing other general engineering services.

Responsibilities
Coordinate with team members to execute project scope, schedules, and budgets in conformance with the project and customer requirements.
Research codes, guidance, policies, procedures, processes, criteria and Federal laws and regulations and provide sound technical recommendations in writing.
Perform field investigations, including the review of as-builts, to determine existing conditions, document findings, and provide a report to include written summary of the observations, data collected and photographs.
Collect required data to provide recommendations, prepare documents, and/or review deliverables. This data collection is to assist with the preparation of cost estimates, schedules, reports, RFPs, SOW’s and other project documentation.
Coordinate and hold meetings, determine requirements, coordinate workflow processes, and schedule/coordinate plans of actions and milestones (POAMs).
Review technical reports, RFIs, designs, design changes for both design-build and design bid build projects, project deliverables, submittals, and cost proposals from contractors to ensure compliance with customer and RFP requirements.
Provide technical support for the review of the commissioning plan, design and construction submittals, and field inspections.
Provide technical support for the construction field activities and associated preparatory and quality control meetings.
Preparing reports, Requests for proposals, and/or scopes of work in the required format, including all applicable attachments as required.
Participating in briefings/conferences. Prepare and deliver briefs supported by necessary project documentation to project team members, base personnel, and senior management.
Providing submittals/deliverables include but are not limited to project reviews and recommendations, PowerPoint briefings, and presentations.
Qualifications
Be a graduate of an ABET accredited Mechanical Engineering college curriculum (four) 4-year degree minimum AND have a minimum of (ten) 10 years’ Design Management experience performing tasks identified herein.
Have their U.S. Professional Engineering Registration (P.E.).
Have completed and passed the Construction Quality Management (CQM) for Contractors course or obtain the CQM certification within 90 days after being assigned to the contract.
Must have the ability to communicate in English effectively both orally and in writing.
Must have at least one (1) year of specialized experience in performing the tasks identified here in for Capital Improvements related projects for NAVFAC or Corps of Engineers.
Have demonstrated experience in the use and application of Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, etc), Primavera, Costworks, and Success Estimator, etc. Have the ability to adapt to new software such as eCMS may also be necessary.
Be a United States citizen and be able to obtain security clearance as required.
Be capable of the physical exertion required to perform the necessary services such as long periods of standing; walking over rough, uneven or rocky surfaces; recurring bending, crouching, stooping and reaching; climbing upon ladders and other physical activity common to the performance of such duties.
MBP is an EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability Employer.",4.5,"MBP
4.5","Dededo, GU",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
83,"Software Engineer - C++, Kernel - Secureworks - Remote",-1,"Secureworks (SCWX-NASDAQ) is a global leader in intelligence-driven information security solutions. We help organizations confidently pursue business goals in a digitally-connected world. Consistently recognized by industry analysts and readers’ polls, we are one of the best in the world at understanding and anticipating threat behavior. We see 250 billion events every day across 4400 clients in more than 55 countries, and our solutions work across all the layers of a client’s security environment, including 330 different vendor technologies. Join a talented, dedicated, and diverse team of researchers, analysts, engineers, consultants and business professionals who are focused 100% on protecting our clients from cyber threats. We seek out the brightest minds and empower our teams with the tools and support they need to fight the bad guys and maintain our company’s leadership in the cyber security industry.

Uniquely positioned to adapt as the industry evolves, we are also proud to be part of the Dell Technologies family. We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview

RedCloak sensor is a vital part of our TDR product and it’s a light agent running on client endpoints in order to detect malicious behavior and feed data into the cloud for further threat analysis. With the help of threat intelligence gathered by our world class security researchers and powered by amazing threat analytics platform we are able to detect threats and secure our clients infrastructure.

We are looking for Software Engineer with good knowledge of Windows, Linux or Mac internals to drive the next-generation endpoint capabilities of our new product offerings, which you can explore here. You will work in a fast-paced, startup-like environment with an experienced, cross-functional team of software engineers, data scientists, and security experts to develop our next generation endpoint sensor that seamlessly integrates with our cloud-native security analytics platform. If you love computer security and digging into complex engineering challenges, then we want your help securing human progress!

The ideal candidate will have a computer science background with an emphasis on operating systems and computer security. Your focus will be on the Windows agent, but many features cut across OS subsystems such as collecting telemetry from processes, networking, and file systems. Your code will be used in a lean agent that delivers security by building on proven, pre-existing mechanisms inside the Windows operating systems in order to minimize its footprint.

The agent has shared components across multiple platforms, so experience with Linux, Windows or Mac based system development is also a plus. We expect most will have extensive experience with C/C++, but experience or interest with Golang is a strong plus and will be heavily utilized.

Responsibilities
Own feature development for our Windows sensor from design to delivery with high concurrency and reliability requirements and low/no impact to end users
Participate in technical discussions around architecture, strategy, and development of next generation threat detection and response capabilities
Design and implement software with cross platform deliverables (Linux, macOS, Windows)
Triage, reproduce, debug, and fix issues identified in the product
Build tools to support team efficiency and contribute to test automation
Ensure high standards are being followed when it comes to design, coding quality, along with unit and component testing
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules
Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 3 years software development using C/C++
Minimum of 1 year low-level systems programming for one of the following OS: Windows, Linux or Mac
Must have experience building production-grade, quality and secure software
Must have good understanding of security fundamentals like encryption, authentication
Strong networking concepts
Bonus Experience
Experience with Golang
Experience with user mode or kernel mode device driver development experience
Experience with Windows CI/CD including installers, updaters, packaging, and signing
Experience with x86/amd64 assembly
Experience with large scale data analysis pipelines, particularly the impact endpoint sensors have on downstream architecture and applications
Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief,national, social or ethnicorigin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnershipstatus, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status,or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here",3.8,"Secureworks
3.8",Florida,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
84,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"SENIOR SOFTWARE DEVELOPER – Are you ready for the challenge? *
Are you a high-energy, proactive self-starter with strong work ethic and problem solver who takes pride in the quality of your work and loves a challenge? Key member of the company technical team that supports all aspects of the business. Potential for growth. Fantastic opportunity for the right candidate!

For over 30 years we have created, built, and sell innovative, proprietary technologies that serve the needs of mining operations, oil and gas operations, railroads, and industrial systems throughout North America. Our technologies include digital underground wireless communication, wireless tracking and gas sensing, plus web-based remote diagnostics and monitoring. We offer technology that keeps our clients safe and operating efficiently.

The Sr. Software Developer is an in-house position. Our offices are located in Corvallis, OR.
Corvallis is a progressive, intellectually vibrant community that has been named numerous times as one of the top 10 best places to live. We promote work in a collaborative, supportive environment, and are looking for long-term team players to grow with us.
Relocation assistance provided. Great Benefits: 100% paid medical, dental, and vision insurance, Flexible spending account, Supplemental Insurance, Sick pay, Competitive vacation pay, 9 paid holidays, and 401(k) with company matching.

If you are dedicated, deadline-driven, willing to learn new programs with a “can-do” attitude, AND ready to share our commitment of providing the most reliable, high performance, and cost-effective radio systems available worldwide, delivered with the utmost in personal honesty and integrity, we want to talk with you!

Apply now to be part of our team!
OVERALL FUNCTION OF POSITION: *
• Designing, developing, and supporting assigned applications.
• Functional and technical position that requires interaction with all levels of the organization.
OVERVIEW OF TECHNOLOGIES AND ENVIRONMENTS: *
• Responsive web application built with ReactJS, Python, and Django with a MySQL
RDBMS. Runs under Nginx on CentOS Linux.
• Integration modules built with Raspberry Pis running Raspbian Linux and Operate intelligent gateways between company products at a given installation and the web application central.
• Windows PC software exist to interact with company products for functions as configuration, firmware updating, data collection, etc. Written in C or C++, GUI ones use wxWidgets toolkit, gcc is compiler used, and Code::Blocks is used in some cases for building software.
• Microcontrollers used in company products are an 8-bit AVR® architecture from
Microchip Technology Inc.’s ATmega line. Firmware code is written in C and
Makefiles specify gnu99, GNU’s implementation of the C99 Standard. GNU C compiler is used, but a specific variant of it named avr-gcc, designed for the AVR architecture is employed.
RESPONSIBILITIES: *
• Participate in a technical capacity in all phases of the project life cycle including post- production support and on-going maintenance, including development of technical specifications, coding, debugging, testing, and documenting all application programs.
• Participate and work with Functional Analysts in user interviews, feasibility analysis and assist in generating functional specifications.
• Collaborate with internal and external business stakeholders to define and develop web applications, related reports, and interfaces.
• Responsible for integrations with both internally and externally developed applications.
• Accountable for developing and maintaining documentation for technical manuals and reference material.
• Work with stakeholders to develop and maintain hardware and software test plans that defines all actions, deliverables, responsibilities, and procedures to satisfy the user/customer quality and validation/qualification requirements.
• Manage projects, clients, and vendors to completion.
• Cross-functional collaboration and teamwork with all departments.
• Coordinate and communicate with owners.
• Lead by example, with strong work ethic, integrity, and professionalism.
• Excellent multi-tasking skills – Ability to juggle multiple projects at one time, constantly shifting from facilitating projects at various stages with various needs.
• Get the job done with quality work and strong attention to detail.
REQUIREMENTS: *
• Minimum 8 years IT experience specific to software- and web-development.
• BA/BS in Computer Science or related field.
• Experience in Python and Javascript programming, including AJAX, JSON, XML, etc.
• Strong fundamental knowledge with HTML, including version 5.
• Experience in Linux, or other Unix-like operating systems, and both apache and
Nginx web servers.
• Experience with Python a must. Specific preference for Django.
• Experience with SQL. Specific experience with MySQL a plus.
• Experience with Javascript (jQuery Specifically) for DOM manipulation and AJAX interactions.
• Strong knowledge and experience in web development techniques, technologies, and tools.
• Experience successfully implementing process improvement in a technology environment.
• Experience with Agile software development practices – Scrum, Lean/Kanban.

• Outstanding communication skills: verbal, written and listening.
• Adept at Project Management.
• Previous experience managing a team preferred.
• Client-facing experience.
• Highly organized, detail-oriented, proactive, and analytical. Strong problem solver and troubleshooter.
• Ability to comprehend and implement complex business requirements in an exacting manner.
• Experience/exposure in family-owned and/or smaller business environment.
• Limited travel to domestic locations.
• Be available after hours as needed to provide operational support.
• Willing and open to learning new applications.
• Experience with outsourcing a plus, not required.
• Collaborative team leader who takes ownership and is willing to go “above and beyond.”
• Dependable, accountable, ethical, and responsible with a strong work ethic, excellent follow through, strong time management, and high level of urgency.
• Pre-employment drug testing and background checks following federal guidelines are a condition of employment.

$100K-$130K Annual Salary, DOE
All candidates must provide resume, cover letter and references.

We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, physical or mental disability, genetic information, marital status, pregnancy, citizenship, veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation or any other protected class in accordance with federal, state and local laws. We maintain a drug-free workplace that complies with federal law.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Relocation Assistance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
C Development on Windows: 3 years (Required)
Django: 2 years (Preferred)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
Python: 3 years (Required)
Linux: 3 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Rush Recruiting and HR,"Corvallis, OR",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
85,Enterprise Data Architect,$110k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"Enterprise Data Architect Job

Location(s): CO - Denver; MN - Minneapolis

Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills, talents and education to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A professional position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.

Position Summary

The Enterprise Data Architect will play a key role in the digital transformation of Xcel Energy by defining the technical data architectures that will enable Xcel Energy to maximize the creation of value from data. This role will have enterprise-wide scope. This role is expected to be the Xcel Energy subject matter expert on data centric technology to both the Business and IT. This position will have broad experience with data management disciplines and will oversee the architecture and system level design of the enterprise data ecosystem.

Essential Responsibilities

Leadership: Lead work cross-organizationally through coaching and feedback, and through significant interactions and influence with leaders. Govern work efforts to ensure alignment with reference architecture, IT strategy and policy. Collaborate cross-organizationally to influence alignment on and adoption of enterprise architecture standards.
Technical Expertise: Provide consultation and direction to delivery and operational teams on optimal architecture for respective solutions. Maintain state-of-the-art expertise of enterprise architecture technologies, frameworks, and industry innovations.
Planning and Strategy: Participate in creation and renewal of an overarching IT strategy. Develop and enforce reference architecture standards that are aligned with IT strategies and principles. Contribute to architecture road maps and provide input to technology roadmaps. Ensure the domain IT Strategy align with Enterprise Architecture framework and standards.
Architectural Operations: Review and approve projects and work efforts to ensure that they are compliant with architectural standards. Track and manage exceptions to standards. Continuously improve operational processes. Assess, report, and make recommendations to eliminate operational risk related to technology or architecture.

Minimum Requirements

Bachelor’s degree in Technology, Science, Business or related field, or 4 years of experience equivalent to the position.
Ten years of related functional experience.
Excellent communication skills, effective with varying organizational levels and skill sets.
Excellent Relationship Management and collaboration skills, with a track record of working as one team cross-organizationally to drive innovation and business.
Strong architecture acumen across multiple domains including network, infrastructure, software, hosting models, applications, data, mobile platforms, and security.
Strong knowledge of core aspects of enterprise architecture (Software, Hardware, Network, Integration, Data, hosting models, platform types, etc.).
In-depth expertise in at least two areas of Architecture competency such as SOA, TOGAF, BPM, Data Analytics, standards & governance, or enterprise architecture frameworks.
Expertise on future technology trends within area of expertise.
Expertise in architectural review and technology lifecycle management disciplines.
Experience in a leading role in project delivery & solutions architecture.
Experience successfully owning and driving strategic roadmap planning, and simplifying technology eco-systems.

As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.

Posting Notes: CO - Denver || CO - Denver; MN - Minneapolis || United States (US) || Customer And Innovation || 56230:Enterprise Architecture || Full-Time || Non-Bargaining ||

Requisition Number: 22682

Equal Opportunity Employer: Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran

Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com

EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)

ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.

Our Values: One Team Powered by Many

Committed
Connected
Safe
Trustworthy",3.6,"Xcel Energy
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1909,Company - Public,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1
86,SWITCHGEAR (Lead) DESIGN ENGINEER,-1,"SWITCHGEAR (Lead) DESIGN ENGINEER *
Data Center Products*
IEM (Industrial Electric Mfg.)* is the largest independent full-line manufacturer of custom electrical distribution and power quality equipment in North America. IEM is delivering customer-specific solutions to meet the ever-changing power requirements of growth industries across the world. This position offers an exciting opportunity within an innovative, growing company*,* with a backlog of bookings that go beyond 3 years.
In this newly created position, you will be responsible for supervisory design of power products, primarily for data center applications. In addition to designing products, you will provide oversight and guidance to junior engineers to create an overall package.

Essential Functions:
Create drawing package for custom equipment, including LV and MV switchgear, switchboards, ATS’s, control panels, and other power products.
Select components and create detailed bills of materials
Collaborate with mechanical design team to generate layout drawings of IEM equipment
Review customer plans and specs, raising any discrepancies in IEM product offering
Review and redline drawings completed from other engineers, primarily for data center clients. Suggest solutions or alternate designs, where applicable.
Ensure that drawing packages created by different design engineers are complete and create a consistent package that meet requirements for particular data center clients.
Perform order coordination duties to ensure that the greater engineering team is meeting obligations for data center clients. Provide feedback to commercial, project management, or field service teams within IEM for any problem items.
Attend customer design meetings and participate in factory witness tests.
Complete programming assignments for automation components, protective relays, digital meters, communication devices, etc.
Provide technical training and product support
Requirements: *
A BSEE or equivalent and a minimum 5 years of experience designing MV/LVSwitchgear. This must include a solid grasp of three-phase electric power concepts including distribution systems, control and protection strategies.
Familiarity with the National Electric Code and UL / IEEE standards for various types of electrical equipment (UL 891, 1558, 508A; IEEE C37.20, etc.)
Must be a team player with strong verbal/written communication skills and
self-motivated with an ability to work independently without supervision.
Must have experience with AutoCAD and Microsoft Office products.
Previous mentoring or training experience highly preferred.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
Switchgear Design: 5 years (Required)
Location:
Jacksonville, FL 32224 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.iemfg.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,The New IEM LLC dba Industrial Electric Mfg.,"Jacksonville, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
87,Healthcare Provider Data Analyst,$42k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us:

NYSTEC is a non-profit technology consulting company, advising agencies, organizations, institutions, and businesses since 1996. Were independent and vendor-neutral so we have our clients best interests at heart. At NYSTEC, we know that we succeed when individuals and teams flourish personally and professionally, so our benefits and perks support this mindset. Are you ready to contribute to our engaged workforce and deliver the NYSTEC Experience?

About the Role:

As a Healthcare Data Analyst in the Population Health Strategy practice, you will collaborate with team members to conceptualize, deliver, and support our clients through todays ever-changing healthcare landscape. NYSTEC is considered a trusted program advisor, providing subject matter expertise, and connecting the dots for our clients. Over the last five years, NYSTEC has consulted on some of the largest Medicaid initiatives and served in various roles across a multitude of New York State healthcare technology systems.

Serving as a Healthcare ProviderData Analyst, you will be supporting healthcare technology initiatives for our clients, partners and stakeholders by providing analytical expertise to evaluate provider data across New York State.

About You:

Required Qualifications
Experience in health informatics
Experience writing ad hoc queries in SQL
Strong critical thinking, problem solving, and analytical skills
Proficiency with translating complex analytic ideas into actionable insights for varied levels of audience.
Ability to develop relationships with stakeholders and understand their needs through excellent listening and effective written and verbal communication.
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, with strong skills in Excel
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Experience using SAS
Experience using provider data and/or payer data to inform decision making
Experience with data quality analysis
Masters degree in health informatics, public health, statistics, computer science, or a related discipline
Education and Experience
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree with at least 3 years of related experience is required. An equivalent combination of advanced education, training, and experience will be considered.
If youre an effective communicator who enjoys working in complex and collaborative environments, utilizing your critical thinking and research skills to develop solutions for clients, providing support to customers, and have the required education, experience and skills, we want to hear from you.

It is NYSTEC's policy to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all individuals, regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), age, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition as defined by applicable state or local law, genetic information, military service and veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status, , or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal law and ordinances. NYSTEC is strongly committed to this policy and believes in the concept and spirit of the law.

Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the future.",3.9,"NYSTEC
3.9","Albany, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
88,Database Engineer,$60k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Database Engineer, you will be responsible for aiding in the design, implementation, and operation of Medisolv’s application databases. Specifically, this job will be working with Medisolv’s electronic clinical quality measure tool, which uses both MS-SQL and MongoDB databases.

Responsibilities:

Writing SQL procedures, scripts, and queries to select, insert, update, delete and report data out to a variety of endpoints
Optimizing databases via standard practices, e.g. adding indexes, building additional collections, generating statistics, and optimizing execution plans
Interfacing with team members to ensure data work is in-line with needs, expectations, and security practices
Debugging issues with client systems, both in the cloud and on-premises installations
Assisting with general schema maintenance activities, and supporting developers and quality assurance during development, testing and release activities.

3+ years of experience working with Microsoft SQL Server (or other SQL technology)
3+ years of experience working with MongoDB (or other NoSQL technology)
Experience performing data analysis and calculations within a database environment
Experience working with ETL processes and procedures
Ability to work as an independent component within a larger team
Ability to manage multiple project initiatives simultaneously
Excellent communication skills
A willingness and ability to learn new technologies and work hands-on
Bachelor’s degree in a technology related discipline or equivalent experience
Successful completion of pre-employment background check
Must be authorized to work in the U.S. for any employer. We are unable to offer visa sponsorship for this position.

Preferred Experience:

Electronic Health Record systems (Meditech, EPIC, Cerner, etc.)
Healthcare data and data standards (Standard code systems, quality reporting, etc.)
PostgreSQL
Microsoft Azure Technologies",4.6,"Medisolv Inc
4.6","Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
89,"Software Engineer - Endpoint Sensor - Secureworks - Austin, TX or Remote",-1,"Secureworks® (NASDAQ: SCWX) is a technology-driven cybersecurity leader that protects organizations in the digitally connected world. Built on proprietary technologies and world-class threat intelligence, our applications and solutions help prevent, detect, and respond to cyber threats.  Red Cloak™ software brings advanced threat analytics to thousands of customers, and the Secureworks Counter Threat Platform™ processes over 300B threat events per day. We understand complex security environments and are passionate about simplifying security with Defense in Concert™ so that security becomes a business enabler. More than 4,000 customers across over 50 countries are protected by Secureworks, benefit from our network effect and are Collectively Smarter. Exponentially Safer.™ www.secureworks.com
We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview

RedCloak sensor is a vital part of our TDR product and it’s a light agent running on client endpoints in order to detect malicious behavior and feed data into the cloud for further threat analysis. With the help of threat intelligence gathered by our world class security researchers and powered by amazing threat analytics platform we are able to detect threats and secure our clients infrastructure.

We are looking for Senior Software Engineer with good knowledge of Linux systems to drive the next-generation endpoint capabilities of our new product offerings, which you can explore here. You will work in a fast-paced, startup-like environment with an experienced, cross-functional team of software engineers, data scientists, and security experts to develop our next generation endpoint sensor that seamlessly integrates with our cloud-native security analytics platform. If you love computer security and digging into complex engineering challenges, then we want your help securing human progress!

The ideal candidate will have a computer science background with an emphasis on operating systems and computer security. Your focus will be on the Linux, Windows or Mac agent, but many features cut across OS subsystems such as collecting telemetry from processes, networking, and file systems. Your code will be used in a lean agent that delivers security by building on proven, pre-existing mechanisms inside the Linux operating systems in order to minimize its footprint.

The agent has shared components across multiple platforms, so experience with Windows based system development is also a plus. We expect most will have extensive experience with C/C++, but experience or interest with Golang is a strong plus and will be heavily utilized.

Responsibilities
Own feature development for our Linux sensor from design to delivery with high concurrency and reliability requirements and low/no impact to end users
Participate in technical discussions around architecture, strategy, and development of next generation threat detection and response capabilities
Design and implement software with cross platform deliverables (Linux, macOS, Windows)
Triage, reproduce, debug, and fix issues identified in the product
Build tools to support team efficiency and contribute to test automation
Ensure high standards are being followed when it comes to design, coding quality, along with unit and component testing
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules
Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 2 years software development using C/C++
Minimum of 1 year systems level or kernel development
Must have experience in strong computer networking fundamentals
Preferred Experience
Experience with Golang
Experience with container technology
Experience with large scale data analysis pipelines, particularly the impact endpoint sensors have on downstream architecture and applications
Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief,national, social or ethnicorigin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnershipstatus, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status,or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here",3.8,"Secureworks
3.8",Florida,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
90,Associate Software/Systems Engineer- Active TS/SCI with Full Scope Poly,-1,"Who we are!
BBN Technologies is a premier research and development center. Our diverse research portfolio combines the best technologies to deliver innovative, custom solutions with real-world benefit.
At BBN, you might create or investigate new types of cyber physical systems, investigate the emerging Internet of Things, implement unique mission applications for software-defined radios, devise creative ways to analyze, interpret, and display large multi-dimensional data sets, create innovative solutions using off-the shelf consumer electronics, develop next-generation capabilities for privacy/anonymity and identity control, or even disassemble and analyze a complex embedded system. Although the work changes from one project to the next, its always challenging, and it always makes a difference.
All of the research at BBNfrom embedded computing devices to the Internet of Thingsis funded by customers who rely on us for solutions. If you are a problem solver, someone who likes to take things apart to see how they work, who enjoys inventing things, and who has the passion, drive, and creativity to shape future technologies, BBN might be a great fit for you! We offer outstanding benefits that include flexible work schedules, a competitive 401k company match, a Retirement Contribution plan, performance based incentive, paid parental leave, paid time off, and many other employee discounts.

What will you need?
•TS/SCI w/ Full Scope Poly
•BS in Computer Science, Engineering, or other relevant field 0 to 2 years of work experience.
•Strong written and oral communication skills
•Solid and creative programming skills
•Designing and developing unique combined hardware and software systems
•Experience with sensors, actuators, control systems and systems that touch the physical world
•Position may require some amount of overnight travel.
•U.S. Citizenship is required.

Additional Skills that would be AWESOME / BENEFICIAL!
•Embedded systems
•Data science/analytics
•Mesh networking
•Tagging and active tagging technologies
•Rapid manufacturing (including 3D printing)
•System analysis and engineering
•Digital signal processing
•Building devices using consumer electronics (e.g., Android or iOS devices, ARM processors, microcontrollers, Arduino/Raspberry Pi)
•Radio, RF, and antenna design
•Autonomous systems design and development and simulation (e.g. UAV, AUVs, etc.)

167118

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Columbia, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
91,Command and Control Systems Engineer,-1,"Command and Control Engineer- Early Warning and Defense Operations Systems Department

One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System Design & Architecture Directorate is the central focus for Mission Systems Integration activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). The more than 2,100 employees provide requirements definition and design at the system, subsystem and component level every day in a collaborative environment which is characterized by respect for the individual, problem solving in a team setting, consensus oriented solutions, and results based recognition. Supporting this mission are teams providing domain expertise and creative solutions in surveillance, naval and missile defense based radar system design, sonar and undersea sensor system design, integrated air and missile defense systems engineering, command and control/battle management system design, combat system and platform architecture design and integration, software intensive system engineering, cyber solutions and algorithm development for signal processing, tracking and discrimination systems. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of achieving excellence through thought and team work while leveraging individual diversity conducive to a flexible work schedule and environment.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

The Early Warning and Defense Operations Systems (EWDOS) Department supports RMD by providing world class Sensor and Weapon Systems Engineering. Domain Expertise includes Situational Awareness, Network Design, Battle Management, Battlespace Integration and Interoperability Command and Control, Communications, for Domestic and International customers.
The EWDOS Department is looking for talented senior systems engineer with the technical expertise and engineering leadership skills to join a team of engineers that designs and develops world-class Sensor and Weapon systems in our Tewksbury and Andover, MA, locations

Job Description:

This role focuses on the development and deployment of Air Defense Operations Center to various partners around the globe. The ideal candidate will have expertise with large scale Command and Control systems, and their computing elements, as well as understanding the Link-16 protocol.

Required Skills:
Minimum of 4 years of experience in the field of engineering or related technical discipline
Knowledge of complex command and control and/or engagement management systems involving multiple sensors and effectors
Experience working in a small team environment with strong interpersonal skills and teamwork
Proven technical analysis data analysis, troubleshooting, identifying root cause and problem solving skills
Experience with developing, documenting, and maintaining processes, methods and tools
DOD Clearance, or the ability to obtain within 1 year from date of hire
Desired Skills:
Experience with system/software level requirements development, documentation and maintenance and/or design of system level software architecture
Proven experience with current air defense programs with specific experience in large, complex systems
Excellent communication, technical writing, oral presentation, and interpersonal skills
Knowledge of radar and weapon systems
Knowledge Command and Control systems
Knowledge of Link-16 networking and interfaces
Knowledge of HMI design
Proven ability to interface with customers and lead technical solutions to complex User requirements
Experience with Matlab modeling and analysis
Required Education:Bachelor of Science degree in an Engineering discipline

Keywords: systems, engineer, architecture, analysis, command, control, link-16

This position can be a Salary Grade G08 or Salary Grade G09 based on the candidate's qualifications as they relate to the skills, experience and responsibility requirements for the position.

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

Raytheon Technologies has been recognized as a respected employer and valued corporate citizen for our employment practices, programs and community support by a number of highly-regarded organizations. The list includes: Forbes, Glassdoor, National Veterans Small Business Association, Corporate Responsibility Magazine, Environmental Protection Agency, Affinity Inc. and many more.

What We Offer: Whether youre just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
170000

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tewksbury, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
92,Data Engineer,-1,"At YETI, we believe that time spent outdoors matters more than ever and our gear can make that time extraordinary. When you work here, you'll have the opportunity to create exceptional, meaningful work and problem solve with innovative team members by your side. Together, you'll help our customers get the high-quality gear they need to make the most of their adventures. We are BUILT FOR THE WILD™.

The Data Engineer will be part of a team that designs and develops YETI's enterprise Data Warehouse and Analytic systems. This position offers an extremely rare and unique opportunity to join a highly profitable, fast-growing business.

Our needs are diverse and its certain that we will build and deploy software on various platforms including but not limited to Google Big Query and Tableau. While this position specifically seeks a Senior Developer, who will focus on implementing solutions in Google Cloud Environment, Google Dataflow, and Composer (Airflow), we strongly prefer candidates with a diversity of experience capable of working across more than one area.

This role requires a blend of skills typically found in the specialized roles of Business Analyst, Data Modeler, Data Analyst, and Cloud Administration. Additionally, an understanding of dynamic environments, agile development, and how to balance the need to maintain operations versus the need to build things the right way is an absolute must.

Responsibilities:
Work with business customers and data analysts to define detailed requirements from broader business challenges.
Translate those requirements to logical and physical models that satisfy analytical needs.
Perform data profiling and analysis to assess data quality patterns, recommend data cleansing rules, conforming data standard rules and matching algorithms.
Own the system architecture and infrastructure of our Google Could Data warehouse and other related GCP services.
Assist ETL and BI developers with complex query tuning and schema refinement.


Qualifications and Attributes:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related discipline
4+ years experience in the development of data warehouse, decision support, or executive information systems.
Expert in writing, analyzing and tuning complex SQL queries
Extensive experience with Python programming
Hands-on experience in any Cloud environment preferably GCP
Good understanding of Object-Oriented programming
Must have a good understanding of Dimensional Modeling and ER-Modeling.
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Airflow, Dataflow, etc.
Willing to work with new tools and learn new programming languages
Strong problem-solving ability and a positive attitude.
YETI is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.

#LI-CL1",4.0,"YETI Coolers
4.0",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
93,Lead Model-Based Systems Engineer Manager,-1,"Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

The Lead Model-Based Systems Engineer (L-MBSE) Senior Manager will provide technical leadership and management in order to drive the implementation of model-based systems engineering at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. The successful candidate will enjoy a fast-paced, team-based, and challenging technical environment. This job is responsible for driving system engineering processes in support of digital engineering transformation. This includes but not limited to requirement creation and management; test case fulfilment across the business within a digital engineering environment. Support the definition of system and derived requirements to ensure the developed system is compatible with the defined architecture, and meets customer needs. Create and validate digital engineering and MBSE models and lead multiple tool and environmental Integrations used across the business.

This position may be located in either El Segundo CA, Richardson TX or Aurora CO.

L-MBSE Senior Manager responsibilities include:
Serve as the outward facing program liaison to build and sustain relationships with customers, stakeholders and End Users; understand and communicate their priorities and needs back to the program for evaluation against the baseline and support investigations into future program growth.
Provide technical direction within the Digital Engineering discipline for proposed solutions, including CONOPs and roadmaps pursuant to customer opportunities, optimum approaches to development, engineering, interfacing, integration and testing, documentation, supplier specifications and SOWs. Support Task Orders, RFC/ECP Impact assessments, Customer Risk and Opportunity Assessments.
Work in a multi-contractor environment where Raytheon Technologies provides leadership in key roles. The L-MBSE will be the product owner of the Digital Engineering (DE) transformation engagement to a program or product line, and is responsible for the entire technical solution; in both development and support/services phase of the program life cycle by providing technical leadership to the team implementing the DE transformation.
Lead Enterprise level working groups and Key Stakeholders to apply extensive knowledge of technical capabilities, identify potential risks and opportunities, lead customer knowledge sharing and outreach activities across the Business to meet DE transformation requirements and evaluate future program or product line evolution of their DE transformation.
The Senior Manager is responsible for hiring, conducting performance reviews, developing employees and handling employee relation issues for assigned staff within the Model Based Systems Engineering SWAT Team. Additionally, the Senior Manager will conduct regular staff meetings with direct reports.
Clearance Requirement: Must be a US Citizen with the ability to obtain a TS clearance

Required Skills:
12+ years of systems engineering experience with proficiency in MBSE, MBSE tools and SysML
Experience with requirements development and management, flow-down, design, test planning and execution, data analysis, verification and validation, and operations support
Leadership skills and tenacity to develop proposals for Government customers
Familiar with agile-scrum approaches
Skilled in preparing and delivering briefings to management and customers
Evidence of problem-solving and time-management skills
Experience working with multi-disciplined teams geographically dispersed
Excellent communicator and collaborator
Ability to obtain a Top Secret U.S. Security Clearance
Desired Skills:
Providing technical leadership to an engineering team throughout the life cycle
Generating systems engineering products for complex systems
DoDAF or other architecture framework
Leading development, systems engineering, and testing of complex systems
Modeling and simulation
Familiar with OpenMBEE, Syndeia, DOORS, DOORS Next Generation, MagicDraw
Education Requirements:
Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Sciences, or Mathematics or related STEM discipline
Desired Education:
Masters Degree in Systems Engineering or related STEM discipline
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#Space2020
168548

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Richardson, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
94,Senior Software Engineer / Tech Lead,-1,"Overview:

Who we are:

Virgin Pulse, founded as part of Sir Richard Branson’s famed Virgin Group, helps organizations build employee health and wellbeing into the DNA of their corporate cultures. As the only company to deliver a powerful, mobile-first digital platform infused with live services, including coaching and biometric screenings, Virgin Pulse takes a high-tech-meets-high-touch-approach to engage employees in improving across all aspects of their health and wellbeing, every day – from prevention and building a healthy lifestyle to condition and disease management to condition reversal, all while transparently engaging users daily in building and sustaining relevant healthy habits and behaviors. A global leader in health and wellbeing, Virgin Pulse is committed to helping change lives and businesses around the world for good so that people and organizations can thrive, together. Today, more than 3100 organizations across the globe are using Virgin Pulse’s solutions to improve health, employee wellbeing and engagement, reduce costs and create strong workplace cultures.

We engage several million members worldwide through our App Store and Play Store Applications that have over 500k consumer reviews and 4.8+ ratings

Who are our employees?

At Virgin Pulse we’re passionate about changing lives for good. We want to make a difference in the world by helping people be healthy so they can perform at their best, every day, at work and at home. Our award-winning solutions support leading employers in improving and simplifying the employee health and wellbeing journey and engaging people in all aspects of their health. But our world-class products and programs are nothing without our people – the employees who design, build, promote, sell, test and perfect the latest innovations in workplace health and wellbeing. Our people are our top priority and we invest in their health and happiness. At Virgin Pulse, we have so much more than a strong, supportive company culture – have a shared vision for a healthier, happier world.

Responsibilities:

Who you are

You are a dedicated and knowledgeble Senior or Lead Software Engineer and have a goal to find a position on a technology team focused on continuing the growth of our next-generation SaaS application. As a Technical Lead at Virgin Pulse you will mentor and lead a team of engineers in their work to implement stories, bug fixes, unit tests, and general R&D with minimal oversight. You bring to the table a broad understanding of many modern open-source web technologies, and are dedicated to learning more. You will work as a technical leader on a scrum team, collaborating with other Tech Leads, Product Owners and our talented Engineers to deliver great solutions on an exponentially growing application.

In addition to the above you possess a number of desirable traits including:

You have outstanding problem solving and analytical skills
You are a great communicator (written and verbal)
You are enthusiastic about leading and being part of a team, and have great people skills
You are a mentor; a teacher who has gifts and knowledge and want to share this passion with others.
A passion for learning technologies and applying them to the right projects will make you successful in this position.
Qualifications:

What you bring to the team

In order to represent the best of what we have to offer you come to us with a multitude of positive attributes including:

7 or more years of practical experience working as a software engineer
3 years or more in a Lead role.
Object-Orientated development skills
Grasp of modern (RESTful) web applications
Strenghts in open source tools like Java, Python and similar
Expertise withf SQL; PostgreSQL is a plus
Strong knowledge of common front end technologies such as React, Pug, Bower/NPM, Grunt, Angular, etc.
Solid Unit Testing experience
Agile Scrum or Kanban methodologies
Knowledge of Scrum tools (Jira, confluence, etc.)
Git with pull requests in a team environment
Linux – in depth skills
TCP/IP
Grasp of and support for Continuous Integration / Delivery method experience (i.e. Teamcity, Jenkins, etc.)

Strengths that make you stand out

Spring or Spring Boot
Cassandra / Redis
AWS/SNS/SQS/RDS
Terraform / Puppet / Ansible
Maven/Gradle

Security Competencies:

Work to ensure system and data security is maintained at a high standard, ensuring the confidentiality, integrity and availability of the Virgin Pulse application is not compromised. Ensure industry best practice coding standards are adhered to in particular ensure all code developed at Virgin Pulse is free from bugs and security vulnerabilities, such as those defined and published by OWASP.

Why work here?

We believe a career should provide competitive pay and benefits, a collaborative and supportive work environment, strong employee culture and cutting-edge technology and services — so many reasons to love it here.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to any protected class status.
#LI-REMOTE",-1,VirginPulse,"Appleton, WI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
95,Principal RF Communications Systems Engineer,-1,"The RF and Navigation Subsystems Department is seeking an engineer to provide Data Link expertise to sustain, extend and grow new business.

Job Description and Tasks:
Perform/evaluate/demonstrate design concepts, performance trade studies, link budget analyses and developed capabilities for data link communication applications.
Perform hardware and software Communication Architecture trade studies.
Develop, prototype, and test data link models and communication signal processing algorithms in detailed high fidelity simulations and support hardware implementation
Test, verify and validate communication and signal processing algorithm requirements in laboratory or field test environments.
Provide engineering support through participation in project design reviews, peer reviews, briefings to internal leadership and external customers for all phases of missile communication development tasks
Support the RMD Data link product portfolio across the product development lifecycle including assisting with transition to production.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Location: Tucson, AZ

Required Skills:
Must have a minimum of 8 years professional engineering experience
Experience with RF, communications systems design, data link hardware development, algorithm development, or digital signal processing
Programming/simulation experience in MATLAB, SIMULINK, C/C++ or equivalent language
U.S Citizenship is required.
Desired Skills:
Masters degree in EE, Math or Physics in communications systems design, data link hardware development, algorithm development, and or digital signal processing.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including the ability to develop and present comprehensive technical briefings to peers and to program and customer leadership.
Experience with fixed point algorithm simulations for VHDL verification.
Experience with wireless fading model simulation.
Ability to lead multi-disciplined engineering teams in order to develop and sustain communication products across the life cycle.
Experience with cost and schedule development for large data link development efforts.
Experience with communication theory, probability theory, stochastic signal processing, RF and/or electromagnetic theory.
Required Education (including Major):
B.S. degree is required. Major: Electrical Engineering or related STEM degree.

This position requires the successful issuance, transfer or maintenance of any clearances and/or accesses necessary for the position. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement.

167285

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
96,Data Integration Engineer-Full Stack Developer,$58k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Civilian, State and Local

Perspecta’s Civilian, State and Local segment partners with the U.S. Federal Civilian State and Local governments to provide infrastructure services, business solutions, and digital transformation services that help them achieve policy objectives and integrate citizen-centric services.

Responsibilities

Every day at Perspecta, we enable hundreds of thousands of people to take on our nation's most important work. We are a company founded on a diverse set of capabilities and skills, bound together by a single promise: we never stop solving our nation's most complex challenges. Our team of engineers, analysts, developers, investigators, integrators and architects work tirelessly to create innovative solutions. We continually push ourselves•to respond, to adapt, to go further. To look ahead to the changing landscape and develop new and innovative ways to serve our customers.

Perspecta works with U.S. government customers in defense, intelligence, civilian, health care, and state and local markets. Our high-caliber employees are rewarded in many ways•not only through competitive salaries and benefits packages, but also with opportunities to create a meaningful impact in jobs and on projects that matter.

Perspecta's talented and robust workforce•14,000 strong'stands ready to welcome you to the team. Let us make an impact together.

Data Integration Engineer - Full Stack Developer (Java)

Perspecta has a need for a Data Integration Engineer- Full Stack Developer (Java) in Chantilly, VA.

This role will be supporting the Department of Homeland Security and its Continuous Diagnostic and Mitigation (CDM) program.

Develop Connectors and processes for a RedHat Fuse Enterprise Service Bus (ESB) to various security sensors and tools.
Create documentation for the installation, configuration and implementation of these connectors and processes.
Interpret functional requirements and implements them into processes between a sensor layer and dashboard layer.
Perform functional testing in cybersecurity lab.
Provides support to test team and to tool subject matter experts through systems engineering life cycle.
Provides Tier 3 support to operations teams when deployed into production.
Apply advanced subject matter knowledge to complex business issues and is regarded as a subject matter expert.
Frequently contributes to the development of new ideas and methods.
Works on complex problems/ projects where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of multiple factors.
Exercise significant independent judgment within broadly defined policies and practices to determine best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives.
Lead and/or provide expertise to functional project teams and may participate in cross- functional initiatives.
Provide mentoring and guidance to lower level employees.
Acts as an expert providing direction and guidance to process improvements and establishing policies.
Frequently represents the organization to external customers/clients.

Qualifications

Required:

A BS in Computer Science or related field required, Masters a plus.

5-8+ years of Data Integration experience with at 4 years of IT enterprise experience.
5-8+ years of experience with Java development, Java Scripting, JSON, XML, XSLT and database languages such as SQL and Oracle.
3-5+ years of experience with web services development such as REST and SOAP.
Experience with build tools (Maven, Jenkins) and configuration tools such as SVN/GIT.
Strong knowledge of development tools, configuration management tools, existing development standards, frameworks, models and methods for developing and implementing security integrated solutions.
Understand and apply information system or operational solution related data modeling methods and tools to perform data integration tool interoperability.
Strong interpersonal and collaboration skills, working in a team-oriented environment.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Ability to adhere to defined processes and procedures and ability to suggest improvements.
Effectively prioritize and handle multiple tasks simultaneously.
Strong technical documenting skills.
Experience with Spring Framework Service.
Experience with Junit, WireMock, Java Swing
Overall strong background in systems engineering, security engineering, architect, enterprise integration and interoperability in a complex systems environment, preferred.
Knowledge of emerging cybersecurity technologies.
Experience modeling data, message and service interoperability.
Understanding of technical, operational and management issues related to design, development and deployment of complex and distributed systems.
Understanding of interrelationships between critical infrastructure protection and cybersecurity.
Knowledge and experience with C&A processes in Federal environments, preferably with experience utilizing the NIST Risk Management Framework (RMF) for complex systems or networks.
Experience with Apache Camel performing data integration.
Strong understanding of Security tools such as McAfee and Tenable as well as enterprise service bus technology.
Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP) Certification or minimum Security+ certification.
Familiarity with DHS Cybersecurity programs such as Continuous Diagnostics and Mitigation (CDM)
Powershell knowledge is a benefit.
Excellent communication and relationship skills to articulate advanced technical topics and build consensus among clients and technical stakeholders.

Responsibilities:

Design, modify and deliver cybersecurity systems architecture, infrastructure and engineering based on client security needs, industry requirements and trends, client/company environment requirements and legacy system constraints and capabilities.
Recommend and coordinate the development, enhancement and organization of the architecture and infrastructure of the cybersecurity embedded in or overlaid on client's or company's technology solutions.
Monitor the output of cybersecurity teams and contributes to security requirements definition, documentation, development and deployment processes.
Combine industry expertise with a thorough understanding of information and cybersecurity technology to gather cybersecurity requirements and develop cybersecurity infrastructures and architectures.
Interface with systems architects to design and build a secure infrastructure.
Conduct complex cybersecurity solution testing to ensure performance and quality.

Applicants must be clearable at time of hire. This position requires United States Citizenship and eligibility to apply for/obtain a DHS EOD Clearance.

For more information, visit www.perspecta.com.

Perspecta Values:
Perspecta is an EOE / Female / Minority / Individual with Disabilities / Protected Veteran Status

If you are looking for challenges in a pleasant and international work environment, then we want to hear from you.
**During Pandemic telecommuting is allowed for candidates who reside in the DC Metro area.***
About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Senior Data Engineer,$77k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Team: Morningstar’s mission is to create great products that help investors achieve their financial goals. For the Workplace group, that means building products and solutions that help employers maximize the value of their workplace retirement plans and put individuals on the path to better retirement outcomes. Workplace is a high-growth area for Morningstar that houses a diverse suite of technology and investment-based solutions. Our unique client base includes retirement plan providers, plan sponsors, plan consultants, and retirement plan advisors. By constantly evolving our solutions and solving our clients’ problems, we are well-positioned to help individuals achieve a better retirement. The workplace technology team is critical to achieving this mission and bringing it to life.

Responsibilities:
Develop efficient, high throughput data pipelines to push transactional data to the cloud
Build computation frameworks to get analytical insights from cloud-based data stores
Optimize storage to best serve business use cases
Define and implement the data life cycle per compliance requirements
Work with product managers and data scientists to understand the objectives of the data platform
Play an active role in data governance in collaboration with other Database Administrators and Applications/ Business teams
Design and develop for quick deployment with assistance from the Devops team
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in MIS, Computer Science, or a related field
Hands on ETL experience on Apache Spark or AWS Glue
Hands on experience with an AWS database, preferably Athena or RedShift
Experience using Python for data science
Strong knowledge of database design principles
Strong knowledge of serverless big data offerings on AWS
Very good understanding of CI/CD pipelines and infrastructure as code
Knowledge/experience adding quality checks to data pipelines
7+ years of experience in design, development, and maintenance of cloud-based data systems
3+ years of experience on Microsoft SQL server
Good communication skills
Ability to work independently, communicate effectively, and produce superior results
Experience working in Scrum-based methodologies Ability to write clean code and provide insights in code reviews
002_MIMLLC Morningstar Investment Management LLC Legal Entity",4.1,"Morningstar
4.1","Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1984,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
98,Principal RF Communications Systems Engineer,-1,"The RF and Navigation Subsystems Department is seeking an engineer to provide Data Link expertise to sustain, extend and grow new business.

Job Description and Tasks:
Perform/evaluate/demonstrate design concepts, performance trade studies, link budget analyses and developed capabilities for data link communication applications.
Perform hardware and software Communication Architecture trade studies.
Develop, prototype, and test data link models and communication signal processing algorithms in detailed high fidelity simulations and support hardware implementation
Test, verify and validate communication and signal processing algorithm requirements in laboratory or field test environments.
Provide engineering support through participation in project design reviews, peer reviews, briefings to internal leadership and external customers for all phases of missile communication development tasks
Support the RMD Data link product portfolio across the product development lifecycle including assisting with transition to production.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Location: Tucson, AZ

Required Skills:
Must have a minimum of 8 years professional engineering experience
Experience with RF, communications systems design, data link hardware development, algorithm development, or digital signal processing
Programming/simulation experience in MATLAB, SIMULINK, C/C++ or equivalent language
U.S Citizenship is required.
Desired Skills:
Masters degree in EE, Math or Physics in communications systems design, data link hardware development, algorithm development, and or digital signal processing.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including the ability to develop and present comprehensive technical briefings to peers and to program and customer leadership.
Experience with fixed point algorithm simulations for VHDL verification.
Experience with wireless fading model simulation.
Ability to lead multi-disciplined engineering teams in order to develop and sustain communication products across the life cycle.
Experience with cost and schedule development for large data link development efforts.
Experience with communication theory, probability theory, stochastic signal processing, RF and/or electromagnetic theory.
Required Education (including Major):
B.S. degree is required. Major: Electrical Engineering or related STEM degree.

This position requires the successful issuance, transfer or maintenance of any clearances and/or accesses necessary for the position. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement.

167285

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
99,Data and IP Engineer,$71k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data and IP Engineer
Cartesian has an exciting opportunity for a Data and IP Engineer to work on a customer migration project involved with legacy TDM Switch Decommissioning. The ideal candidate will have the following skills and experience:
5-8 years of experience with IP customer migrations on Cisco equipment
Configuration of Layer 3, VPN and BGP
Hands on experience using Cisco IOS and Junos OS
Customer configuration in Cisco 7200 series, Cisco 4200 series, GSR 12000 series, ASR 9000 series and Juniper MX480
Available and willing to work multiple nights in a week to perform “night of cut” activities during maintenance window – midnight to 6am local time where the switch is located
CCNA preferred
Experience with MetaSolv M6 to update circuit inventory is desirable but not required
ATM knowledge and hands-on working experience with CBX 500, PSAX is desirable but not required
Experience using JIRA, MS Outlook, Skype for Business, Virtual Desktop, Internet Explorer, Chrome etc. is desirable
Project Location: Remote OK

Duration: Up to 12 months",3.4,"Cartesian
3.4","Somerset, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
100,Space Systems - Mid Level - RF Algorithm Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RI&S) is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence and Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

The RF Algorithm Engineer provides the full range of systems design and analysis-related activities in support of RI&S RF programs. These activities include:
Development of mathematical algorithms for RF signal processing and calibration
Modeling and simulation of sensor physics and phenomenology to predict performance
Development of system and/or subsystem requirements
Data analysis of hardware under test or in operations
Design and development of RF waveforms
Creating technical presentations to both internal and external customers
Participating in customer and/or program technical reviews
Required Skills:
Minimum 6 years of relevant experience in systems engineering and/or algorithm development
Knowledge and experience of basic RF operations: Filtering, Pulse Compression, Calibration, and/or Antenna Array processing
Knowledge of RF signal processing techniques, experience developing advanced mathematical algorithms, analytic techniques and computer simulations
Able to effectively multi-task and prioritize actions
Proficient in Matlab, C++, Python, or related programming languages
Strong written and oral communication skills
U.S. Citizenship and ability to access to US only data systems
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position requires an active U.S. Security Clearance as of Day 1 of Employment
Active Top Secret Clearance
Desired Skills:
Experience in RF design, development, integration and test (system verification)
Experience in hardware and/or software development of embedded, real-time systems
Experience in digital pre-distortion, advanced coding and modulation, and channel equalization schemes/techniques
Experience in space-time adaptive processing
Experience in system requirements development
Experience in machine learning, artificial intelligence, deep learning, convolutional neural networks
Technical publications and/or patents
Active Top Secret clearance or SSBI
Required Education (including Major):
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Physics, Math, or related STEM discipline; advanced degrees preferred
#Space2020
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
168761

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
101,Operating Engineer,-1,"Job Description for Process Engineer*
Fore Aero, local aircraft parts supplier in the DFW Metroplex area has an immediate opening for a process engineer.

Fore Aero has special processes within their facilities that include CAD plating, powder coating, chew-film, black oxide, and paint. Fore Aero is in the process of starting up a penetrant and magna flux line.
Responsibilities*
· Responsible for designing, implementing, controlling, and optimizing manufacturing processes especially continuous improvements within the aircraft manufacturing environment across two facilities.

· Manufactures products by supervising staff, organizing, and monitoring workflow.

· Responsible for overseeing the equipment, staff, and processes on the production floor.

· Manages the processing team, oversees scheduling and day-to-day production activities in process areas.

· Primarily in charge of ensuring the process line is operational and maintaining the ongoing production of products.

· Responsible for troubleshooting any issues that arise.

· Creating process specs for processes

· Submit frozen planning to accommodate changes in processes where applicable

· Develop/design, implement and monitor equipment (optimization) for process improvements aligning with cost reduction initiatives.

· Work directly with customers, production staff and management identifying and recommending opportunities for innovative changes.

· Data collection, interpretation and writing report to support NADCAP certification accreditation.

· Develop Key Process Indicator (KPI) metrics for processes to ensure efficiency and quality remains high.

· Develop risk assessment for equipment and processes including safety within the plant for staff and environmental impacts.

· Maintains quality compliance for contractual and regulatory requirements.
Skills*
Critical/logical thinking to locate problems and assess for best solution.

Excellent computer skills -essential part of this role for reporting.

Excellent communication skills - working with people across the manufacturing process, customers, suppliers and reporting to management.
Education*
3-5 years experience as a process engineer, prefer aircraft industry/
5-10 years experience as process engineer in aircraft industry

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Process engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Aircraft Industry: 5 years (Preferred)
License/Certification:
Stationary Engineer's License (Preferred)
Company's website:
Foreaero.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Fore Machine Company,"Haltom City, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
102,Tool Designer Engineer,$51k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary: Create and develop fixture and tooling utilizing CAD software to meet or exceed our customer and quality requirements.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Create and maintain tooling and fixturing designs used for production. Studies specifications, blueprints, shop data, and consults with engineering and shop personnel to resolve design problems related to dimensional requirements, service requirements, manufacturing procedures, and cost.
Develops and maintains models and drawings for all custom tools and fixtures.
Works to resolve issues with operations to maintain high productivity. Assist with training operators with machining fundamentals.
Works with New Product and Sustaining engineering teams to identify best practices, stable processes, and implement continuous improvement projects.
Supports New Product and Sustaining engineering teams on projects as needed.
Comply with all policies and procedures.
Other duties as assigned.


Qualifications

Strong understanding of machining and assembly processes.

Experience with process excellence and process improvements concepts, organized, quality-minded attitude and determination to be “Best in Class”. Willingness to lead by example.

Engineering degree preferred.

Computer Skills

To perform this job successfully, an individual should have a working knowledge, operation and maintenance of CAD/CAM software and a working knowledge of Microsoft Office applications.

Work Environment

Working conditions are normal for a manufacturing environment. Work may require weekends and/or evening work. Dress is consistent with floor management in a manufacturing environment. Facility and grounds are tobacco free.

What You Won’t Do:
Feel stuck – we offer great opportunities to advance and learn
Get bored – we make custom products, so no day is the same
Feel like a number – we’re a close-knit bunch and always have each other’s backs
Who You Are:
A self-starter who thrives in a fast-paced environment
A quick learner who is always ready to gain depth of knowledge in manufacturing processes
A reliable worker who knows the importance of showing up when it counts
Accept assignments with open, cooperative, positive and team-oriented attitudes
Able to plan and execute plans across teams
Effective communicator, both written and verbal
What You’ll Enjoy:
Competitive wage and benefits package
Vacation, make-up time, and immediate eligibility for paid holidays
Medical, dental, and vision insurance
Life and AD&D insurance, disability insurance
Great 401k Incentive
Temperature controlled environment
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",2.4,"Cutting Instruments
2.4","Warsaw, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
103,Senior Systems/Hardware Engineer,-1,"Raytheon Technologies is seeking a Senior Systems/Hardware Engineer who feeds off the challenge of rolling up their sleeves to tackle meaningful problems each and every day, is a passionate and collaborative problem-solver who seeks and gives candid feedback, and values the chance to make an important impact. US citizenship required.

Key responsibilities for the role will include:
Recommending and implementing hardware component upgrades
Maintenance and optimization of portable data science environments for operational use
Conducting in-person training and orientation to system users
Providing on-call support
Required Skills:
6+ years of progressively responsible experience in design, implementation and administration for hardware and systems portfolios.
Expertise with selecting and integrating Commercial Datacenter Infrastructure hardware solutions based on requirements.
Proficient at building, maintaining, managing and monitoring servers running Linux.
Working technical knowledge of Linux operating systems including RHEL and Ubuntu.
Knowledge and experience of Application and Security protocols, such as Solarwinds, HBSS, Certificates & Tokens, RSA, McAfee SIEM, McAfee IPS/IDS, Rubrik Host Backup System, SAN storage, and Active Directory.
Knowledge and experience in the design, implementation and support of VMwares product line, including vSphere, vCloud, Director, View and SRM.
Experience in working with highly hardened/secure environments.
Knowledge of the concepts and techniques of server architectures, hardware, and software.
Expert knowledge of TCP/IP, DNS, IPSec, GRE tunnels, multicasting and traffic balancing techniques.
Expert understanding of Internet routing, BGP, OSPF, Tunneling, Ethernet switching, Linux, and related networking technologies.
Strong communicator with the ability to work effectively across multiple business and engineering teams.
Adjust quickly to changing priorities and make quick decisions with limited information.
High level of motivation, self-starter, ability to demonstrate effective project management and completion of complex network tasks with little guidance.
Excellent time management skills.
Existing TS/ISSA Clearance.
Highly valued skill sets:
Proficient and self-reliant in at least one modern scripting or programming language such as Python, and Go.
Familiarity with systems configuration management, orchestration, and infrastructure as code with tools such as Ansible and/or Terraform.
Familiarity with networks.
Experience with VMWare or KVM.
Experience with public cloud offerings.
Experience as a system administrator for a Splunk cluster, or similar SIEM platform.
Install, configure, and maintain a SAN.
Install, configure, and maintain Active Directory.
Education:Requires a degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM), or related STEM degree program from an Accredited University/School/College and 6 years of related work experience.
****This position is contingent upon contract award.*****
This position requires a U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization. 160769

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Herndon, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
104,Cloud Migration Engineer,-1,"Job Description:

Flexential stands for something not often found in the world of IT transformation: the human touch. The best infrastructure solutions aren’t about infrastructure, they’re about people. With a mission to accelerate customer success through people and technology, we build trusted relationships and deliver tailored, value-added and reliable solutions to demonstrate the power of people in a technical world.

Utilizing our people, values and reliable performance, Flexential is deeply invested in the success of our 4,200+ customers, who trust us to deliver core data center solutions of colocation and connectivity, as well as cloud, managed solutions and professional services. Flexential’s robust suite of assets spans 21 domestic and international markets and comprises 41 highly redundant and connectivity-rich data centers.

Investing in our people, we have an exciting opportunity for a Cloud Migrations Engineer to join our team!

Summary:

Our Professional Services division is currently seeking a Cloud Migrations Engineer. The cloud migration practice facilitates the migration of customer environments into the Flexential Cloud. The primary responsibilities of this position are:

Responsibilities:

Lead and assist with the discovery and migration of servers, systems, and data into cloud environments.
Identify and document migration / upgrade path for legacy production systems to new platform standards.
Work with Architects to develop & implement complex environments.
Document migration procedures.
Coordinate communication with internal, customer, and vendor resources and facilitate escalations of issues as appropriate.
Learn (and share) new skills through independent research, formal training, and industry events.
Troubleshoot difficult problems and recommends appropriate actions. Enlists vendor aid when needed.
Works beyond routine nature of tasks utilizing specialized knowledge and technology.
Thorough oral and written communication skills.
Provide assistance to Linux/Windows/ESX Engineers in troubleshooting
Assist in discussions with customer regarding architectural solutions and technical capabilities.
Rotational 24 x 7 on-call support with occasional travel required.
Perform other job-related duties as required.

Job Qualifications:
6+ years experience with virtualization and storage technologies.
4+ years experience with migration projects and migration tools
Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology or related field required or equivalent experience.
Technical certifications such as CISSP, MCITP, RHCT, etc. are considered a plus
Interest in learning new skills and keeping pace with changing technologies
Ability to problem solve and work with others to find the best solution
A commitment to providing our customers with 100% satisfaction.
Developed initiative, judgment and time management skills
Precision in your work and attention to all details.
Strong interpersonal and written communication skills.
Capability to work independently and self-motivate.
A commitment to providing our customers with 100% satisfaction.
Ability and drive for continued learning",3.3,"Flexential
3.3","Aurora, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
105,Senior Motor Engineer - Systems Performance,$44k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

The Senior Motor Engineer - M18 Systems Performance position will focus on our M18 platform and its long-term continuous improvement.

About Us

As an engineer for Milwaukee Tool, you will be located at our Corporate & Global Design Headquarters in Brookfield, WI, and be part of a rapidly growing company. You will work in a fast-paced environment to innovate new products as a member of a cross-functional team. One of the most rewarding aspects of the job is seeing a product you designed from concept to production in the hands of professionals. Milwaukee Tool offers generous benefits including health, dental, vision, life insurance, and 401k matching, as well as providing an excellent working environment that includes an on-site cafeteria, state of the art fitness facility, recreational sports leagues, and company outings.

Duties and Responsibilities

Provide technical leadership, direction, guidance and engineering expertise to colleagues and other cross-functional teams.
Establish and drive test regimens for components and assemblies within scope of the project and organization.
Independently track projects to ensure adherence to schedule and the Milwaukee process.
Schedule, develop agendas for, facilitate and document technical meetings and formal presentations.
Draw concise, logical, written conclusions from experiments based on data analysis.
Develop and maintain familiarity and understanding of Milwaukee's development and manufacturing processes.
Drive supplier relationships to develop part/product specifications that meet performance requirements while falling within process capabilities.
Work with and establish trusting relationships with global engineering and operations team.
Design to and qualify new designs to applicable regulatory standards such as UL, CEC, CE and ANSI.
Effectively identify and communicate issues to upper management in a clear, concise and timely manner while driving action based on urgency.
Provide expertise and engineering support on high-level complexity projects.
Identify engineering trends and drive strategies to guide the organization's technical direction.
Make clean-sheet motor designs of brushed and blushless DC motors and AC universal motors to optimize performance tailored to product requirements. Must know how these changes affect commutation, controllability, thermal performance and manufacturability.
Create new development tests to aid in design verification and failure modes.
Perform root cause failure analysis of motor test failures.
Design and make design changes to motor components while understanding how these changes affect durability and manufacturing processes.
Perform electromagnetic design changes to laminations to improve existing designs.
Create and execute test plans to verify motor performance and thermal limits.
Mentor and train junior engineers in their design and failure analysis.

Education and Experience Requirements

Required

Bachelor of Science Degree in Electrical or Mechanical Engineering. Master's degree preferred.
5+ years of experience in related design field.
Excellent problem solving skills and a hands-on attitude.
Proficient in CAD; Proficiency with FEA solvers is also preferred.
High proficiency in Microsoft Office programs, especially Excel and Power Point.
Ability to travel 10% of the time is required.
Proficient in theory of Brushless DC Motors.
Familiar with Brushed PMDC, AC Universal and Induction and Switched Reluctance motors and theory.
Have a good understanding of motor controls, battery technology, vibration and sound analysis.
Good understanding of metal stamping, steel machining, and injection molded processes.
Expert understanding of motor assembly and motor component design/manufacturing and what drives cost and durability.",4.6,"Milwaukee Electric Tool Corporation
4.6","Brookfield, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1924,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
106,Sr Data Analyst,$49k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you love data? Do you thrive on digging for info to answer complex questions and solve head-scratching problems? If you say yes, you might be part of the next generation of data scientists we’re looking for! This Sr level position will assist in prepping raw data for analysis, running and monitoring statistical models, and preparing findings for internal and external use.

The role

No two days at Suds Creative are the same, but in general you can expect to:
Establish and Manage SQL and API connections
Use statistical methods to analyze data and generate useful business reports
Work with management team to create a prioritized list of needs for each business segment
Identify and recommend new ways to gain revenue by streamlining analytic processes
Use data to create models that depict trends in the customer base and the consumer population as a whole
Work with departmental managers to outline the specific data needs for each business method analysis projects
You’re most likely to succeed in this role if you:
3-5 years in data management
Strong background in mathematics, finance and statistics
Proven track record of communicating complex findings in a digestible format
Experience with R-Studio, Rattle, Alteryx, Tableau, SPSS, or Python.
Nice to haves:
High degree of comfortability in Excel, SQL and API management
Functional knowledge of various statistical tools (Regression, ANOVA, ARIMA, Clustering, and PCA)
Create and Manage API data connections
Pull and manage SQL data
Natural curiosity, and the ability to adapt models to the available data
Benefits& pay

We will invest in your professional development and create an environment where you will be given an opportunity to grow and develop your career. We offer a competitive compensation and a wide range of benefits, including paid time off, health insurance with company HSA contribution, dental, vision, 401(k) with company match, life insurance, and disability insurance. Plus, your favorite beverage will be stocked in our refrigerator!

Work environment
At Suds Creative, we strive to foster a relaxed, friendly work environment that encourages creativity and collaboration. We are a quickly expanding company seeking someone who wants to grow alongside us as we take on new and exciting projects.
If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to access job openings or apply for a job on this site as a result of your disability. You can request reasonable accommodations by calling 1-330-645-4200.
DRB Systems, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.",3.3,"DRB
3.3","Meridian, ID",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
107,Data Analytics Engineer,-1,"Our Data Analytics Engineer will engineer elegant and performant analytic code, predominantly in Scala (and Spark), Python and/or R. You will join a growing multi-disciplinary team of Data Scientists, Engineers, and Solutions Experts with deep domain knowledge working to develop new capabilities and workflows to solve real- world client problems.

Your work will include notebook-style ad hoc analytic development (similar to tools such as Beaker, Julia, Zeppelin) within the QOMPLX:OS SaaS platform as well as true server-side analytic development. Projects may include near real-time and batch-oriented data processing for analytics and simulation modeling. As an internal user of the QOMPLX platform, your experience will inform the development of the QOMPLX product suite to improve capability, usability and performance.

Our ideal candidate will have a strong work ethic, fantastic attitude and be comfortable tackling any challenge set before him or her. We provide significant flexibility and autonomy to team members, have high expectations and expect everyone to contribute meaningfully to our broader collective goals.

Responsibilities
Engineer data pipelines that handle collection, parsing, cleansing and enrichment of terabytes/petabytes of data to meet the clients analytics needs
Developing state-of-the-art analytics ranging from ad hoc analysis to production-grade pipelines and workflows
Providing mathematical algorithms and implementations to serve the needs of data analysis workflows in QOMPLXs modular SaaS platform
Build model management frameworks for data analytics that include both statistical and machine learning models
Understanding customer business challenges and sourcing the most appropriate data sets, algorithms, and architectures (using QOMPLX OS) to solve them quickly and cost-effectively
Own the end to end model development lifecycle and establish and adhere to best practices
Working collaboratively to ensure consistent and performant approaches for analytical code that is integrated with our commercial offerings
Interacting directly with Product, Business Analysts and Customer Success teams to support live customer deployments
Qualifications
Reside in the greater Washington D.C. area or able to relocate
Bachelor's Degree or 8 years of relevant work experience
2+ years of data analytics experience that includes data engineering & analytics
Proven expertise in Machine learning algorithms, libraries & technologies including Neural Networks
Expert knowledge of Scala and/or Python
Expert knowledge of SQL and NoSQL technologies
Experience with agile development within commercial projects or elite non-commercial research
Adept at learning and applying new technologies and solving new problems
Hands on expertise in data analytic technologies such as Apache Spark, Apache Flink, MLOps Pipelines and notebooks like Polynote/Jupyter
Experience blending analytic and simulation modeling approaches to problem solving
Effective organizational skills with strong attention to detail
Strong communication skills - both written and verbal
Desirable
Experience with graph databases and cyber security
Advanced mathematical modeling skills
About QOMPLX

QOMPLX applies artificial intelligence to solve complex, real-world problems at scale. Our Human+AI operating system, QOMPLX:OS, blends capabilities ranging from data handling, analytics, and reporting to advanced algorithms, simulations, and machine learning, enabling decisions that are just-in-time, just-in-place, and just-in-context. If this type of environment sounds exciting reach out to us directly via application at https://www.QOMPLX .com/careers with a resume and cover letter.

QOMPLX offers a competitive salary, a full range of benefits, including 401(k) and medical, dental & vision coverage, flexible Personal Time Off (PTO) plan and 10+ paid holiday days per year",3.4,"QOMPLX
3.4","Tysons Corner, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
108,Mid Oracle Database Administrator,$49k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spalding Consulting, Inc. is seeking a Oracle Database Administrator, Mid in Patuxent River, MD. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is a professional services company delivering cutting-edge solutions to the Department of Defense since 2001. Our expert-level solutions include software development, information technology, program management, financial management and business intelligence services. Spalding Consulting offers competitive compensation, career development, flexible work schedules and excellent benefits.

Position Type: Full - Time

Essential Functions:
Install, configure, tune, and maintain Oracle databases
Perform capacity planning for future hardware requirements.
Monitor and optimize database performance/throughput.
Review database and application server instances for DoD Security Technical Implementation Guidelines compliance, apply fixes, and submit mitigations.
Perform routine backups, including use of Oracle's datapump export and RMAN
Refresh and restore tables and schemas
Apply security patches and bug fixes.
Create, modify, and delete database accounts.
Perform daily checks on database servers, confirming status of backups, file compression, and exports; troubleshoot any errors.
Create reports to monitor database information (including statistics on schemas, tables, indexes, and space usage) and user activity (database access, login failures, application usage, and password changes).
Other duties as assigned or required.
Qualifications and Experience:

Required:
5+ years’ experience in Oracle database administration including installations and configurations.
Must have experience with troubleshooting database errors.
CompTIA Security+ certification is required
Desired:

Experience with RMAN highly desired.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SSBI clearance desired or active Secret clearance with the ability to obtain TS/SSBI. Requirements to obtain a clearance include US Citizenship, security investigation, etc.

Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or a related discipline is preferred.

**COVID-19 Procedures: On-boarding/training will be virtual and telework maximized/permitted to the greatest extent possible, however on-boarding/training/tasking may require on-site work a few hours per week during the current COVID-19 situation. Evening/weekend on-site support for upgrades/patching may also be required. Future on-site/telework requirements/schedules may change as additional client direction is received. On-site guidance regarding social distancing, PPE (wearing masks at all times), and proper hand-washing/sanitization procedures are followed.

Spalding Consulting, Inc. is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees. We will not discriminate against any employee or applicant on the basis of race, color, ethnic origin, national origin, creed, religion, political belief, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, age, veteran status, or physical or mental disability. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and encourages minorities, women, disabled, and veterans to apply for job openings within our company.",3.9,"Spalding Consulting, Inc.
3.9","Lexington Park, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
109,Principal Systems Engineer - Chief Engineer,-1,"The Systems Engineering Center (SEC) Department is involved in all aspects of Systems Engineering across the program lifecycle of Protected Communication Systems (PCS) programs. The SEC Department supports a variety of communications systems including Secure Switching Networks, SATCOM (including AEHF, EHF, X-Band, Ka-Band, Ku-Band, C-Band, PTW), line of sight and networking for ground based, ship, submarine, and airborne platforms. We are seeking a recognized technical leader committed to creating innovative and cost-effective solutions for our communications systems.

JOB SUMMARY

Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) is seeking a talented engineer to join the SEC Department as a Program Chief Engineer. The Chief Engineer (CE) is the single engineering leadership point of contact and is responsible for all engineering execution of a program including technical, schedule, and financial performance.

ROLE AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Primary program engineering leadership POC with the customer counterpart
Establish and manage a product vision, strategy and goals to align the Program with the Customer and facilitate conflict resolution
Support growth opportunities to turn into captured new business
Responsible for the entirety of engineering execution including technical budget, cost, schedule and metrics
Determines & monitors technical priorities to meet cost, schedule & performance for the entire program
Establishes and maintains the program technical baseline, ensuring the product is optimized to meet the contractual needs and can be executed within program budget and schedule
Monitor and trend staffing against planned work; proactively engage with Engineering functions to ensure adequate resource assignment.
Ensure effective use of independent reviews and achieve on-time completion of all Program Engineering reviews
Responsible for the Earned Value and/or financial management of the engineering content on a program.
Ensures proper Engineering Risk and Opportunity management (ensures Eng risks are captured, mitigation plans in place across IPTs)
Provide cross-IPT technical leadership and coordination - Ensure Engineering leads assigned to program are engaged in all aspects of their program
Encourage a diverse workforce by promoting diverse opinions and thought processes and through staffing
Required Skills
Minimum 8 years of experience in Systems, Software or Hardware engineering
Must have proven leadership skills and behavior
Working knowledge of Earned Value Management System (EVMS), IMS, & IMP tools or equivalent for managing programs
Demonstrated ability to interact effectively with multidisciplinary teams of system design professionals including electrical, mechanical, software and logistics engineers
U.S. Citizenship status as this position requires the ability to obtain DoD Secret U.S. Security Clearance within one year of start date and will require the ability to access US only data systems
Desired Skills
Engineering experience on development or integration programs
Capability in leading an IPT or cross-function teams in program execution
Strong knowledge in proposal development, particularly Basis of Estimate development, and other contract deliverable artifacts
Skilled presenter with prior responsibility for dealing with customers, management, technical staff, and internal / external organizations
Experience with accountability; responsibility for prioritizing work tasks and customer requirements across multiple teams
Team building and motivational skills - training and developing team in disciplined engineering processes,
Proven leadership skills and behaviors
Self-motivated and capable of performing tasks with minimal oversight.
Strong communication, time management, and interpersonal skills
Risk and opportunity management, scope management,
Knowledge of Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) Engineering products, technologies, and processes
Active DOD Secret security clearance
Required Education
Bachelor of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) from an accredited educational institution (i.e. Engineering, Physics, Mathematics, etc.)
Desired Education
Master of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) from an accredited educational institution (i.e. Engineering, Physics, Mathematics, etc.)
169586

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
110,Senior MS&T Engineer,$68k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:

Catalent hires people with a passion to make a difference to the health of millions of people globally. Your expertise, coupled with Catalent’s advanced technologies and collaboration with thousands of innovative pharmaceutical, biotech and healthcare companies, will help bring life-enhancing products to the people you know and love. Your talents , ideas and passion are essential to our mission; to develop, manufacture and supply products that help people live better, healthier lives. Interested in learning more about life at Catalent? Start here

Position Summary

The Senior MS&T Engineer will support GMP manufacturing operations as a project leader in the successful transfer and start-up of clinical drug substance and drug product. The Senior MS&T Engineer is actively engaged in the translation of client and Catalent Process Development information for implementation of cGMP processes. The individual will serve as a subject matter expert (SME) for biologic Upstream/Downstream Processes. Success in this position requires the ability to work hands-on in a cleanroom, and the ability to collaborate in a cross-functional, fast-paced environment.

The Role

Partner with GMP manufacturing and Process Development project teams as the MS&T project lead & SME in one or more of the following areas: cell culture, purification and/or fill & finish processes
Serve as team leader for process and product investigations and author investigation reports
Act as MS&T tech transfer project leader form both Catalent process Development and external clients into GMP manufacturing
Author tech transfer documents, Master Production Records and SOPs to support GMP manufacturing projects
Working closely with Catalent Management to ensure MS&T project milestones are achieved and attending reoccurring and adhoc meetings as required
Collect and trend process data for external (client) and internal review
Assist with training GMP Manufacturing staff on Client processes
Evaluate and recommend equipment for client projects

The Candidate

B.S. Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Biology, Life Sciences or related field with 8+ years of experience in the pharmaceutical or biotechnology industry -OR-
M.S Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Biology, Life Sciences or related field with 4+ years of experience
Knowledge/expertise relevant to protein and virus manufacturing in a cGMP environment
Experience in one or more of the following manufacturing areas: cell and/or microbial culture, protein purification and fill/finish
Experience in a CMO environment or in a similar client-customer based work environment is a plus

Key leadership attributes

Leads with Integrity and Respect
Delivers Results
Demonstrates Business Acumen
Fosters Collaboration and Teamwork
Champions Change
Engages and Inspires
Coaches and Develops

Position Benefits

Potential for career growth within an expanding team
Defined career path and annual performance review & feedback process
Cross-functional exposure to other areas of within the organization
Medical, Dental, Vision, and 401K are all offered from day one of employment
19 days of paid time off annually + 7 paid holidays
Gain experience in the cutting-edge gene therapy space
Tuition Reimbursement

Catalent offers rewarding opportunities to further your career! Join the global drug development and delivery leader and help us bring over 7,000 life-saving and life-enhancing products to patients around the world. Catalent is an exciting and growing international company where employees work directly with pharma, biopharma and consumer health companies of all sizes to advance new medicines from early development to clinical trials and to the market. Catalent produces more than 70 billion doses per year, and each one will be used by someone who is counting on us. Join us in making a difference.

Catalent is committed to the health and safety of its employees, visitors and the customers and patients we serve. As a result of the global pandemic, we have modified many of our recruitment and on-boarding processes to maintain everyone’s safety. The Human Resources teams will communicate all necessary safety processes and procedures throughout each stage.

personal initiative. dynamic pace. meaningful work.
Visit www.catalent.com/careers to explore career opportunities.

C atalent is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation or gender identity. If you require reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process due to a disability, you may submit your request by sending an email, and confirming your request for an accommodation and include the job number, title and location to DisabilityAccommodations@catalent.com . This option is reserved for individuals who require accommodation due to a disability. Information received will be processed by a U.S. Catalent employee and then routed to a local recruiter who will provide assistance to ensure appropriate consideration in the application or hiring process.

Notice to Agency and Search Firm Representatives: Catalent Pharma Solutions (Catalent) is not accepting unsolicited resumes from agencies and/or search firms for this job posting. Resumes submitted to any Catalent employee by a third party agency and/or search firm without a valid written & signed search agreement, will become the sole property of Catalent. No fee will be paid if a candidate is hired for this position as a result of an unsolicited agency or search firm referral. Thank you.",3.2,"Catalent Pharma Solutions
3.2","Rockville, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,2007,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
111,Network Systems Engineer/ Clearance Required (TS),-1,"Onsite Network Support Engineer (OSE) with current Top Secret/SCI Clearance.

Job Description:

US Citizenship Required

We are currently seeking an Onsite Support Engineer to work in this fast-paced technology environment with world-class engineers and customers on cutting-edge technologies.
Primary responsibility is to ensure that the customer always has access to the critical data to support their business objectives. A very broad knowledge and a love for learning is required for this position from server and OS support, through multi-tiered application understanding, voice/video, VMware, Cloud, security and big data.
Self-motivation is required as this is a very proactive position but you must also have proven success working
as part of a team. If you're eager to apply your talent and drive, you will quickly discover that you can make a
difference. Help us grow our team, the business and your customers business.

Essential Responsibilities:
• Work with customers to troubleshoot and resolve complex network and product issues
• Interface with our world-class support, development and SQA teams to identify and to resolve
product issues
• Utilizing NETSCOUT's Knowledge Management database, research & develop technical tips and solutions
• Advise customer on network management best practices using NETSCOUT product suite
Required Experience
• Prior Military experience or a Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science/Network Security or equivalent discipline
• Minimum of 6 years in network management supporting external customers
• 2 plus years in critical and managed customer care
• Proven expertise in customer relationship and management
• Network Management experience in environment preferred
• Experience working remotely, but cooperatively with HQ
• Demonstrated ability to identify and resolve complex network problems
• Cisco (CCNA or equivalent military training minimum, CCNP preferred)
• Linux Command Line knowledge (Red Hat preferred)
• Knowledge of Windows and Unix operating system environments
• Ability to write technical articles outlining problems resolution and troubleshooting steps contribute knowledge to the knowledge base)
• Ability to multi-task with strong attention to detail
• Project Management Certification a plus (PMP) -Server Hardware Support
Certification a plus (Dell DOSD)
• VMware Certification a plus

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identification, disability or protected veteran status.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $120,000.00 - $160,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Network Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.axiomtech.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Axiom Technical Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
112,Space Systems Chief Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you. Systems Engineering Center is seeking a Space Systems Chief Engineer with domain knowledge in EO/IR systems, RF systems, Space, and capable of leading a technical team. Our team is developing the next generation of space systems architecture, space systems, and space mission payloads. We would like to hear from you if you have the initiative and qualifications in Space Developments and Architecture.

Job Description:
In this position, the candidate will be accountable for the technical execution of the program and for supporting a cost-effective system solution. This senior technical position requires a top performer with strong space systems engineering, RF systems, and EO/IR payload domain knowledge. It also requires the ability to work in a multi-disciplined, cross functional team in the execution of program goals. This role will require regular engagement with the customer as well as with internal Engineering teams, and active participation in customer and program technical reviews. The Chief Engineer will serve as the key technical interface to the customer to determine the technical solution to their requirements. The candidate also plans, organizes, and leads technical reviews, supports the day-to-day operations, provides suggestions for technical decisions and designs, and interfaces directly with the Program Manager. The candidate will be responsible for meeting all technical requirements on the program.

Responsibilities of the Chief Engineer include:
• Provide technical leadership on space payload development in both RF and EO domains
• Develop the technical vision and strategies of the program
• Develop integration activities
• Implement the technical vision and strategies of the program
• Provide project technical leadership and coordination
• Lead program readiness and design reviews
• Coordinate closely with the Program Manager regarding budget and schedule
• Provide engineering program execution and technical leadership, including on proposal development
• Provide engineering inputs to gates and independent reviews.
• Establish and maintain the program technical baseline, ensuring the product meets contractual needs, and establish technical baseline artifacts
• Provide technical support in developing and maintaining the analysis to predict overall system performance
• Prepare and deliver technical presentations to both internal and external customers
• Provide engineering authority to all decisions impacting product integrity, system performance, and system functionality.
• Coordinate, write, and deliver technical presentations to both internal and external customers
• Mentor more junior engineers

Required Skills:
• Minimum 12 years of experience in either systems engineering, space development, or space payload architecture development.
• Experience developing space systems
• Experience in space architecture development
• Ability to work within a fast paced environment
• Experience with requirements development, analysis, verification and validation
• Demonstrated engineering leadership experience and proven track record
• Must have excellent communication skills (written, verbal, and presentation), with prior experience in dealing with customers, management, technical staff, and internal / external organizations.
• Experience leading teams and IPTs, using tools and metrics in managing activities, and interfacing with senior program and functional management
• U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an Active DoD Top Secret U.S. Security Clearance as of Day 1 of employment
• Ability to access to US only data systems

Desired Skills:
• Intimately experienced developing all aspects of space development
• MBSE experience in its applicability to Space development
• Agile development experience
• Experience with behavior driven development (or test driven development)
• Technical experience with space systems and ground systems
• Experience in deploying a rigorous Integrated Product Development Process
• Experience participating in critical design reviews
• Experience in cost/schedule development and management (EVMS)
• Skilled in proposal preparation, cost and schedule estimation and technical documentation related to contract deliverable items
• Proposal support experience including writing Basis of Estimates (BOEs)
• Experience in performing Mission Architecture & CONOPS analysis
• System level architecture & modeling experience
• Familiarity with requirements management tool such as Dynamic Object-Oriented Requirements System (DOORS)
• TS/SCI clearance

Required Education:
BS/BA in Engineering, Sciences, Mathematics or other STEM discipline

Desired Education:
MS/MA in Engineering, Sciences, Mathematics or other STEM discipline

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an Active DoD Top Secret U.S. Security Clearance as of Day 1 of employment
#Space2020 163151

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
113,Geotechnical Project Engineer,-1,"McClure Engineering is searching for a proven Geotechnical Project Engineer to be a key leader on dynamic projects. The Geotechnical Project Engineer (PE) is expected to be a strong promoter of McClure’s core values, vision, and mission and embody those values in all interactions with clients and team members. This individual is responsible for maintaining solid knowledge of engineering principles and codes to ensure all projects are completed properly.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities*
A Project Engineer must possess the technical skills required to successfully move a project from conception to completion. Additionally, this key role must also possess the interpersonal skills needed to assess the client’s satisfaction and mentor less experienced members of the team.

· Provide engineering and consulting services across all McClure business groups such as transportation, water and land development as well as direct service to clients.

· Prepare proposals and cost estimates, track and evaluate project progress, budgets, and recommend changes.

· Prepare/review site investigation and exploration plans including geophysical testing if needed.

· Provide on-site field investigation support, including preparing soil and rock core logs.

· Assign, review, and evaluate laboratory, field data for inclusion in reports.

· Perform engineering analysis, calculations, and recommendations using geotechnical engineering principles and experience, design and develop plans and specifications.

· Prepare, write and review geotechnical reports for the services provided.

· Review drawings and construction to assure compliance with plans and specifications.

· Research and resolve design and construction problems.

· Ability to communicate complex engineering issues and concepts to technical and non-technical clients and project teams including benefit/risk/cost/schedule.

· Familiarity with Iowa DOT geotechnical design process.

· Responsible for managing detailed phases of projects with moderate size and complexity with limited supervision.

· Perform quality assurance/ quality control review of proposals and technical work submitted by others.

· Evaluate project risks and recommend appropriate solutions/mitigation measures.

· Serve as a technical adviser/mentor for junior-level project team members.

· As the lead geotechnical project engineer, be able to interact directly with client and project team on developing scope of services, communicating project progress and findings and recommendations.

· Participate actively in marketing, sales and business development and growing the geotechnical engineering discipline within McClure.

· Work under the supervision of an Authorized Project Reviewer.
Educational and/or Experience Requirements*
· Minimum of a Bachelor of Science Degree in Civil Engineering or related field

· Master's degree in Geotechnical Engineering preferred

· Professional Engineering License in IA, MO, KS or ability to obtain PE within 6 months of accepting position.

· 5-8+ years of experience desired with an emphasis on geotechnical engineering.

· Familiarity and proficiency with gINT, geotechnical software.

· Must be knowledgeable and current with industry standards and developments in the field of geotechnical engineering including subsurface investigation techniques, ground improvement technologies and alternative materials.

· Must have knowledge of construction practices to be able to evaluate recommendations and ensure constructability.

· Ability and comfortability with travel as needed.

McClure provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

An Equal Opportunity Employer - women and minorities are encouraged to apply.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Company's website:
www.mecresults.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"McClure
3.5","Clive, IA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
114,Data Engineer,-1,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
115,Plant Engineer (5+ years of Mechanical/Electrical experience),-1,"MDG is looking for a Plant Engineer who has 5+ years of experience in installing and maintaining plant floor mechanical and electrical systems. The Plant Engineer assures that equipment used in the day to day manufacturing and blending of bioaugmentation products are performing in optimal condition and actively participates in the implementation of new equipment and processes.

Microbial Discovery Group (MDG) is an R&D driven microbial cultivation and fermentation company. MDG provides bioaugmentation products and solutions for a multitude of industries. Microbial Discovery Group excels in new product innovation, customer focused manufacturing and technical support expertise.
Responsibilities*
· Ensure the proper operation of the following plant equipment:

· Bioreactors (fermentation vessels)

· Centrifuges

· Refrigeration Equipment

· Freeze Dryers

· Spray Dryers

· Boilers

· Chillers

· Air Compressors

· Blenders

· Pin Mills / Grinders

· Troubleshoots and isolates equipment problems (mechanical and electrical)

· Works with maintenance personnel to implement repairs while minimizing impact to production

· Establishes and adheres to preventive maintenance schedule

· Documents all maintenance and repair activities

· Interpret, understand, and assist in the development of technical documents such as P&ID, Equipment Lists, Logic Diagrams, and Schematics.

· Coordinate with outside mechanical and electrical contractors to perform work outside of MDG core competencies

· Oversee installation and commissioning of new plant floor equipment

· Integrate existing standalone equipment into corporate network for the purpose of remote monitoring and control

· Perform PLC and HMI software updates when required

· Generate documentation such as User Requirements Specification, Functional Specifications, Hardware Design Specifications, and Software Design Specifications for new MDG projects

· Develop interface to collect production data to a network database (Access or SQL Server)

· Work closely with Quality Control department to assure compliance with Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP).

· Evaluate current and emerging technologies for possible use at MDG
Will be required to perform other duties as requested, directed or assigned
Job Qualification Requirements*
· Bachelor of Science or Master of Science degree in Electrical, Mechanical, or Chemical Engineering

· 5+ years of experience in installing and maintaining plant floor mechanical and electrical systems

· Manufacturing, fermentation or chemical product operations experience highly desirable

· Keen troubleshooting and analytical skills

· Experience with industrial equipment such as steam generators, refrigeration, and air compressors

· Knowledge of industrial components and instrumentation

· Knowledge of industrial computer systems, PLC’s, HMI’s, motor controls, and power technologies

· Knowledge of specialized equipment such as bioreactors, centrifuges, and freeze dryers is desired

· AutoCAD familiarity

· Demonstrates proficient computer skills, especially with MS Office and database applications

· Expertise with biotechnology operations including fermentation and CIP/SIP is preferred

· Demonstrates proficiency in basic math skills

· Ability to complete projects within specified timelines

· Excellent attention to detail and accuracy

· Outstanding organizational skills and ability to multitask in a fast-paced environment

· Self motivated. Ability to work effectively with minimal supervision

· Excellent communication skills (oral & written)

· Ability to work well with others

· Shift: Primarily 1st shift, but can be variable depending on equipment needs. Occasional weekend work.

Information:
To learn more about MDG, please visit our website: mdgbio.com
To apply for a position, please click the ""apply"" button below and follow instructions to apply through Indeed, please then also copy and paste the link below to apply directly to our website application process. This will also include taking the culture index survey. The culture index survey helps with the process of finding great people. Those who do not complete the culture index will not be considered. Thank you for your consideration.
https://www.cindexinc.com/c/6CE2E6

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Weekends
Experience:
Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
Multiple locations",4.1,"Microbial Discovery Group
4.1","Franklin, WI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
116,Redhat Linux System Engineer,$76k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Linux System Engineer


As a Linux Systems Engineer you will configure, integrate, and support internal network environments. The type of underlying components that support the infrastructure typically include Red Hat Enterprise Linux.

Key Responsibilities:
Contribute to the maintenance of existing and future platforms
Provide support to existing and future subscribers
Effectively and efficiently troubleshoot the system and the infrastructure that supports it
Routinely interact with software developers and data teams
Provide input to develop performance/security management of the platform
Perform limited property accountability functions
Ability to communicate both written and orally to customers and team members
Ability to perform duties with minimal supervision
Basic Qualifications:
An active security clearance U.S. Citizenship
Ability to secure and maintain an active DoD Security Clearance.
Bachelor’s degree in Electrical, Software, Systems, Network, or Industrial Engineering; Computer Science, Information Technology or Assurance, Cybersecurity, Information Systems, or other related Scientific/Technical discipline from an accredited University.
10+ years working experience with systems administration on Linux, UNIX, ideally RHEL
Experience with VMware
Experience in scripting using BASH, CSH, PERL, Python, or other scripting languages
Experience with basic networking
Fundamental knowledge of cloud technologies
Security + or DoD required certification or ability to obtain required certification
Preferred Experience:
Certificates for Linux, VMWare, Apple
SeLinux
Experience with Solarwinds, Splunk, or other similar IDS/IPS devices
Familiarity with DoD/Navy IT policies and regulations",2.5,"Network Security Systems Plus
2.5","Charleston, SC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
117,Senior Software Engineer,$61k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"GeneDx is a rapidly growing CAP and CLIA certified diagnostic genetic testing laboratory for molecular genetics. Our historic mission has been to make clinical diagnostic testing available for people with genetic conditions and their families. We apply cutting edge technologies that provide a wide array of molecular genetic diagnostic tests, including whole exome sequencing and next-generation sequencing panels. We specialize in genetic testing for rare hereditary disorders, but also test for common disorders. To learn more about GeneDx, please visit our website at www.genedx.com.

Role: Sr. Software Engineer

Essential Duties include:

Creates analytic solutions for clinical genetic data, including NGS, WES, and WGS sequence data; copy-number and structural variant detection; genotype-phenotype correlation
Conducts projects in support of R&D and clinical production.

Qualifications include:

MS or PhD degree in Bioinformatics or a related field
5+ years bioinformatics development experience
Proficiency in a major scripting language (Perl, Ruby, or Python)
Basic knowledge of statistics (machine learning, data mining, hypothesis testing) and R
Working knowledge of relational databases (PostgreSQL, MySQL, or similar)
Working knowledge of command-line Linux, shell scripting, and grid computing (SLURM, SGE, LSF, or similar)
Experience with Git, SVN or other version control software preferred
Experience developing software in a team environment preferred
Software testing and validation experience preferred
Experience with NGS data and related tools (Samtools, GATK, etc.) and other genetic assay data (e.g. aCGH)

Benefits include:

Paid Time Off (PTO)
Health, dental, vision, life insurance, LT/ST disability plans
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Health Savings Account (HSA)
401K retirement savings plan with company match
Employee Discounts
Regular performance appraisals
Many promotions from within
Business casual dress code",2.8,"GeneDx
2.8","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
118,Senior System Safety Engineer,-1,"Please apply at the link below to be considered*
https://www.linkedin.com/careersite/aptresearch

APT is currently seeking a Senior Systems Safety Engineer in Dahlgren, VA.

This position will lead and perform system safety engineering efforts, to include:
Performing tasks focused on development of system safety analysis by identifying, documenting, and tracking resolutions of safety anomalies; coordinating, developing, and executing comprehensive technical data packages, Safety Assessment Reports, Preliminary Hazard List, Preliminary Hazard Analysis, Subsystem Hazard Analysis, System Hazard Analysis, Operating and Support Hazard Analysis, Health Hazard Assessment, System Requirement Hazard Analysis, Fault Tree Analysis, and Failure Mode and Effects Analysis
Developing and coordinating presentations
Supporting various boards and technical panels, including the Weapon System Explosives Safety Review Board (WSESRB) and its Technical Panels, Laser Safety Review Board, and Department of Defense and the Department of Navy Insensitive Munitions Reviews
_This position is contingent upon contract award._

Required Minimum Education/Experience:
Education: A Bachelor of Science (BS) degree from an accredited college or university in an engineering, scientific, business, or technical discipline; or US Naval operational experience at the E7 level or higher.
Experience: Seven (7) years of professional or operational experience in systems engineering for DoD weapon system programs with two (2) years of qualified experience as a System Safety Engineer.
Security Clearance Requirement (applicants selected for positions requiring a Security Clearance will be subject to a security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information): Secret or higher

APT is an employee-owned company specializing in conducting safety analyses for the U.S. Government. APT offers competitive salaries, advancement opportunities, and excellent benefits.

APT is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. APT provides equal employment opportunity for all persons, in all facets of employment. APT maintains a drug-free workplace and performs background checks. We encourage veterans, disabled veterans, and disabled individuals to apply for any open position for which they feel they are qualified.

Accessibility

APT is committed to expanding access to employment for people with disabilities and disabled veterans. If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, and your disability prevents you from applying, please advise what reasonable accommodation APT can provide to assist you in applying for one of our open positions.

Reasonable accommodations are considered on a case-by-case basis. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation for applying for a specific posted position will be responded to. Requests will be kept confidential and shared strictly on a need-to-know basis.

Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. All resumes will be treated in strictest confidence.

HM: JR

Requisition Number: 2020-40

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Engineering: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.7,"APT Research, Inc.
3.7","Dahlgren, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
119,Data Scientist-Junior,$44k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 years experience and a BA/BS degree

Responsible for assisting more senior positions and/or performing functional duties under the oversight of more senior positions.

Current TS/SCI Clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
120,Mechanical/Systems Engineer - Healthcare,$39k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Mechanical Systems Engineer

Thank you for your interest in St. Onge Company! We are proud to have established a reputation as a premiere supply chain engineering consulting partner for some of the world’s biggest brands for more than 35 years. Our people are what has made everything possible. Taking care of our employees and our clients are our biggest priorities. In response to COVID-19, we have taken a close look at our review process to ensure that we do what is best for our most important asset, our people. We appreciate your patience as our processes may include virtual or other creative solutions and may make the interview process longer than usual.

Job Description:

For nearly 20 years, our Healthcare Services team has provided innovative solutions to some of the most well-known healthcare institutions in the world. This team has seen incredible growth in recent years and we are continuing to hire exceptional talent! If you want to be part of an organization that tackles interesting projects, offers incredible opportunity for career growth, and will give you the chance to solve complex problems that directly impact patient lives, then you should apply today!

Our Mechanical Systems Engineers design innovative solutions for the growing needs of hospitals specifically in the area of material transport. We are constantly looking for creative ways to move people and supplies in, around, and out of hospitals in the most efficient and effective manner possible.

St. Onge Company is currently seeking a Mechanical Systems Engineer that has experience in solving complex problems related to material handling. By utilizing a data driven approach to problem solving, we are capable of creating innovative solutions that are on the cutting-edge of hospital design.

You might like this job if:
You are self-starter, eager to learn, excited by challenging work, and thrive individually and as part of a team. We have an incredible working environment that promotes career and personal growth.
You are a passionate problem solver who puts the client first and has a strong desire to make a lasting impact.
You are excited to grow personally and professionally by exhibiting our core values: creativity, competence, integrity, hard work, wisdom, and generosity.
Responsibilities:
The Mechanical Systems Engineer works as part of project execution teams to ensure on-time, on-budget delivery that exceeds client expectations
The Mechanical Systems Engineer will serve as a subject matter expert during the planning, design, and construction of material handling systems for healthcare and hospital facilities through the architectural process
System examples include: Automated Guided Vehicles to transport carts throughout the facility, gravity based chute systems for trash and linen removal; pneumatic systems for automated waste and linen removal, and Pneumatic Tube Systems for transport of small materials throughout the hospital campus, among others
Analyze the flow of materials and information through healthcare facilities by applying a wide range of quantitative tools and models
Education & Experience:
Minimum of Bachelors of Science degree in Mechanical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Supply Chain Management, or similar is highly preferred
3+ years of progressive experience with material handling systems
Knowledge of healthcare or hospital operations and/or healthcare or hospital facility design preferred
A high level of proficiency in MS Excel, Access, PowerPoint, and Word
Possess analytically sound problem-solving skills
Outstanding oral and written communication abilities
Think creatively and independently to solve challenging problems
Ability to manage multiple work assignments and meet tight deadlines
Capable of traveling to client locations as dictated by the project schedule
Other:
This position is located in York, PA.
Travel is required, typically 30-50%.
M/F/Vets/Disability",4.6,"St. Onge Company
4.6","York, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
121,Sr. Solutions Engineer (Bilingual - Spanish) |,-1,"POSITION: BILINGUAL SENIOR SOLUTIONS ENGINEER (SPANISH)*
LOCATION: WESTERN USA*
WHO WE ARE*
Acuant is a leading B2B provider of identity verification technology. We are revolutionizing the way consumers transact by allowing businesses to quickly and seamlessly identify who they are doing business on any platform while protecting both parties. Join a global team that works with leaders in all industries to delivers best in class technology.

Acuant's Trusted Identity Platform provides complete identity verification based on your level of risk so you can build your business with valid customers. Powered by AI for the highest speed and accuracy, omnichannel products enable seamless customer experiences to increase conversions in the digital economy. Scalable, secure and compliant (KYC, AML & GDPR), Acuant allows businesses to establish trusted identities from any location in seconds. www.acuant.com
WHAT WE LOOK FOR*
Do you like understanding how cloud and mobile products work and finding solutions for challenging problems. Do you enjoy connecting with customers and helping them improve their business? Are you knowledgeable, resourceful and show initiative? These are the qualities of an idea candidate for the Senior Solution Engineer position at Acuant.

The Senior Solution Engineer is a member of professionals who participate in the sales cycle by working with prospects and customers to clearly articulate Acuant's technology and use cases associated with it. Along with significant (5+ years) experience in a technical pre-sales or customer-facing role, an understanding of the Enterprise sales cycle and its corresponding technical requirements are required to be effective in this position.
Bachelor’s degree (or higher), with exposure to computer science, math, engineering, or equivalent practical experience
5+ years' experience in a Solutions Engineering or Pre/Post-Sales role, or demonstrated success in a related field
Fully bilingual in English and Spanish
Experience with API either Restful or SOAP
Basic understanding of SDKs
Basic understanding of C#, JavaScript, Java
Basic understanding of relational data base management systems (RDBMS) and how they integrate with applications
Experience with physical and virtualized infrastructure, operating systems, and software configuration
Overall technical savvy with demonstrated ability in work in a small team setting, owning complex technical projects with international scope
Experience managing and collaborating on short-term implementation projects, with documented results
Lateral and logical troubleshooting, follow-through and problem-solving skills, resourcefulness, attention to detail, and communication skills, both verbal and written
Customer Focus - Responds effectively to needs expressed by customers
Must be able to present effectively in front of groups, both technically and non-technically oriented. Also requires ability to understand business problems of C-level executives; discuss these problems; present and prepare solutions
Must be able to travel 25%
WHAT YOU BE RESPONSIBLE FOR*
Understand and communicate solution messaging at both a technical and business level
Provide industry expertise and guidance to clients using Restful APIs
Become a Subject Matter Expert (SME) for Acuant's Cloud and Mobile products
Remove Sales obstacles by providing internal consulting, training, and knowledge support
Partner with Sales to build long-term account relationships, that deliver ongoing business value
Help complete technical sections for RFP/RFI/RFQ responses for assigned accounts
Collaborate with internal Product and Engineering teams to diagnose and resolve problems
Articulate market requests and needs to Engineering and Product organizations in clear, concise manner
Contribute towards solution design and technical documentation
Remain current in industry and technology trends
HOW WE VALUE OUR EMPLOYEES*
You will always be heard, decisions are collaborative
Competitive compensation
Challenging and rewarding work
Generous benefits package
Work with an incredible team of smart and mission-driven people
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Experience:
sdk: 3 years (Preferred)
solutions engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
api: 3 years (Preferred)
Language:
Spanish (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Required travel:
25% (Required)
Application Question:
Will you now, or in the future, require employment visa sponsorship?
Paid Training:
Yes
Management:
Team Lead
Typical start time:
8AM
Typical end time:
5PM
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
acuant.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/acuantcorp/
Work Remotely:
Yes",5.0,"Acuant
5.0","Phoenix, AZ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Security Services,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
122,Data Engineer,-1,"The Data Engineer will play a key role in designing Framework’s creative use of data through leading the development of Framework’s data warehouse and initial data integration initiatives. We have a range of valuable data assets which are growing in volume and scope, we need to use them effectively and efficiently. The Data Engineer will serve as the technical lead for developing Framework’s internal insights and analytics data warehouse. They will identify critical initiatives and work with the Business Insights team to plan out their implementation. They will also act as a technical expert for the rest of the Business Insights team, helping them learn new skills and improve their own workflow. This work will support Framework’s development of core data analytics tools and products for internal stakeholders.

We are looking for a collaborative and open-minded team player who has experience implementing technical solutions as part of a greater data analytics strategy. The ideal candidate can demonstrate a commitment to continuous growth and use creative problem solving to assess how Framework’s data architecture can prepare for the future. This position requires humble confidence with self-starter inclinations and a proven ability to own solutions from start to finish. This is a mid-level position with great opportunities for professional development and growth.

This position reports to the Business Insights Manager and is located in the Greater Boston Area, with offices in Boston, MA.
What You’ll Do: First 90 Days
Work with Data Analyst to understand current technology solutions used to meet critical analytics needs.
Work with analysts to identify immediate risks of existing data infrastructure, prioritize key opportunities for development and actionable tasks
Collaborate extensively with key stakeholder teams such as marketing, product and engineering to understand business logic of key data and identify opportunities for optimization through data integrations
Implement workflows and technical work management systems that support iterative development, task prioritization and requirement documentation.
Work with Business Insights manager and CTO to begin developing a road map for our data warehouse strategy and self-service business intelligence.
What You’ll Do: Team Leadership
Manage data system integrations used for analytics across Framework. This includes monitoring and expanding Framework’s ETL and translating business needs into technical specifications.
Serve as the technology lead for Framework’s data warehouse development.
Manage communication of Framework’s technology capabilities and limitations. Serve as our subject matter expert on this within the team and as a voice of reason in collaborative efforts.
Participate in the Business Insights team’s continued growth as a technology team documenting knowledge gains clearly, mentoring younger staff and supporting growth of direct reports and team members.
What You’ll Bring
Technical experience: Demonstrated knowledge of data warehouse architecture, integration development and ETL implementation. Exposure to service orientated architecture concepts, familiarity with best practices for analytics data warehouses. Experience with programming languages is preferred. Data modeling for business intelligence tools or a curiosity to learn more is a plus.
Development experience: Success in implementing data engineering best practices, workflow structures and task execution principles. Demonstrated ability to set requirements, test solutions, identify milestones and meet deadlines.
Business perspective focus: Ability to consider business lead perspectives while making technical decisions. Experience translating technical capabilities to business outcomes and reverse.
Knowledge management skills: Self led prioritization of knowledge management skills such as documentation, knowledge sharing and training others at various levels.
Maker and Manager: Ability to dive into the weeds of the work while working with Business Insights team colleagues to tackle problems together. Desire to grow into a management role.
Ability to develop, articulate and implement a larger vision while identifying the intricate work required to achieve success.
An orientation toward learning and exploration with an interest in learning from and sharing with others.
Ability to work effectively with remote teammates.
A strong sense of empathy towards different perspectives and an ability to collaborate with compromise.
Passion for efficiency in technical solutions and ability to achieve iteratively.
Preferred Qualifications and Experience
Bachelor’s degree, preferably in Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field; or comparable professional experience
3-5 years of experience in data warehouse development and ETL design, implementation and data maintenance
1-2 years of experience working closely with analytics teams in an analyst role
Experience with tools within various levels of the analytics stack, including but not limited to cloud data warehouses, ETL (Fivetran), data modeling, APIs, cloud services, etc.
Our vision inspires you!
About the Team
The Data Engineer will be a key member of a rapidly evolving Business Insights team. The Business Insights team paves the path for Framework’s data driven decision making aspirations and develops the technology tools that will be crucial along the journey. From key Framework products to internal customer success systems, the Business Insights team stewards the collection of data across the company and delivery of key business insights for internal and external use.

Job Classification
This is a full-time, exempt position.

Work Environment and Physical Demands
This job requires the routine use of standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, and filing cabinets. It requires the ability to speak and hear in person, over the phone, and in settings where there are groups of people. Occasional travel is required, including overnight travel for up to four days at a time and travel via airplane.

What We’ll Offer You / Benefits of Working for Framework
The Framework team is a group of thoughtful, creative, and caring human beings. Our company boasts employees that hail from several different countries and speak a multitude of languages. We are collaborators who value each other’s differences and are committed to bringing our authentic selves to work each day, so that we might design quality products for humans that need them. We offer a suite of benefits designed to support our employees’ thriving in the workplace, including but not limited to:

• Flexible Work Schedules
• Remote Work
• Health Plans Incl. Dental and Vision
• 401(k) Savings Plan
• 11 Paid Holidays Incl. Election Day
• Open Vacation
• 52 Weeks Paid Parental Leave
• Personal and Professional Growth Opportunities
• Opportunity to help build and deliver cutting edge, socially driven products from scratch!

About the Company
Framework is a startup social enterprise built on a simple idea: every homebuyer should have access to unbiased information about the mortgage process and feel knowledgeable about the responsibilities of owning a home. And more—it should be easy and affordable.

We are proudly pro-homeownership and believe it is a uniquely accessible and powerful way for people to build long term financial security. We make it easier for people to do this by providing the tools we believe will lead prospective homebuyers into homes that improve their quality of life, giving them the space to grow into their future, and gain value over time.

From our state-of-the art homebuyer education course that has helped over 700K people into their homes since its inception, to our newest digital homebuyer and homeownership experience—KeepHome—our mission to support homeowners continues to grow every year, and so does our team!

As we leverage the power of technology to strengthen communities one homeowner at a time, the individual contributions of our tight-knit team play a vital, daily role in shaping our products and services. Creative thinking, collaboration, and problem solving are at the core of the Framework culture, and we’re seeking team members with drive and ingenuity to add to the mix.

Come join us!


The position description is a guide to the critical duties and essential functions of the job, not an all-inclusive list of responsibilities, qualifications, physical demands and work environment conditions. Position descriptions are reviewed and revised to meet Framework’s changing needs, at the sole discretion of management.",4.2,"Framework Homeownership
4.2","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
123,General Engineer/Lead,-1,"Strategic Alliance Business Group LLC (SABG)
General Engineer (Lead) Job Description

DESCRIPTION: Strategic Alliance Business Group LLC (SABG) is a fast-growing, privately held, small business, government contracting company. SABG is both woman-owned small business and a service-disabled veteran-owned small business providing superior technical support services to government and commercial customers. SABG maintains a high-performance culture that emphasizes quality, productivity, process improvement, recruitment and ongoing development of a superior workforce. If you are driven with a “can-do” attitude and eager to support a fast-growing company, this may be the opportunity you have been looking for.

JOB TITLE: General Engineer (Lead)
REQUISITION #: FL-003-20-AFSOC
CLEARANCE: n/a
LOCATION: Hurlburt Field, FL
REPORTS TO: SABG Program Manager
FLSA STATUS: Regular Full-Time Exempt

SUMMARY: SABG is hiring a General Engineer (Lead) to support AFSOC at Hurlburt Field, FL.

APPLY HERE: https://www.ondemandassessment.com/link/index/JB-71YUXTOK3?u=1018158

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.
• Contractor personnel must be able to apply a wide range of knowledge to develop solutions for complex facility projects
• Manage design and construction efforts related to facility restoration and modernization projects
• Perform project scope development for design and construction contracts, prepare cost estimates, review construction material submittals, review design documents, make recommendations, and perform cradle-to-grave project management tasks
• Prepare statements of work and government estimate (using RS MEANS) for projects performed under the Simplified Acquisition of Base Engineer (SABER) contract
• Assist government construction personnel and coordinate work with contractor personnel and representatives of the using service to ensure timely and satisfactory accomplishment of all contracts
• Inspect construction projects and make recommendations in accordance with governing plans, specifications and contract terms and conditions.

SUPERVISION: This position will supervise three employees.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Has specialized relevant knowledge and works as a member of the team and assists with solving complex problems. Advanced level working knowledge, skills, and abilities using Microsoft Office. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and ability required.

EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:
• Bachelor of Science in Engineering (Civil, Electrical, or Mechanical) or Architecture conferred by an ABET accredited university
• 5 years of experience in facility engineering to include, but not limited to, design and construction for a wide variety of projects and engineering systems

COMPUTER SKILLS:
• Skills in operating a personal computer and standard office equipment
• Must have proficiency in a variety of computer software applications in word processing, spreadsheets, and database (MS Office: Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook)

COMPETENCIES: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
• Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems promptly; gathers and analyzes information skillfully; develops alternative solutions; works well in group problem-solving situations; and uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics
• Written Communication – Writes clearly and informatively; edits work for spelling and grammar; varies writing style to meet needs; presents numerical data effectively; and able to read and interpret written information
• Diversity – Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences, and promotes a harassment-free environment
• Ethics – Treats people with respect; keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; works with integrity and ethically; and upholds organizational values
• Planning/Organizing – Prioritize and plans work activities; uses time efficiently; plans for additional resources; sets goals and objectives; organizes or schedules other people and their tasks if needed; and develops realistic action plans
• Professionalism – Tactfully approaches others; reacts well under pressure; treats others with respect and consideration regardless of their status or position; accepts responsibility for own actions; follows through on commitments

LANGUAGE SKILLS: Ability to read, analyze, and interpret governmental regulations. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the public.

MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: Ability to apply concepts such as fractions, percentages, ratios, and proportions to practical situations.

REASONING ABILITY: Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to question activities and issues in all functional areas and make sound business decisions based on that data.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit, talk, and hear. The employee is regularly required to write and type on a computer. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb, or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.

WORK ENVIRONMENT: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodation may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Job duties are performed in a manufacturing/office environment utilizing standard office equipment such as a computer, photocopier, and telephone. The noise level in the work environment is usually low to moderate.

FOR OUR SERVICE MEMBERS AND VETERANS: SABG values the service Veterans and their family members have given to our country and we support the hiring of returning Service Members and military spouses. If you are a Veteran or wounded warrior and would like assistance with the employment process at SABG, please contact Beth Rodriguez at (703) 286-5883.

FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES: If you are a person with a disability or a disabled Veteran and are applying for a job with SABG, we would like to ensure your application process goes as smoothly as possible. If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process please call Beth Rodriguez at (703) 286-5883 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION: The below link will take you through our online application process. Once you complete all the steps we are notified of your completed application and we will review. For individuals who meet the requirements of the position, we will contact you and arrange next steps in the interview process.

APPLICATION LINK: https://www.ondemandassessment.com/link/index/JB-71YUXTOK3?u=1018158

SABG is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $94,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Facility Engineering: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.8,"Strategic Alliance Business Group LLC
4.8","Hurlburt Field, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
124,Systems Engineer (SSDS) - Mid - Moorestown,$38k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"In-Depth Engineering is seeking mid-level Systems Engineers to support our Ship Self Defense System (SSDS) program. Ship Self-Defense System (SSDS) is an integrated weapons system used aboard large U.S. Navy Aircraft Carriers, amphibious assault ships (LHA), (LHD) and Dock landing ships (LSD). The work is performed at our customer site in Moorestown, NJ. Candidates for consideration must be a US citizen and have an active Department of Defense secret clearance.

In-Depth Engineering remains committed to hiring during this period of uncertainty associated with COVID-19. We have implemented extensive policies and procedures, including mandatory use of face masks, social distancing in a low-density engineering lab environment and necessary cleaning and sanitizing. As appropriate, some efforts may be conducted in a telework environment.

Conduct model-based systems engineering

Utilize agile methodologies design engineering solutions

Develop solutions for complex mathematical and physics-based problems

Responsible for algorithmic design, data analysis and requirements development

Participate in large scale system of systems development effort

Conduct system trade studies and analyses of alternatives

Conduct system performance modelling and analysis

BS degree in Systems or Computer Engineering, Physics, Mathematics, or related discipline

2 - 5 years of related experience

Knowledge of DOORs, Rhapsody, UML

Familiarity with development on a Linux/Red Hat platform

Experience in Java, C, C++ (object-oriented programming, XML, SQL)

Strong oral and written communication skills

Must be U.S citizen

Ability to obtain DoD secret security clearance

Desired

Understanding of SSDS and its configurations

In-Depth Engineering provides a competitive package of salary and benefits, including medical, dental, and vision coverage, a Safe Harbor 401(k) program, generous Paid Time Off (PTO), STD, LTD, life insurance, and tuition assistance for higher education. Prospective employees will receive consideration without discrimination because of race, creed, color, sex, age, national origin, or handicap. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.5,"In-depth Engineering Corporation
3.5","Mount Laurel, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Government,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
125,Senior Software Engineer,$48k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"*JOB DESCRIPTION - SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER* \*\*Please only local candidates apply - thank you\*\* ClearOne Advantage is a fast-growing company that is aggressively hiring due to increased business. We are always improving our marketing, culture and technology to provide our employees with the best work atmosphere and our customers with excellent customer service. COA’s proprietary software is tailored to our industry and allows the client to receive the best service possible. We are seeking a Senior Software Engineer who can develop and maintain full-stack applications in a multi-tier environment. Ideal candidate will be smart, passionate about software development and eager to continually grow. If you are looking to work in a team environment, a place where you are more a name than a number, where you interact with leadership daily, then please send your resume for review! \*Remote indefinitely due to Covid - however only local candidates for consideration\* *Perks: * * Great location, right on the water in the Canton Crossing Tower * Casual work environment and remote flexibility * Room for advancement *JOB REQUIREMENTS**Job Duties: * * Application design, construction, and deployment of code within an object-oriented architecture * Design web-based applications for both internal and external users, using various data stores, and integrating with enterprise applications * Design and develop RESTful APIs that can be consumed by presentation layers, batch programs, other APIs, and third parties * Establish programmatic tasks and perform unit tests of features and solutions * Interface and consume third party APIs from Financial Services Partners and Telecom providers * Follow corporate and team standards for design, security, efficiency, application logging, monitoring/alerting, and documentation * Support corporate CRM application and automate business processes * Triage and fix production application issues * Stay abreast of new technologies and practices to further enhance team capabilities and own skills * Participate in on-call rotation to support new and existing products *Qualifications: * * 5+ years hands-on experience in Application Development * 3+ years operating in an Agile environment * 2+ years working with Microsoft® SQL Server, including using indexes, stored procedures, views, and triggers * 1+ years working in Amazon Web Services (AWS) or other cloud environment * Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field / equivalent experience * Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, rapid growth environment * Ability to solve problems and learn business rules and processes * Ability to demonstrate strategic, data-driven thinking combined with efficient implementation * Ability to communicate clearly and effectively to both technical peers and business customers * Ability work on a team as well as complete projects and tasks individually * Hands-on, self-starter with a positive attitude and strong work ethic * Authorized to work on US. At this time, ClearOne cannot offer sponsorship. *Technical Skills: * * Required – .NET Core 3.1, C#, HTML, XHTML, XML, CSS, Bootstrap, JavaScript, JSON, SOAP, Ajax/JQuery, MVC, Microsoft SQL Server 2016-2019, Microsoft Excel, Visual Studio 2017/2019, Team Foundation Server, Entity Framework 5/6 * Preferred - T-SQL, PowerShell, GitHub, Amazon Web Services, Tableau, Python, NewRelic, SSIS, SSRS, Jira, Aurelia AAP/EEO Statement: Clear One Advantage provides equal employment opportunity to all employees and job seekers without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under federal, state or local laws. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $95,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year Benefits: * 401(k) * Dental insurance * Flexible schedule * Health insurance * Paid time off * Referral program * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Supplemental Pay: * Bonus pay Experience: * .NET: 4 years (Required) * Microsoft SQL Server: 4 years (Required) * Application Development: 4 years (Required) * JavaScript: 4 years (Required) Work authorization: * United States (Required) Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available: * No: Not providing sponsorship for this job Company's website: * www.clearoneadvantage.com Work Remotely: * Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"ClearOne Advantage
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
126,Database Administrator/Analyst,$46k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"*
Position Summary:
Environment consists of multiple RDBMS’s to include (but not limited to) MS SQL, Postgresql, MySQL and MariaDB. Applicant would be responsible for database server management, installation, setup, maintenance and troubleshooting of all RDBMS’s. Apply security updates and service packs in a timely manner, making best efforts to ensure that performance, reliability and integrity are not compromised as a result. Participate on implementation teams as the database SME. Determine and document database policies, best practices, procedures and standards. Performance monitoring and tuning. Manage and maintain all SA accounts and SQL Licensing in applicable database / tracking documents. Daily monitoring and automation (where applicable) of query and server performance. Manage system security and disk usage as it relates to databases. Oversee data security through management of access and security. Oversee storage usage through monitoring and working with both Applications and Networking teams. Routinely scan for unintended security changes and vulnerabilities, review and recommend changes as necessary. Create and manage reports using SQL, then publish via various tools. Create, manage and maintain ETL and various data extracts. Undertake projects as assigned. Develop creative and innovative initiatives to improve the services offered by IT within the SRHC Health System. Provides 1st and 2nd level software application support. Develops and maintains information systems, software, and documentation, including problem identification and analysis. Defines project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases, and elements. Improves systems by studying current practices; designing modifications.
POSITION QUALIFICATIONS
Minimum Education
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or Information Systems
Minimum Experience
Minimum 2 years I.T. experience
Experience with EHR technology implementation, maintenance, and support functions preferred
Required Registration/License/Certification
None
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.7,"Salina Regional Health Center
3.7","Salina, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
127,Embedded Principal Software Engineer,-1,"Raytheon Technologies Software Engineering team is looking for talented Embedded Principal Software Engineer in the greater Los Angeles area who is ready to take on a fresh challenge, grow their career contribute and contribute to making the world a safer place for our El Segundo Campus.

Rated the best at what we do, Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) builds world class satellite ground systems and counters national security threats through cyber solutions. We are a state-of-the-art technology company because of our innovative thinkers. Your contribution is vital to everything we build. As you drive the next phase of your career you will find solutions to complex challenges and have the opportunity to mentor team members by sharing your insight and experience. The RIS culture fosters collaboration and respect while doing meaningful work. Join us! Together, we will support critical missions, develop solutions and define the future in aerospace and defense. Click here to view a brief video and learn more about Raytheon Intelligence and Space: https://youtu.be/E27yrxR4bN4

Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) is seeking an Principal Software Engineer to provide leadership and technical direction. RIS is seeking an individual who understands ground segment development and has demonstrated successful technical leadership of a ground segment program. This position is located in El Segundo, California. This position is eligible for relocation assistance.

Our Space Programs lead the industry in demonstrating the speed and agility required for next generation responsive space missions. As a Principal Software Engineer for the Space Programs, you will apply technical principles, theories, and concepts associated with software development and design for Object Oriented systems. You will also be will be involved with the planning, conduct, and coordination of software designs, software architecture, and documentation.

Responsibilities include but not limited to:
Requirements management/development, software architecting and preliminary design
Software development of data processing systems
Unit and module software test activities.

Clearance: Must be a US Citizenship with the ability to obtain/maintain a TS/SCI within 1 year of employment. or higher clearance

Required Experience, Knowledge, and/or Skills:
• Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Science, Mathematics, Physics, or STEM related field.
• Minimum 8+ years of related technical individual contributor experience in large team embedded software engineering development.
• Experience working across functional teams to define, set up and maintain test environments.
• Experience with lab environments and equipment.
• Experience with C++, MATLAB, Python and other scripting languages.
• Experience with the Linux operating system.
• Experience successfully working in an Agile collaborative environment
• Experience presenting to and interfacing with both internal and external customers.
• US Citizenship and the ability to access US only data systems.



Desired Experience, Knowledge, and/or Skills:
• Experience with SpaceWire and Ethernet interfaces.
• Experience with software implementation of timing and controls
• Experience with Agile-Scrum Methodology.
• Experience with tools such as JIRA, Jenkins, Coverity, GoogleTest, Docker, and Artifactory.
• Knowledge of MS Office or other presentation tools.

Required Education: Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Science, Mathematics, Physics, or STEM related field. M.S. degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Science, Mathematics, Physics preferred


RISCSI
RISSC2 Space


167820
Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
128,Lead Software Engineer - Streaming Data,$70k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"Discover. A brighter future.

With Discover, you’ll have the chance to make a difference at one of the world’s leading digital banking and payments companies. From Day 1, you’ll do meaningful work you’re passionate about, with the support and resources you need for success. We value what makes each employee unique and provide a collaborative, team-based culture that gives everyone an opportunity to shine. Be the reason millions of people find a brighter financial future, while building the future you want, here at Discover.

Job Description

As a Lead Software Engineer – Streaming Data, you will provide engineering leadership to build products that will support our streaming data pipelines and other real-time based solutions. You will be on the cutting edge of finding and integrating new technologies/platforms to be used by a large community of companywide engineers. We are looking for a talented individual that is strong technically, creative, and can work across many new technologies. You will be expected to drive innovation, R&D new solutions and must be able to operate without prescriptive directives from management.

Some examples of initiatives you will work on include building out our Change Data Capture platform, Kafka/KSQL DB, and developing our real time data transformation/consumption frameworks. The products your team develops mush have user experience top of mind as we strive to create products that bring delight and efficiencies to our users. You will work with technologies such as Java, Python, Spark & Spark streaming APIs, SQL, Kafka, Qlik Replicate, Snowflake, AWS/Google Cloud services and CI/CD tools.

Responsibilities

Develop data driven solutions utilizing current and next generation technologies to meet evolving business needs.
Ability to quickly identify an opportunity and recommend possible technical solutions.
Strong desire and capability to automate EVERYTHING
Utilize multiple development languages & tools such as Qlik Replicate, Python, Java and SQL to build prototypes and evaluate results for effectiveness and feasibility.
Operationalize open source data-analytic tools for enterprise use.
Utilize tools available to you across AWS and Google Services
Develop real-time data ingestion and stream-analytic solutions leveraging technologies such as Kafka, Apache Spark, Python, AWS/Google Services
Custom Data pipeline development (Cloud and locally hosted)
Provide support for deployed data applications and analytical models by being a trusted advisor to Data Scientists and other data consumers by identifying data problems and guiding issue resolution with partner Data Engineers and source data providers.
Provide subject matter expertise in the analysis, preparation of specifications and plans for the development of data processes.
Ensure proper data governance policies are followed by implementing or validating Data Lineage, Quality checks, classification, etc.
Develops and maintains complex front-ends with a focus on user experience
Develops and maintains backend systems
Works with key stakeholders to design complex solutions and lead from inception to production
Creates and maintains DevOps processes, application infrastructure, and utilizes cloud services (including database systems and models)
Innovates on and advocates for best practices and improved team processes; mentors junior team members
Supports live systems to ensure business continuity

Required Skills

Bachelor's Degree in Information Technology, Business, or related field
6+ years of experience in Computer Science, Information Technology, or other related field
In lieu of a degree, 8+ years of experience in Computer Science, Information Technology, or other related field

Desired Skills

Deep level understanding and implementation experience across AWS Data Services such as Lambda, Kinesis, SQS/SNS, EMR, S3, Cloudwatch etc..
Experience with ELK stack
Snowflake MPP Database
Deep level understanding and efficiency in the Hadoop technology stack
Proficient in Spark application coding
Proficient in Java or Python development
Expert level knowledge in SQL, and relational databases
Strong in Unix / shell scripting
Ab Initio experience
4+ years of experience of being a lead engineer amongst a team of equal or junior level developers
Excellent written and verbal communication, presentation and professional speaking skills
Collaborative individual who excels in working within a team and with business partners identify, develop and deliver innovative data solutions
Ability to demonstrate leadership to managers, and peer level staff.

#LI-KE

What are you waiting for? Apply today!

The same way we treat our employees is how we treat all applicants – with respect. Discover Financial Services is an equal opportunity employer (EEO is the law). We thrive on diversity & inclusion. You will be treated fairly throughout our recruiting process and without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status in consideration for a career at Discover.",3.8,"Discover
3.8","Crystal Lake, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
129,Software Data Engineer - Python,$67k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Locations: TX - Plano, United States of America, Plano, Texas

Software Data Engineer - Python

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative,inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Data Engineers who will be a part of a team that’s building new analytical and machine learning tools and frameworks to exploit advantages in the latest developments in cloud computing. As aCapital One Data Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about#lifeatcapitalone and our commitment todiversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 76-91 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Utilize programming languages like Java, Scala, Python and Open Source RDBMS and NoSQL databases and Cloud based data warehousing services such as Snowflake

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Perform unit tests and conducting reviews with other team members to make sure your code is rigorously designed, elegantly coded, and effectively tuned for performance

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 2 years of experience in application development

At least 1 years of experience in big data technologies (Cassandra, Accumulo, HBase, Spark, Hadoop, HDFS, AVRO, MongoDB, or Zookeeper)

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

3+ years of experience in application development

1+ year experience working on streaming data applications (Spark Streaming, Kafka, Kinesis, and Flink

1+ years of experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft Azure or another public cloud service

1+ years of experience with Ansible / Terraform

2+ years of experience with Agile engineering practices

2+ years in-depth experience with the Hadoop stack (MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Hbase)

2+ years of experience with NoSQL implementation (Mongo, Cassandra)

2+ years of experience developing Java based software solutions

2+ years of experience in at least one scripting language (Python, Perl, JavaScript, Shell)

2+ years of experience developing software solutions to solve complex business problems

2+ years of experience with UNIX/Linux including basic commands and shell scripting

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One - US
4.0","Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
130,Senior Systems Engineer II,-1,"Are you looking for an engineering career that is challenging and satisfying? Then join our Raytheon Technologies team of engineers solving problems that make the world a safer place and help to secure our great nation! Come support those who provide us with all the freedoms we enjoy.

We offer great benefits that include medical, dental, vision, 401K match, flexible work schedule - just to name a few.

Raytheon Technologies delivers innovative technology to make the world a safer place. Our expertise in cyber, analytics and automation allow us to reach beyond what others think is possible to underpin national security and give our global customers unique solutions to solve the most pressing modern challenges -- from the cyber domain to automated operations, and from intelligent transportation solutions to creating clear insight from large volumes of data. RIS operates at nearly 550 sites in 80 countries, including a large presence in Dulles, VA. As a global business, our leaders must have the ability to understand, embrace and operate in a multicultural world -- in the marketplace and the workplace. We strive to hire people who reflect our communities and embrace diversity and inclusion to advance our culture, develop our employees, and grow our business.

The Raytheon Technologies Hardware and Infrastructure Engineering (HW&I) team has a professional opening for a Senior Systems Engineer. This position will perform network and infrastructure engineering tasks pertaining to LAN/data center system design, development, implementation, integration, and troubleshooting activities. The qualified individual should possess knowledge and experience with network technologies, services, operations, and security

A current US Government TS/SCI security clearance is required for this position

This position is eligible for a Sign on Bonus of up to $40k for a candidate with a current verifiable TS/SCI clearance that is hired by Raytheon Technologies.

Required Skills:
Must be a US Citizen
6+ years of progressively responsible experience in design, implementation and administration for hardware and systems portfolios.
Hyper converged computing experience including experience with Nimble and NetApp
Experience with system patching and update tools including YUM, WSUS, ESXi
Proficient at building, maintaining, managing and monitoring servers running Linux
Proficient with patching and patch management
Working technical knowledge of Linux operating systems including RHEL and Ubuntu.
Knowledge and experience of Application and Security protocols, such as Solarwinds, HBSS, Certificates & Tokens, RSA, McAfee SIEM, McAfee SIEM, McAfee IPS/IDS, Rubrik Host Backup System, SAN storage, and Active Directory
Knowledge and experience in the design, implementation and support of VMwares product line, including vCenter vSphere, vCloud, Director,View and SRM.
Experience in working with highly hardened/secure environments
Knowledge of the concepts and techniques of server architectures, hardware, and software.
Experienced professional knowledge of TCP/IP, DNS, IPSec, GRE tunnels, multicasting and traffic balancing techniques.
Experienced professional understanding of Internet routing, BGP, OSPF, Tunneling, Ethernet switching, Linux, and related networking technologies including Cisco iOS
Excellent communicator with the ability to work effectively across multiple business and engineering teams
Adjust quickly to changing priorities and make quick decisions with limited information
High level of motivation, self-starter, ability to demonstrate effective project management and completion of complex network tasks with little guidance
Excellent time management skills
Desired Skills:
Proficient and self-reliant in at least one modern scripting or programming language such as Python, and Go.
Familiarity with systems configuration management, orchestration, and infrastructure as code with tools such as Ansible and/or Terraform
Familiarity with networks
Experience with VMWare or KVM
Experience with public cloud offerings
Experience as a system administrator for a Splunk cluster, or similar SIEM platform
Install, configure, and maintain a SAN
Install, configure, and maintain Active Directory
Education Requirements:
Requires a degree in Engineering or related Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) field from a Accredited College or Institution, and 6+ years of related work experience.

170372

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Dulles, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
131,FEMA PA-TAC Civil Engineer (FEMA Public Assistance PA Experience Required),-1,"Job Description: *
FEMA Public Assistance (PA) Technical Assistance Contracts (TAC)(PA-TAC) Civil Engineer Requirements for Upcoming FEMA Florida Task Order: *FEMA PA-TAC Civil Engineers support the FEMA Public Assistance (PA) program through infrastructure planning, design, and building management post-disaster for recovery projects such as buildings, roads, railways, airports, bridges, harbors, dams, irrigation projects, power plants, and water and sewerage systems.
Specific Duties Include:
Providing technical, cost estimating, and disaster recovery project management services
Monitoring construction work to ensure compliance with approved SOWs, PA policies, and procedures
Providing reporting and management capabilities (i.e., quality assurance/quality control, data collection, technical writing)
Minimum Qualifications:
Civil Engineering undergraduate / graduate degree
2 years in field of expertise or 5 years in field of expertise
Must be a U.S. citizen.
Must be able to pass a background check to obtain a FEMA Badge (Existing FEMA Badge preferred)
Ability to deploy to disaster area within 48 hours of notice
Superior written, verbal, and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office suite
Strong administrative and organizational skills with fastidious attention to detail
Proven ability to support multiple projects and tasks at once, and effectively prioritize in a fast-paced work environment to meet deadlines
Ability to work professionally, effectively, and efficiently in a team environment with various stakeholders
Superior written, verbal, and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office suite
Strong administrative and organizational skills with fastidious attention to detail
Proven ability to support multiple projects and tasks at once, and effectively prioritize in a fast-paced work environment to meet deadlines
Ability to work professionally, effectively, and efficiently in a team environment with various stakeholders
FEMA PA-TAC experience
Active FEMA Badge
Preferred Qualifications:
Superior written, verbal, and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office suite
Strong administrative and organizational skills with fastidious attention to detail
Proven ability to support multiple projects and tasks at once, and effectively prioritize in a fast-paced work environment to meet deadlines
Ability to work professionally, effectively, and efficiently in a team environment with various stakeholders
FEMA PA-TAC experience
Active FEMA Badge
Project Management Certification (i.e., PMP)
Lean Six Sigma Certification
Recommended PA Coursework:
0634 Introduction to FEMA’s Public Assistance Program (https://emilms.fema.gov/IS634/PA0101000.htm)
0869 Public Assistance Program Delivery Management (10-day course) (https://training.fema.gov/emicourses/schedules.aspx – search for “0869” for course schedule.
Average Duration Per Task Order:
Six (6) months to one (1) year
Job Types: Full-time, Temporary, Contract
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $40.00 - $60.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
Field Expertise : 2 years (Preferred)
FEMA PA-TAC: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
License:
FEMA Badge (Preferred)
PMP Certification (Preferred)
Lean Six Sigma (Preferred)",4.6,"NOVACES
4.6","Tallahassee, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
132,Senior Systems Engineer / Test Lab Manager,-1,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space (RIS); Surveillance Radar Development (SRD) Department has an immediate opportunity for a Senior Systems Engineer / Lab Manager to manage and support the Airborne Multimode and Terrain Following RADAR labs.

This is a multi-faceted role that requires a senior systems engineer who will perform requirements analysis, decomposition, allocation, architecture development, functional allocations, physical allocations, trade studies; HW/SW make-buy decisions and acquisitions - as well as build, test, verify, validate, and certify labs for product development, integration, and WLE support.

You will also monitor product performance and traffic; collecting and reducing data; perform verification and validation of complex configurations; coordinate test activities for several program Integration & Test labs; maintain the lab environment and associated test equipment, and provide coordination between the various projects and programs who utilize the labs to perform IV&V of their varied products and systems.

Required Skills:
Minimum of 10-years related overall Systems Engineering / IV&V experience including Lab / Testing with radar modes; prior lab management or coordination or lab leadership is preferred.
Experience with loading, configuring and managing software on radars
Ability to load, operate and control radar modes during anechoic, vibration and environmental chamber testing
Must be a US Citizen with Active (or active within past 2 years) DoD Secret clearance
Desired Skills:
Experience with mission radar integration onto fixed and rotary wing aircraft platforms
Experience with airborne radar modes of operation to include TA, TF, GM, MR, SP, WX
Strong technical leadership and ability to manage a team of HW, SW and test engineers
Strong organization, coordination, planning and team-building skills
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Ability to safely remove/install radar antenna/gimbal/radome
Ability to perform incoming and outgoing radar acceptance testing
Ability to determine program hardware needs and act in advance for parts procurement
Ability to acquire and pass training for powered and manual forklift operations
Required Education:Bachelor's degree in a related STEM discipline.

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

164438

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","McKinney, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
133,Principal Systems IV&V Engineer,-1,"Systems Integration, Verification and Validation (IV&V) Engineer / Task Lead / Test Director

The Systems Engineering Center (SEC) within the Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) Business Segment is involved in a wide variety of Systems IV&V activities for the Protected Communication Systems (PCS) group. The SEC IV&V activities include all aspects of system integration and test in both laboratory and challenging environmental conditions including, but not limited to, temperature, vibration, salt/fog, lightning, humidity and reliability growth testing.

The PCS IV&V organization also supports system architecture development, CONOPS development, system trade studies, requirements analysis and flow down to hardware/software configuration items; all of which lead to the final system integration, verification and validation. The department sections support a variety of communication system programs including Satellite Communication (SATCOM), line-of-sight (LOS) / beyond line-of-sight (BLOS) and networking for ground based, ship, submarine, and airborne platforms.

JOB SUMMARY

We are currently seeking experienced Principal Systems IV&V engineers to join our dynamic, diverse, and rapidly growing team. Ideal candidates would have technical experience with System Level IV&V of AEHF, EHF, X-Band, Ka-Band, Ku-Band, C-Band, LOS/BLOS, and networking for ground based, ship, submarine, and/or airborne platforms.

Required Skills
Minimum of eight (8) years of systems integration and verification experience
Background and competency in requirements development, analysis, derivations, verification and validation
Demonstrated experience with communication architectures
Ability to work within a structured Systems Engineering process environment including a task-oriented, value-based management system
Previous experience leading a team of six (6) or more staff through system design and/or system test activities.
Ability to interact effectively with multidisciplinary teams of program management and system design professionals including electrical, mechanical, software and logistics engineers
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position requires the ability to obtain DoD Secret U.S. Security Clearance within one year of start date and will require the ability to access to US only data systems
Desired Skills
Technical experience with System Level Integration, Verification and Validation on SATCOM (AEHF, EHF, X-Band, Ka-Band, Ku-Band, C-Band), LOS/BLOS, and networking for ground based, ship, submarine, and airborne platforms
Experience with Earned Value Management System (EVMS), Microsoft Project, engineering tools (e.g., DOORS) and peer review products
Direct experience with and/or working knowledge of environmental test requirements pertaining to Military Standards including; MIL-STD-810, MIL-STD-67, MIL-STD-1399, MIL - STD 1540, MIL - STD 461
Direct experience with and/or working knowledge of Environmental Tests including requirements analysis, procedure development, test conduct and evaluation of results. Experience in some or all of the following are highly desirable: EMI/EMC, shock, vibration, altitude, temperature, sand/dust, humidity, explosive atmosphere, crash safety, and reliability growth testing.
Satellite Communication systems definition, design, and development experience and/or experience with defining and evolving communication architectures
Proposal support experience including writing Basis of Estimates (BOEs)
Direct experience with and/or working knowledge of field support activities
Agile/Scrum program experience
Excellent communication skills (written, verbal, and presentation) and be able to effectively communicate with IPT leaders, hardware and software development engineers, specialty engineers, program managers, and our customers
Required Education
Bachelor of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) from an accredited educational institution (i.e. Engineering, Physics, Mathematics)
Desired Education
Master of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) from an accredited educational institution (i.e. Engineering, Physics, Mathematics)
169517

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
134,Software Design Engineer,$89k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

Torch Technologies is seeking a Software Engineer to join a team creating software for aviation health and usage monitoring, diagnostics, and prognostics. The position will require development of graphical user interfaces (GUI)s, data processing routines, analytical algorithms, and some database design and automation. Experience writing Microsoft Windows-based software and optimization of software through modern object-oriented design patterns (e.g. MVVM) and application of technologies such as Windows Presentation Foundation (WPF) is strongly preferred. Candidate will have the opportunity to develop frameworks supporting multiple manned and unmanned aviation platforms. Qualified applicants will have good programming skills, be able to work independently, and take a proactive role to assure that task responsibilities are completed on schedule.

Candidate will be responsible for:

Designing and developing solutions with the latest .NET framework using C# programming language and Visual Studio
Troubleshooting production issues
Conducting and participating in design discussions and code reviews
Managing source code and builds in Team Foundation Server
Collaborating with cross functional teams to review and analyze system requirements
Creating technical documentation for internal and external clients that accurately describe the configuration of technology utilized to implement a solution

Basic Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
5+ years of software development experience
Experience in WPF, WCF using C# .NET 4.0 or above and Entity Framework
Experience with ASP.NET is a plus

Preferred Knowledge/Skills/Abilities

Experience developing Cloud applications with API management and distributed microservices based architecture.
Previous experience providing application support, development
Agile methodologies (e.g., SCRUM, Kanban)
Relational Database Management Systems & Database Modeling Fundamentals (SQL Server 2012+, Oracle, SQLITE3, MySQL, SQL, PL/SQL, T-SQL)
Client Server System Administration Fundamentals (e.g., PowerShell, system monitoring)

Position requires that candidate possess a current security clearance in order to access classified information and is a US citizen. Inability to maintain a security clearance will result in candidate being ineligible for this position.",4.6,"Torch Technologies, Inc.
4.6","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
135,Automation and Commissioning Engineer,-1,"Position Summary*
The Automation and Commissioning Engineer is directly responsible for the development and implementation of process automation systems for Hitachi Zosen INOVA (HZI) renewable gas facilities including Anaerobic Digestion (AD) plants and Gas Upgrader Plants.
Location: * Open (Central CA or Toronto Canada Preferred)
*
Key Responsibilities (role includes but is not limited to) *
· Process Automation Engineer with a thorough understanding of the design, implementation and commissioning of Process Automation (PLC, DCS) Systems

· Portrays a proactive commitment to safety by taking the time to understand the risks and by completing all required safety training.

· Complies with the safety requirements of each project site by following all safety procedures and by reporting/documenting safety incidences and near misses.

· Experienced in the reading and interpreting P&IDs and converting this information into a complete automation system.

· Demonstrates a solid knowledge in process controls including understanding the process, ability to identify the parameters and understand and identify the measurable outcomes and hazards.

· Experience with PLC / DCS controls and manufacturing automation processes particularly in continuous process environments

· Open to coaching and mentoring from more experienced resources

· Capable of developing PLC / DCS software-based logic and documents, hands-on installation supervision, as well as, commissioning (hot & cold), start-up and interfacing with customers.

· Demonstrates a solid knowledge of the control methods, analog and discrete and the critical components in the development of sustainable control algorithms

· Responsible for supporting the hardware and software design and development for process control systems.

· Design and develop software applications based on given requirements and specifications

· Competent in the design and commissioning of data historians.

· Promotes teamwork by participating as a team player

. Capable of implementing control methodology in various DCS, PLC or HMI platforms with a strong understanding of various programming languages

· Position requires 10 plus years' experience with various automation software and hardware platforms such as ABB, Emerson, Honeywell, Rockwell Automation, Siemens, Valmet, other.

· Proficient in visualization systems for the control environments noted above such as Factory Talk View, Wonderware, WinCC, Intellution, etc.

· Experienced with the integration of multivendor packages incorporated into a cohesive integrated system.

· Experienced with multiple process automation communications protocols such as Controlnet, Devicenet, Ethernet, Ethernet IP, Modbus, Profibus, ProfiNET, ProfiSAFE, etc.

· Proficient with SIS and SIL rated systems and components

· Ability to design and implement remote access strategies for support and maintenance of installed base.

· Develop electrical bill of materials

· Power up electrical systems and configure hardware per application specifications

· Ability to independently design and implement knowledge of control system architecture including hardware, software, instrumentation and networking equipment

· Must be organized, detail oriented, and able to think designs through completely

· Proficient with process instruments, both in the application in standard and intrinsically safe environments.

· Must have ability to prioritize, multi-task and meet deadlines

· Must be able and willing to travel and work at customer sites

· Must be available and willing to work overtime, weekends, and holidays to meet the customer and project schedule commitments
Qualifications*
A minimum of 10 years of continuous process plant automation system design and implementation.
Asset to understand the principles of operation, function and construction for gas plant facilities, power plant, anaerobic digestion plants, etc.
Must be knowledgeable and have direct experience leading start-up and commissioning operations.
Able to identify problems and shortcomings with existing systems and develop solutions for implementation
Good working knowledge of Microsoft suite applications
Results driven, analytical, self-motivated and detail oriented
Strong and proactive communication skills both (verbally and written); English fluency required; alternate languages desired
Education/Certification: *
Bachelor's degree in Engineering or equivalent combination of education and experience
Focused certificates on various Automation concepts
Job Type: Full-time

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off",-1,Hitachi Zosen Inova U.S.A.,"Central, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
136,Navy shipboard Structural Engineer,-1,"Structural Engineer*
Overview *
Parts Life, Inc. (PLI) is currently seeking a Structural Engineer to join our team in the Philadelphia Metro Area. PLI provides customized DMSMS & obsolescence solutions for life cycle sustainment and lifespan extension of mission critical military assets. PLI utilizes trademarked solutions for difficult to source and produce parts. We are leading the defense industry with cutting edge technology and innovative solutions designed to reduce lifecycle costs and improve mission readiness.
Responsibilities (includes, but not limited to)*
· Analyzes, researches and develops structural engineering specifications involving metals, nonmetallic or composite structural materials for product design, or operation of product to include structures, mechanical, hydraulic, electrical and electronics, power plant, armament, heating and ventilating, equipment and maintenance designs.

· Analyzes damage tolerance, durability, design allowable data and structural modeling.

· Must show experience with US Navy Technical procedures and working with other organizations such as Naval Sea Systems Command, Naval Surface Warfare Center, Naval Shipyards, Supervisor of Shipbuilding, Conversion and Repair, Regional Maintenance Centers and Type Commander Organizations.

· Understanding of fundamental technical principals, theories and concepts.

· Understanding how the loads and criteria are part of the fundamental technical principals, theories and concepts regarding structural strength.
Qualifications *
· Bachelor of Science in materials engineering, welding engineering, or a similar discipline from an accredited college or university.

· Five (5) years of experience in managing Navy shipboard engineering projects, with experience regarding assessment and maintenance of Naval Ships HM&E systems, contractor quality oversight and surveillance, and approval of welding and Non-Destructive Evaluation (NDE) procedures.
EEO statement*
Parts Life, Inc provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Experience:
Naval Ships HM&E systems: 1 year (Required)
Non-Destructive Evaluation (NDE): 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Philadelphia, PA 19112 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
How many years of Defense & Space experience do you currently have?
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
partslifeinc.com
Company's Facebook page:
http://www.facebook.com/partslifeinc
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Parts Life, Inc.
3.9","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
137,Senior Software Engineer- Alerts,$104k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Software Engineer


As a Senior Software Engineer, you will be working on designing, architecting, and implementing highly scalable, distributed, and fault tolerant backend systems. You will be part of our operational intelligence portfolio and will be working on building systems to monitor and detect errors, anomalies, and outliers in log and metrics data and provide customers context to troubleshoot operational issues.

What you will be doing:
Apply object oriented and functional programming languages, unix operating systems, networking, and scaling techniques to build next generation systems.
Evaluate requirements, define technical specifications, estimate development costs, review design and communicate to stakeholders.
Lead, organize, and participate in cross-team discussions on system design and architecture
Develop instrumentation/profiling tools to monitor backend systems.
Mentor junior engineers and improve software development processes.
What we need from you:
BS in Computer Sciences or a related discipline (MSc, or PhD is a plus).
Minimum of 4+ years of experience working on backend and distributed systems
Object-oriented experience, for example in Java, Scala, Ruby, or C++.
Experience working with one of the public cloud services such as AWS, GCP, or Azure
Expert knowledge in algorithms and performance characteristics of data structures used in distributed systems (maps, lists, queues, etc)
Experience building micro services, deploying production level code, with a proven track record of ownership and delivery.
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------


About Sumo:

We are a cloud-native SaaS machine data analytics platform - logs, time series metrics, and security analytics. We were founded in 2010 by experts in log management, big data, security systems, and enterprise-scale applications. Customers love our product because it allows them to easily monitor and optimize their mission-critical, large scale applications.

Our Customers:

We serve DevOps, SecOps and ITOps teams. Customers love our product because it allows them to easily monitor and optimize their mission-critical, large scale applications.

Mission:

Democratize machine data analytics through our platform, bringing real-time data insights securely through the cloud.

Massive Scale:

Our microservices architecture in AWS ingests hundreds of terabytes daily across many geographic regions. Millions of queries a day analyze hundreds of petabytes of data.

Funding and Growth:

We have received $345 million in funding to date. Investors include Battery Ventures, Greylock Partners, Sutter Hill Ventures, Accel Partners, Sequoia Capital, Sapphire Ventures and DFJ Growth. Our recurring revenue and customer base are growing steadily. We serve over 1,600 customers across the globe including AirBnB, Alaska Airlines, Anheuser Busch, Hootsuite, Hearst, Hudl, Major League Baseball, Marriott, Medidata, Sauce Labs, Samsung SmartThings, SPS Commerce, Twitter, Telstra, Toyota, Zuora and more.",3.3,"Sumo Logic
3.3","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
138,Senior Software Engineer- Platform,$104k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Software Engineer- Platform


As a Senior Software Engineer, you will be working on designing, architecting, and implementing highly scalable, distributed, and fault tolerant backend systems. You will be part of our continuous intelligence platform team and will be working on building systems and frameworks that are used by other teams in the company as well as features used by our actual customers. We build the systems that power authentication, session management, role-based access control, content management, auditing, health tracking, API, and more.

What you will be doing:
Apply object oriented and functional programming languages, unix operating systems, networking, and scaling techniques to build next generation systems.
Evaluate requirements, define technical specifications, estimate development costs, review design and communicate to stakeholders.
Lead, organize, and participate in cross-team discussions on system design and architecture
Develop instrumentation/profiling tools to monitor backend systems.
Mentor junior engineers and improve software development processes.
What we need from you:
BS in Computer Sciences or a related discipline (MSc, or PhD is a plus).
Minimum of 4+ years of experience working on backend and distributed systems
Object-oriented experience, for example in Java, Scala, Ruby, or C++.
Experience working with one of the public cloud services such as AWS, GCP, or Azure
Expert knowledge in algorithms and performance characteristics of data structures used in distributed systems (maps, lists, queues, etc)
Experience deploying production level code, with a proven track record of ownership and delivery.
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------


About Sumo:

We are a cloud-native SaaS machine data analytics platform - logs, time series metrics, and security analytics. We were founded in 2010 by experts in log management, big data, security systems, and enterprise-scale applications. Customers love our product because it allows them to easily monitor and optimize their mission-critical, large scale applications.

Our Customers:

We serve DevOps, SecOps and ITOps teams. Customers love our product because it allows them to easily monitor and optimize their mission-critical, large scale applications.

Mission:

Democratize machine data analytics through our platform, bringing real-time data insights securely through the cloud.

Massive Scale:

Our microservices architecture in AWS ingests hundreds of terabytes daily across many geographic regions. Millions of queries a day analyze hundreds of petabytes of data.

Funding and Growth:

We have received $345 million in funding to date. Investors include Battery Ventures, Greylock Partners, Sutter Hill Ventures, Accel Partners, Sequoia Capital, Sapphire Ventures and DFJ Growth. Our recurring revenue and customer base are growing steadily. We serve over 1,600 customers across the globe including AirBnB, Alaska Airlines, Anheuser Busch, Hootsuite, Hearst, Hudl, Major League Baseball, Marriott, Medidata, Sauce Labs, Samsung SmartThings, SPS Commerce, Twitter, Telstra, Toyota, Zuora and more.",3.3,"Sumo Logic
3.3","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
139,Senior Software Engineer (UI),$104k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Senior Software Engineer, you should possess the skills to create well-designed web interfaces resulting in rich, intuitive user experiences, and deliver high-quality, modular code for complex web UI components and pages.

You will be part of our operational intelligence portfolio and will be working on building User Interface for unified alerting across log, metrics and traces data. You will work on providing amazing visual experience in creating monitors and managing incidents that help detect errors, performance issues, anomalies, outliers.

What you will be doing:
Design and develop a rich user interface primarily for our mission-critical high-availability analytics platform using React and TypeScript.
Participate in user experience design, architecture initiatives and lead regular code reviews with a major focus on ease of use, visual appeal, re-usability, and performance.
Mentor junior engineers and improve software development processes.
Instrument and measure UI performance with well defined SLI's to provide best in class experience for customers.
What we need from you:
BS in Computer Sciences or a related discipline (MSc is a plus).
Minimum of 4+ years of experience in delivering enterprise-class JavaScript web applications.
Experience building web applications using modern Front End JavaScript libraries such as ReactJS (preferable) or Angular 2+ or Vue.js
Experience with one of the object oriented programming languages: C++, Java or Scala is a plus.
Passionate and driven to create an amazing customer experience.
Be vocal! We believe in the wisdom of crowds and your input is needed and valued!
Be flexible! We love to change it up by using different technologies and need you to be open to new and different!
Love to learn! To get the greatest solutions we need to continually explore what's new and be willing to dive in and learn.
About Sumo:

We are a cloud-native SaaS machine data analytics platform - logs, time series metrics, and security analytics. We were founded in 2010 by experts in log management, big data, security systems, and enterprise-scale applications. Customers love our product because it allows them to easily monitor and optimize their mission-critical, large scale applications.

Our Customers:

We serve DevOps, SecOps and ITOps teams. Customers love our product because it allows them to easily monitor and optimize their mission-critical, large scale applications.

Mission:

Democratize machine data analytics through our platform, bringing real-time data insights securely through the cloud.

Massive Scale:

Our microservices architecture in AWS ingests hundreds of terabytes daily across many geographic regions. Millions of queries a day analyze hundreds of petabytes of data.

Funding and Growth:

We have received $345 million in funding to date. Investors include Battery Ventures, Greylock Partners, Sutter Hill Ventures, Accel Partners, Sequoia Capital, Sapphire Ventures and DFJ Growth. Our recurring revenue and customer base are growing steadily. We serve over 1,600 customers across the globe including AirBnB, Alaska Airlines, Anheuser Busch, Hootsuite, Hearst, Hudl, Major League Baseball, Marriott, Medidata, Sauce Labs, Samsung SmartThings, SPS Commerce, Twitter, Telstra, Toyota, Zuora and more.",3.3,"Sumo Logic
3.3","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
140,Space Systems Sr. Manager RF Lead Systems Engineer - Active TS/SCI Required,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

This position is for a Lead Systems Engineer (LSE) for VERONA Programs within the Space & C2 (SC2) Mission Area of Raytheons Intelligence and Space (RI&S) business. The SC2 LSE has the responsibility of ensuring the technical integrity and quality of the systems engineering work throughout the program life cycle of a large Intelligence, Surveillance and Reconnaissance Communications (ISRC) Radar (VERONA) Program, including IRAD and related pursuits. This position reports to the Program Manager and interfaces directly with customers and across all IPTs, including system architects, and system/subsystem designers. The VERONA LSE will provide technical leadership and oversight throughout for all phases of the program, from requirements definition and flow down, to system verification and validation in compliance with engineering processes and procedures. External to the program, this position interfaces with the Program Area Chief Engineer, Business Area Chief Engineer and Functional Managers as well as non-engineering organizations such as finance, operations, supply chain, contracts and mission assurance.

The Lead Systems Engineer (LSE) will:
Define and develop VERONA systems and payload architectures
Provide technical leadership in VERONA architecture definition and trade studies
Provides technical leadership and oversight of the entire VERONA product life cycle development activities, including: requirements development, allocation, verification and analysis; hardware and software design and development; system level integration, validation and verification and interface definition; algorithm development; CONOPS development; and Monitor performance through technical performance measures
Lead system test preparation, execution, troubleshooting, and verification
Mentor the program junior engineers and review their work for quality
Maintain technical baseline control within fixed cost and schedule constraints
Act as the bridge between program management and technical staff
Foster culture in-line with high performance and cohesive teams necessary to meet the technical, schedule and cost challenges
Support Configuration Control Board, Engineering Review Board, Failure Review Board, Risk and Opportunity Review Boards
Support the development of new business proposals and pursuits
Identify engineering resource gaps
Required Skills:
12+ years prior relevant experience
Experience in Space Vehicle and radar payload engineering and design integration interpreting sensor/payload/mission requirements and decomposing to design requirements and verification techniques
Experience as Lead Systems Engineer on a large space programs or another role providing technical leadership to a large engineering team
Experience providing technical leadership throughout the entire space product life cycle
Experience in proposal development including creations of Basis-of-Estimates
Experience in development (design, fabrication, integration & test) of high reliability space products
Experience in leading design reviews (e.g. System Requirements Review, Preliminary Design Review, Critical Design Review) and establishing technical baseline
Experience with the technical review and approval of proposals and Gates to ensure technical and execution feasibility
Experience with system or subsystem level Integration, Verification and Validation (IV&V)
Experience with identifying critical staffing resources to update staffing plans to address technical development areas
Experience with developing and presenting technical briefings to the customer and company leadership
Experience effectively leading teams of technical experts to resolve challenging technical problems
Experience establishing and maintaining working relationship with all levels of the organization, including customers, users, and other peer groups
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.
Ability to access US only data systems
Active and Current TS/SCI or completed SSBI clearance within last 24 months required
Desired Skills:
Technical background in radiometry, thermometry and calibration techniques
Technology strategy planning
Experience in development (design, fabrication, integration & test) of space-based electronics (requirements, interfaces and concept development)
FPGA design and development
Testing activities such as thermal, vibration and EMI testing
Knowledge of environmental test methods and practices (e.g. Dynamic, Vibration, EMI, Thermal Vacuum)
STE design, testing or operation
Software integration and test, configuration management
Working with operations staff, sub-contractors, team members and customers
Familiarity with cost and schedule management using a government approved Earned Value Management System
Integrated Product Team Lead (IPTL) or line engineering management experience
Experience identifying engineering resources needed to get required engineering work product requirements done (people, processes, facilities & tools)
Proposal management, from initial pursuit and capture planning to proposal delivery
Required Education:

Bachelors degree in Engineering, Math, Science or related STEM degree
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#IdeasInOrbit
#Space2020 168474

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
141,Lead Model Based Systems Engineer,-1,"Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

The Lead Model-Based Systems Engineers (L-MBSE) will drive the implementation of model based systems engineering at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. The successful candidate will enjoy a fast-paced, team-based, and challenging technical environment.

Responsibilities include:
Drive system engineering processes including requirement creation and management; test case fulfilment
Create and validate digital engineering and MBSE models
Enable connectivity between MBSE tool and external tools and models
Assess performance against requirements to identify risks and drivers
Create specifications, interface descriptions, trade studies and analyses, use cases/functional descriptions, measures of effectiveness, technical performance measures and other CDRLs
Lead multiple tool and environmental integrations
Ensure system integrity
Set direction and roadmaps for system engineering teams
Develop and share best practices; mentor and train others
Chair technical reviews
Define company strategy for implementing model based systems engineering
Required Skills:
10+ years of systems engineering experience with proficiency in MBSE, MBSE tools and SySML
Experience with requirements development and management, flow-down, design, test planning and execution, data analysis, verification and validation, and operations support
Leadership skills and tenacity to develop proposals for Government customers
Familiar with agile-scrum approaches
Skilled in preparing and delivering briefings to management and customers
Evidence of problem-solving and time-management skills
Experience working with multi-disciplined teams geographically dispersed
Excellent communicator and collaborator
Ability to obtain a DoD Top Secret U.S. Security Clearance
Desired Skills:
Providing technical leadership to an engineering team throughout the life cycle
Generating systems engineering products for complex systems
DoDAF or other architecture framework
Leading development, systems engineering, and testing of complex systems
Modeling and simulation
Familiar with OpenMBEE, Syndeia, DOORS, DOORS Next Generation, MagicDraw
Required Education:
Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Sciences, or Mathematics or related STEM discipline

Desired Education:
Masters Degree in Systems Engineering or related STEM discipline
* U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position requires the ability to obtain Top Secret U.S. Security Clearance within one year of start date**
#Space2020
167128

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Richardson, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
142,Space Systems Sr. Manager - EO/IR Chief Engineer,-1,"This position is for a Program Chief Engineer within the Space Systems (SS) Mission Area of Raytheon Intelligence and Space. The SS Program Chief Engineer has the responsibility of ensuring the technical integrity and successful execution of a large Intelligence, Surveillance and Reconnaissance Communications (ISRC) Electro-Optical/Infrared (EO/IR) Program, including IRAD and related pursuits. This position reports to the Program Manager and interfaces directly with customers across all phases of the program lifecycle. Internal to the program, the Chief Engineer will interface with the product teams. External to the program, this position interfaces with the Program Area Chief Engineer, Business Area Chief Engineer and Functional Managers as well as non-engineering organizations such as finance, operations, supply chain, contracts and mission assurance.

The Chief Engineer will:
Define and develop EO/IR system concepts and architectures for existing and future contracts
Own the systems engineering work products and artifacts for Space based electro-optical sensors and concept development
Develop and support negotiations for the Program Statement of Work
Provide technical leadership and oversight of the entire EO/IR product life cycle development activities, including: requirements development, allocation, verification and analysis; hardware and software design and development; system level integration and test planning, verification and validation; interface definition (electrical, mechanical, optical, thermal); modeling, analysis and simulation development; CONOPS development; and Monitor performance through technical performance measures
Be accountable for sensor/payload/mission requirements definition and decomposition
Lead Program-Related Configuration Control Board, Engineering Review Board, Failure Review Board, Risk and Opportunity Review Boards
Mentor Program junior engineers and review their work for quality
Maintain technical baseline control within fixed cost and schedule constraints
Act as the bridge between program management and technical staff
Foster culture in line with high performance and cohesive teams necessary to meet the technical, schedule and cost challenges
Required Skills:
Minimum of 12 years of experience in Systems Engineering
Technical leadership experience on a medium or large EO/IR space program, or another role providing technical leadership to a large engineering team
Experience in development (design, fabrication, integration & test) of high reliability EO/IR space products
Experience in leading design reviews (e.g. System Requirements Review, Preliminary Design Review, Critical Design Review) and establishing technical baseline
Experience with the technical development, review and approval process for proposal development to ensure technical and execution feasibility (incl. discriminator development and bidding)
Experience with system and subsystem level Integration, Verification and Validation (IV&V)
Experience with developing and presenting technical briefings to customers and company leadership
Experience effectively leading teams of technical experts to resolve challenging technical problems
Experience identifying engineering resources required to support the completion of engineering work product requirements (people, processes, facilities & tools)
Experience establishing and maintaining working relationship with all levels of the organization, including customers, users, and other Senior-level Engineering peers
Active and Current TS/SCI or completed SSBI within last 24 months required
Desired Skills:
Technical background in radiometry, thermometry and calibration techniques
Technology strategy planning
Experience in development (design, fabrication, integration & test) of space-based electronics (requirements, interfaces and concept development)
FPGA design and development
Testing activities such as thermal, vibration and EMI testing
Knowledge of environmental test methods and practices (e.g. Dynamic, Vibration, EMI, Thermal Vacuum)
STE design, testing or operation
Software integration and test, configuration management
Working with operations staff, sub-contractors, team members and customers
Familiarity with cost and schedule management using a government approved Earned Value Management System
Integrated Product Team Lead (IPTL) or line engineering management experience
Proposal management, from initial pursuit and capture planning to proposal delivery
Required Education:

Bachelors degree in Engineering, Math, Science or related STEM degree
#Space2020
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
164245

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
143,Systems Engineer II - Network,$59k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"req4540

Systems Engineer II - Network
Full Time,
FTE: 1
Administration Center
Fairfield, CA (GreenValley)
• Normally works eight hours/day Monday through Friday.
• Occasionally must work late in the evening or on weekends to complete project objectives or emergency situations.
• Hours will vary according to work demands.
• Must be available by cell phone 24 hours a day 7 days a week according to a scheduled rotation for off hours infrastructure emergency support.

Job Summary:

This position, reporting to the Network
Engineering Manager, is responsible for managing assigned systems in a 24x7 high
availability environment. Assigned systems may include the public and private
network infrastructure and all associated components, data rooms / data centers
and associated components (HVAC / UPS / Fire Suppression / Generator),
enterprise communications systems, enterprise facilities as they relate to IT
infrastructure, electronic physical access control systems, enterprise server
infrastructure and other IT systems as they are adopted by the organization. The incumbent works as part of a team that is
responsible for the design, specification development, analysis,
testing, implementation and general system administration and maintenance of
assigned systems and related devices including performance analysis &
tuning, system configuration, backups & recovery, capacity planning and
security administration.

Education:
High-school
diploma required.
Four year degree in
Information Technology or equivalent work experience preferred.
Current technical
certifications in network engineering and support preferred.
Experience/Skills:
7
years experience in an information technology role providing direct customer
support and enterprise infrastructure management.
Minimum
5 years experience as a network engineer in a primarily Cisco network.
Minimum
2 years experience in health care information technology preferred.
Experience
working with ITIL framework of best practices preferred.
Experience working within with
requirements of a 24/7 Highly Available environment.
Experience
working within the requirements of a change management system.
Experience as a technology owner for
Cisco network infrastructure components including: Cisco Catalyst and Nexus Data Center
Switches, Cisco ISR and ASR Platform Routers, UCS Virtualization, WLC/LWAPP/CAPWAP Deployment, Cisco ASA / FTD Security Appliances
Experience as a technology owner for
Citrix Netscaler ADC Appliances.
Extensive demonstrated experience and
ability in working with TCP/IP as it relates to
Subnetting, DHCP, DNS, Packet
Analysis / Troubleshooting.
Extensive demonstrated experience in
deploying, working with and troubleshooting Firewall Systems, Policies and
ACLs.
Extensive
experience with network technologies / protocols such as EIGRP, OSPF, SSLVPN,
IPSEC-VPN, Multicast, Ether-Channel, DSCP/QoS, VTP, NTP, SPAN, 802.1Q Trunking,
Multi-Chassis VPC.
Experience
working in a converged services network environment.
Experience working in a redundant dual-homed
environment. Understands the complexities associated with ensuring optimal routing
performance and avoiding outages.
Experience with AAA systems including
Radius, LDAP, TACACS and Cisco ISE.
Experience with Layer2/Layer3 hybrid
campus environments.
Experience with tiered network
architectures (Core / Distribution / Access).
Experience with physical
infrastructure components such as Cat3/5e/6, SM/MM fiber optics, coax.
Experience with Ethernet based WAN
carrier products such as AT&T ASE, Comcast EPL/ENS/Coax Ethernet.
Experience with WAN carrier products
such as T1, PRI, DS3, 3G/4G.
Experience working with Electronic
Physical Access Control systems.
Experience with data center UPS
systems and associated maintenance.
Experience with dry fire suppression
systems and associated maintenance requirements.
Advanced knowledge of network administration standards
including security administration, performance analysis & tuning, capacity
planning, hardware and firmware maintenance.
Strong analytical and problem solving skills.
Strong organizational and multi-tasking skills.
Ability to manage multiple complex problems under
pressure while maintaining a positive and professional demeanor.
Advanced level knowledge of computer fundamentals,
computer operations, telecommunications systems, and help desk
methodologies.
Should also have a general knowledge of the healthcare
business and information systems as they affect clinician’s workflow.
Ability
to work independently with minimal direction/supervision is a must.
The
position requires dedicated attention to detail as well as the ability to
maintain confidentiality of work related information.
Ability
to diagram systems architecture for presentation to management and other IT
staff to communicate future requirements and current IT systems’ operation.
Ability
to flow chart processes to identify bottlenecks and streamline procedure.
Other:
The
NorthBay Way is a set of value-based behaviors that are to be consistently
demonstrated and role modeled by all employees that work at NorthBay
Healthcare. The NorthBay Way principles consist of Caring, Communication,
Collaboration, and Competence.
Able to communicate in an effective and professional
manner with co-workers, vendors, associates and other departments.
Able to control tense situations to remain focused on
the problem at hand.
#northbay",4.1,"NorthBay Healthcare
4.1","Fairfield, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1955,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
144,Joint Polar Satellite System (JPSS) Program Chief Engineer,-1,"Description:

Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) is seeking a Program Chief Engineer (PCE) for the Joint Polar Satellite System (JPSS) Common Ground System (CGS) program. The JPSS team sustains and modernizes the state-of-the-art ground station for the next generation of low earth orbiting environmental satellites. This national asset provides global coverage, monitors environmental conditions, collects, disseminates & processes data about the Earth's weather, atmosphere, oceans, land, & near-space environment.
The JPSS Program Chief Engineer is responsible for the technical, cost, and schedule execution of all engineering tasks on the program. The PCE is the Engineering point of contact for the Program Manager as well as the point of contact for all program functional staff. Due to the size of the JPSS program this position is for the lead Engineer, and as such the candidate may be required to reach out to other staff on the program in support of the following areas.

Responsibilities:

Establish and manage a product vision, strategy and goals to align the Program with the Customer and facilitate conflict resolution.
Responsible for overall Engineering execution within the JPSS program, reporting to DCS Business Area Chief Engineer.
Determines & monitors technical priorities to meet cost, schedule & performance for the entire program. Works closely with the functional discipline organizations to review program execution on a periodic basis to ensure schedule and cost are being met.
Responsible for the overall success of JPSS SW/HW deployments throughout the lifecycle and the oversight of the operational site support staff reporting to the JPSS Program Director.
Prepare and Conduct Engineering Program Reviews (EPRs) monthly. Support Program Director for engineering matters related to Monthly Program Reviews.
Develop executable Estimates at Completion (EAC) for the program in collaboration with the responsible Engineering Control Account managers.
Work closely with functional disciplines on program staffing. Ensure staffing forecasts are accurate and up to date. Work with Engineering discipline organizations to ensure appropriate staffing is assigned.
Ensure process tailoring is approved (EPIC) and ensure engineering process compliance.
Provide oversight and review all program metrics for engineering. Establish and track both Key Performance Parameters (KPPs) and allocated Technical Performance Measures (TPMs) across the lifecycle as a means for measuring technical progress and assessing risk.
Ensures proper configuration management of Engineering work products and chairs ERB, CCB and other major review boards.
Ensure effective use of independent reviews and achieve on-time completion of all Engineering Gate reviews.
Provide accurate and timely status reports to the Program and Engineering organizations.
Required Skills:

B.S.in Science, Technology, Engineering, Math (STEM) degree and at least 12 years experience as a Program Manager, Chief Engineer, and/or as an Integrated Product Team (IPT) Lead on a major program.
Knowledge and experience in the integration and deployment of large software systems to multiple test and operational environments.
Strong knowledge of multiple engineering disciplines with a strong focus on Large Scale Software Development, Integrated Product Development System (IPDS) and Earned Value Management System (EVMS).
Proven Executive level communication skills.
Extensive program execution experience on medium to large system development
Experience with suppliers in technical and/or programmatic oversight role.
Experience in all phases of development program lifecycle.
Significant experience in Risk and Opportunity Management.
Experience with emerging SW methodologies, including agile methods and the incorporation of tools and principles (i.e. continuous integration) to reduce defects, increase software productivity, and improve maintainability.
Desired Skills:

Platform Systems domain experience with unmanned vehicle command and control or mission planning.
Raytheon Program Management Certification (Level 5)
Raytheon Lead Program Engineer Certification (or ability to achieve in 8 months)
Certified Technical Subcontract Manager (TSM)
Previous experience with software and hardware integration
Team building and motivational skills
R6 Sigma Specialist Qualified
Agile Certifications (Scrum Master, SPC, SAFe)
Experienced in customer communication skills

Required Education (including Major):

B.S. in Aerospace Engineering, Software Engineering, Systems Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Computer Systems Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, Math (or equivalent). Preference for a Masters degree.

This position requires a U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
166605
Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","East Riverdale, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
145,Web Application / Cloud Services Engineer,-1,"Must be a U. S. Citizen or Green Card Holder*
Job* *Summary*
BAA is seeking a Web Application / Cloud Services Engineer. The ideal candidate will have a background or familiarity with diesel and gas engines, is strong in C# programming with UI development skills in WPF, Web services using WCF or other communication framework. Also, experience working on Database development using SQL Server.
Job Requirements: *
· .Net application development using C# with Strong Object Oriented Design & programming

· Proficient in Data Structures & Algorithms

· Strong in WPF, WCF, Telerik, IIS, SQL Server

· Automated Unit & integration testing

· Experienced with CI/CD Pipelines

· Experience on Application development & migration on *cloud* premises such as AWS/Azure

· SOAP, REST based web service development

· Develop Robust Software Design & architecture

· Performance tuning for responsive applications

· Database modelling & design, optimization

· Able to write complex stored procedures & functions on SQL Server

· Configuration Management/Versioning tools

· Working experience on SAFE/DevOps /Agile Development and able to do Rapid Prototyping

· Ability to write Requirements & test procedures & maintenance of same

· Data Mining & Analytics - SSAS

· Knowledge on automotive controls/calibration will be an advantage

· Experience working/developing applications using *AutoSAR* standards specifically for Calibration flow will be an advantage.

· Strong Verbal, Communication & Presentation Skills
Education Requirements*
Minimum of a Bachelor's Degree required.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
AutoSAR: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Application Question:
Currently BAA is not offering visa sponsorship for this role. Do you now, or will you in the future, require employer sponsorship?
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.billaustin.com",4.0,"BAA
4.0",Indiana,-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
146,Senior Software Engineer - Metrics Infrastructure,$104k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Software Engineer – Metrics Infrastructure

Increasingly complex modern applications demand increasingly flexible and powerful tools in order to empower engineers to identify, resolve, investigate, and prevent issues and outages.

This role targets a candidate with expertise in the development of large-scale tools for monitoring and troubleshooting of production software systems or generally, distributed systems development. This engineer will serve as a hands-on technical leader on the team responsible for building the next generation platform for processing, analyzing, visualizing, and correlating vast quantities of heterogeneous machine data. The role will demand technical excellence from design through implementation, and beyond into production operations.

The ideal candidate is obsessed with the past, present, and future of monitoring and operations, and energized by the extreme challenges of building an efficient, cloud-based, multi-tenant, large-scale, low-latency platform that engineers depend upon in order to keep their mission-critical software running.

Responsibilities:
Build the system that runs elastic big data analytics platform that runs in the AWS cloud.
Design and implement extremely high-volume, fault-tolerant, scalable backend systems.
Analyze and improve the efficiency and reliability of our backend systems.
Write robust code; demonstrate its robustness through automated tests.
Work as a member of a team, helping the team respond quickly and effectively to business needs.
Development management over terabytes of data using the latest and greatest technologies such as Kafka, microservices, Redis, and Cassandra.
Requirements:

Bachelor's degree or foreign equivalent in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Technology or related field and 6+ years of experience as a Software Engineer, Software Developer or in a related role.

Must have:
Multi-threaded programming;
Experience with real-time streaming workflow over large amounts of data
Object-oriented programming using Java, Scala, or C++
Algorithms and performance characteristics of large distributed software systems.
----------------------------------------------------

About Us

Mission:
Democratize machine data analytics through the Sumo Logic platform, bringing real-time data insights securely through the cloud.

Funding and Growth:
We have raised $345 million in funding to date, with the most recent round being May 2019. Investors include Battery Ventures, Greylock Partners, Sutter Hill Ventures, Accel Partners, Sequoia Capital, Sapphire Ventures and DFJ Growth. Our recurring revenue and customer base are growing steadily. We serve over 2,000 customers across the globe including Alaska Airlines, Anheuser Busch, Hootsuite, Hearst, Hudl, Major League Baseball, Marriott, Medidata, Sauce Labs, Samsung SmartThings, SPS Commerce, Twitter, Telstra, Toyota, Zuora and more.",3.3,"Sumo Logic
3.3","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
147,Radar System Analysis Engineer,$52k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Radar System Analysis Engineer

SEG is seeking a Radar System Analysis Engineer to be part of a team providing support for U.S. Surface Navy (e.g. Aegis Baseline) programs and Missile Defense Agency (MDA) Ballistic Missile Defense System (BMDS) projects

Responsibilities
Characterize sensor performance against threat ballistic and cruise missiles through modeling, simulation and analysis using digital simulations.
Develop, integrate and use analytical models and tools to test new threat data and software products, assess system capability, and drive system requirements and design.
Define technical approach and plan studies based on understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer need. Define study measures of performance and effectiveness, design experiments, and demonstrate analytical skills. Conduct individual analyses, and contribute to team technical studies.
Communicate with external customer and internal technical staff, via correspondence and briefings.
Support technical leadership for internal project and contribute in external customer forums.
Author technical details of statements of work
A majority of the work is based out of our Columbia, MD office. Travel is occasionally required to participate in technical forums and reviews.
Local travel anticipated at 10 percent and occasional overnight trips at 5 percent time.
Required Skills

Required Qualifications
Ability to obtain and maintain a US DoD SECRET clearance
Bachelor’s Degree: Systems Engineering, Electrical, Physics, Applied Math or related technical degree.
5+ 7 years work experience
Systems engineering experience
Experience with sensors, seekers, or remote sensing in RF and IR bands.
Strong analytical skills
Programming and scripting experience in a Linux environment
Communication, documentation and briefing via Microsoft office products (Outlook, Powerpoint, Excel, Word)
Desired Qualifications
Active US DoD SECRET or TOP SECRET Security Clearance
Masters or PhD degree preferred with relevant research project experience
MATLAB for the visual display of quantitative information, and prototyping M&S codes
Python for modeling and simulation development, data analysis, etc.
Facility working with C++ API and creating test drivers
Self-starter – Demonstrate independent ownership of tasking. Position affords opportunity to define path and lead tasks based on technical understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer needs
Modeling and analysis experience and capability in one or more of the following areas:
RF Sensors / EO-IR Imaging / Remote Sensing Systems – Signal Processing, Detection and Track Filtering
Multi-Sensor Data Fusion, Target Classification and Discrimination (Machine Learning / AI applications)
Missile Systems (Aerodynamic, Ballistic, Space)
Defense Weapon System Performance (e.g. Navy Surface systems, Ballistic Missile Defense systems)
Ground Test and Field Test Events (missile flight and sensor track pre-event prediction and post-mission assessment)
Familiarity with version-control (Git), issue tracking (JIRA), collaboration software (Confluence), and cross-language software integration tools (SWIG).
Familiarity with high-performance computing environments
Systems Group Overview
Candidate will be part of a team responsible for weapon system simulation and performance analysis. The team develops and integrates individual system models for analysis (threats, weapons, sensors) to include multiple interacting systems. This team contributes to defining, leading and performing analyses for requirements feasibility, sensitivity studies for threat variability and fidelity, asset planning and what-if scenarios, flight-test mission (requirements, planning, and analysis) support and certification efforts.
The group provides independent verification and validation support for internal system-level products. This offers opportunities to work with SEG sensors, vehicles, phenomenology products and engineers integrated within our simulation software development environment to view the battle environment scenes through the eyes of combat systems.
The group includes subject matter experts and technical leads providing direct technical support to various defense programs as a contributing member of broad cross-functional and technical subject-specific integrated product teams.
We bring threat and weapons knowledge together to support concept definition, threat driver assessments, system requirements, design reviews, test planning, and defining road maps for future development
Company Overview

Systems Engineering Group, Inc. (SEG) is a highly regarded and leading provider of missile systems engineering and analysis. Principal customers include the U.S. Navy, Missile Defense Agency, AEGIS Ballistic Missile Defense Program, and Program Executive Offices for Integrated Warfare Systems and Ships. SEG is headquartered in Columbia, MD and is convenient to routes 32, 29, and 95. SEG is a wholly owned subsidiary of Telephonics Corporation. SEG provides excellent benefits, work environment and outstanding growth opportunities.

We are an Affirmative Action / Equal Employment Opportunity Employer (M/F/D/V). All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, gender, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected characteristic. Reasonable accommodations may include but are not limited to that which may enable individuals with disabilities and special disabled veterans to perform the essential functions of this position.

Required Experience

Job Location
Columbia, US-MD",2.5,"Telephonics
2.5","Columbia, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1933,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
148,FIS Systems Engineer II,$84k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Fujifilm Dimatix, Inc. strives to offer a healthy work environment that promotes individual responsibility and growth, a collaborative spirit, and an atmosphere that encourages learning, professional development and achievement.
We search for the most talented and qualified people for both external and internal opportunities. At Fujifilm, performance, development and accountability are the standards to which the company and its people strive toward. And to support its employees, we offer programs that motivate, educate and promote a healthy work-life balance, which increase employee satisfaction and overall personal well-being.
Fujifilm is committed to offering a comprehensive and flexible benefit program to meet the needs of employees and their families. This flexible approach allows employees to create a program that fits their lives. At Fujifilm, INNOVATION and PEOPLE matter.
FUJIFILM Dimatix, Inc. is an E-Verify Employer
EO-employer-M/F/Vets/Disabled
ATTN Staffing Services: We do not accept unsolicited resumes.

POSITION SUMMARY:
The systems engineer (SE) contributes to all stages of the development and support of inkjet printing equipment. It requires multidisciplinary skills that match the elements of the system including, mechanical, electrical, software, and chemical. The SE serves as the technical lead for a program. They are responsible for initial scoping, requirements generation, technical leadership within the development team, and validation. Organization, communication, problem solving, and leadership are critical skills important to a successful SE.
KNOWLEDGE
A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, career-oriented, journey-level position.
JOB COMPLEXITY
Works on problems of diverse scope where analysis of data requires evaluation of identifiable factors. Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions. Networks with senior internal and external personnel in many areas of expertise.
SUPERVISION
Normally receives little instruction on day-to-day work, general instructions on new assignments.
EXPERIENCE
Typically requires a minimum of 5 years of related experience with a Bachelor’s degree; or 3 years and a Master’s degree; or a PhD without experience; or equivalent work experience.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Presales support. This includes the capture high level requirements, concept generation, feasibility analysis, project scoping, and product cost estimation.
Creation and maintenance of detailed product requirements
Inkjet application development
Provide technical guidance to project engineers
Product Validation
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
None
QUALIFICATIONS:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential job function satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
REQUIRED:
Bachelor’s degree in an engineering discipline, or equivalent years of experience.
5 -8 years of related experience.
Design or development experience in relevant field
DESIRED:
Advanced degree in an engineering discipline.
Systems engineering experience
Knowledge of ink jet printing systems.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Ability to work long hours sporadically in order to meet group goals.
Travel
Standing, walking, using hands to finger, handle, or feel, and ability to communicate effectively
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Normal office environment. Dress as appropriate, business-casual is the “default”.
Works in manufacturing and engineering lab environment.
Moderate noise (examples: business office with computers and printers, print systems being tested, light traffic).
OTHER:
Other duties as may be assigned.
Each employee’s primary objective is to assure that the quality, delivery and cost controls within his/her control meet or exceed all of our internal and external customers’ requirements.
Each employee is required to abide by the Employee Handbook and the rules and regulations explained and provided at each orientation and training session. Special attention must be given to the safety aspects of these documents.
FUJIFILM Dimatix provides competitive wages, a generous benefits package and a friendly, dynamic working environment.


FUJIFILM Dimatix is an E-Verify Employee
eO-employer-M/F/Vets/Disabled",3.8,"FUJIFILM Dimatix
3.8","Lebanon, NH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1984,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
149,Senior Software Engineer (Scala),$63k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rewards Network (RN) is seeking a Senior Scala Software Engineer to work with a team of peers to build out a new business area and rewards platform from the ground up. As a member of the team, you will work closely with other software engineers, BAs, and stakeholders to design and develop a new rewards fast data platform and all the supporting applications. We are looking for a passionate problem solver that is highly focused, agile, and who thrives in a fast-paced, collaborative and team-centric environment using the latest technologies.
What You’ll Be Working With
Underlying architecture: Kubernetes, AWS Fargate/ECS, Docker, Immutable infrastructure
Technologies: Scala, Cats, FS2, Kafka, Postgres SQL, Elastic Search, Kibana, AWS S3
Tools: Intellij, Gitlab (VCS/CI), Team City, Postman, Slack, Jira
Duties and Responsibilities
Work with a team of peers to architect, design and implement our new platform and supporting applications in the latest technologies.
Apply technology to strategically solve business challenges.
Identify, research and implement new technologies that improve efficiency, responsiveness, resiliency, and/or ease of development.
Actively participate in and help evolve all adopted Agile/Lean/Kanban practices such as: TDD (Test Driven Development), BDD (Behavior Driven Development), stand-ups, retrospectives, continuous delivery, and knowledge sharing across team members.
Aggressively and proactively test software throughout the development cycle using a TDD mindset - including unit testing, functional testing, load testing and automation.
Collaborate with Quality Assurance engineers in test case construction, issue identification, as well as remediation and automation.
Continuously improve, refine, and refactor software.
Must Haves
BS in Computer Science (or equivalent experience)
5+ years of general development experience
2+ years of development using Scala or other functional languages
2+ years of experience on an Agile delivery team
Understand, articulate, and conform to core functional and OOP programming principles.
Experience with industry standard design patterns
Experience working with and designing RESTful microservice architectures
Experience with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery using Git, Team City or similar tools
A commitment to developing solid, tested, high performing valuable software
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to collaborate with a wide variety of people with varying technical skill sets and business knowledge
Excellent problem solving and troubleshooting skills. Must be able to quickly assess problems and determine proper steps to resolution.

#LI-BM1

We connect diners to fantastic restaurant experiences by offering unique card-linked offers thanks to our ability to leverage advanced technology and powerful data analytics, while simultaneously providing value to our strategic partners' overall loyalty programs.

We work alongside our restaurant partners every day, sharing in the ebbs and flows of their business while helping them achieve their dreams. We provide marketing and financing that work with their business and are truly pay-for-performance. We help them increase revenue, traffic, and customer engagement. Importantly, our services do not require the merchant to discount or give away their products.

Even more, we enhance our partners' loyalty programs by offering a turn-key, scalable dining rewards program that is right for their business model and leverages their unique brand to help increase the value proposition for their customers.

Finally, we connect our millions of members to our participating restaurants, allowing them to earn the rewards they desire when dining out.

Rewards Network is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). We encourage and strongly support workplace diversity.",3.8,"Rewards Network
3.8","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
150,Senior Labor Management Engineer,$52k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you looking to jump start your career with an exciting opportunity to get hands-on supply chain experience with some of the world’s largest and most recognizable brands?*
Here’s your chance to join a growing software and engineering team with a 30+ year history of innovation and market leadership. TZA offers industry-leading software, engineering, and training services to support Labor-Management Programs in distribution, manufacturing and last-mile delivery operations.
As a Senior Labor Management Engineer, you’ll have a multi-faceted role focused on technology integration, technical documentation, and industrial engineering to support TZA’s labor-management program implementations. *The experience you’ll gain will be invaluable as you develop your professional skills and take on more consultative responsibility in the future.
At TZA, you’ll be provided with an environment for personal and professional growth, only limited by your desire to take on more responsibility and development opportunities.

Here’s a snapshot of your responsibilities*:

· Develop Standard Operating Procedures

· Support Lean Best Practice processes

· Develop and validate Engineered Labor Standards

· Analyze customer operations to define data interface requirements in support of engineering strategies

· Functional liaison between engineering, marketing and technical teams

· Validate systems integration using SQL

· Configure TZA’s ProTrack Labor Management software

· Lead ProTrack software training classes

· Be responsible for completing all project documentation into deliverable formats

· Delivering projects on-time and on-budget

· Delivering excellence, both in the Customer experience and in quality of work

· Creating advocates for TZA’s software and services at all levels within Customer’s organization.
To be a successful Senior* *Labor-Management Engineer* *at TZA, you’ll need these skills and experience*:
· Bachelor's degree in Industrial Engineering, Supply chain Management, Computer Science or other related field with 3+ years of experience.

· Proficiency in Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)

· 3+ years of customer-facing experience. Experience with supply chain (warehouse, distribution, delivery) customers an advantage.

· Excellent verbal and written communication skills

· The ability to work with and build client relationships at all levels of the Customer’s organization, from senior leaders to hourly employees.

· Ability to learn quickly and apply skills without daily oversight

· Problem solving and analytics aptitude.

· Ability to work independently or as part of a team

· Experience developing engineered labor standards

· Experience with Time Study, MSD, MOST or MTM

· Experience in MSSQL or similar enterprise RDBMS a plus

This position is a full-time role offering competitive salary, project bonus, and full benefits. This position requires 80% or more travel so proximity to an airport is important.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $95,000.00 per year

Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"TZA
3.1","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
151,Database Administrator/Analyst,$30k-$58k (Glassdoor Est.),"LeTourneau University
Information Technology

Database Administrator / Analyst

DATE: 7/24/2020

LOCATION: Longview

REPORTS TO: Director, Business Systems Management

SCHEDULE: Office hours are primarily weekdays, but responsibilities require additional hours and flexibility that can include evenings and weekends.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

_The following statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of one so classified. _

The Database Administrator/Analyst serves on a team of other Programmer/Analysts and provides operational database services with security controls to the university including, but not limited to, the design and implementation of related databases, data warehouse/data marts, BI tools, system interfaces, standard applications, and custom applications.

• Designs writes and modifies programs to improve application processing (e.g. online applications to websites, data transfer to internal databases, processing of application data and online payment systems

• Provides database support to users, including gathering user requirements to identify improvements which will simplify processes and increase productivity

• Identifies ways to solve database needs and challenges. This includes researching new database products, services and protocols to enhance systems within the university

• Communicates with end-users and departments, responds to queries or requests and acts as a liaison with developers to improve applications and establish best practices for the university

• Analyzes business requirements and programs automated scripts to provide end-user support and regular maintenance to the databases. Creates custom-designed business analysis queries and code to manipulate information and achieve organizational goals

• Works with development, support, and operations teams to help achieve a state-of-the- art environment that meets current and future business objectives

• Reviews service-related reports daily to assure that issues are identified and resolved proactively (database backups, interfaces, maintenance, monitoring)

• Leads and participates as a contributor in projects

• Serves in a consultative role for other Database Programmer/Analysts on the Business

The systems Management team, acting as mentor and trainer as needed

QUALIFICATIONS:

• Significant experience in a data-focused environment

• Strong command of and experience with SQL, SQL server platforms, and SQL server tools

• Advanced knowledge of database security, backup/recovery, and performance monitoring standards

• Understanding of relational and dimensional data modeling

• PowerShell and Unix shell scripting skills

• Familiarity with SSAS, SSIS, SSRS

• Strong mathematical and statistical knowledge

• Excellent written and verbal communication skills

• Impeccable attention to detail

• Excels as a member of a larger team, as a trainer, as a mentor, and as an individual contributor.

• Knowledge/Experience with the following a definite plus in meeting duties and responsibilities: o C# o .NET framework o PERL o Informix database o Linux operating system

LeTourneau University seeks a person with an enthusiastic and contagious Christian faith who is committed to Christian higher education that integrates Christian faith with learning.

SALARY AND BENEFITS:

Salary is competitive and commensurate with experience and other qualifications. LeTourneau
University provides a significant benefits package, which includes medical and life insurance and contribution to a retirement program.

DATE POSITION IS AVAILABLE: Immediately

PROCEDURE FOR APPLICATION OR NOMINATION:

Applications will be reviewed in the order received and will continue until the position is filled.
_In accordance with applicable provisions of federal law, applicants for employment who are in agreement with the educational mission of LeTourneau University and applicants for admission to educational programs or activities are considered without discrimination on the basis of race, age, sex, handicapping condition, national origin or genetic information. Inquiries about this policy should be directed to the Director of Human Resources, (903) 233-4170. _

Applications are required and are available from www.letu.edu/jobs or from the Business Office,
LeTourneau University, 2100 Mobberly Avenue, Longview, TX. Send completed application, and a current résumé to:

Faculty postings: List here the person, committee, or department to whom applications should be addressed. Include address, phone, and fax numbers. The E-mail address may also be included.

Staff postings must read:

LeTourneau University
ATTN: Human Resources

P.O. Box 7001
Longview, Texas 75607-7001

ABOUT THE UNIVERSITY:
LeTourneau University is the premier Christian polytechnic university in the nation where educators engage students to nurture Christian virtue, develop competency and ingenuity in their professional fields, integrate faith and work, and serve the local and global community.

LETU is a Christ-centered, interdenominational institute of higher learning offering more than 85 undergraduate and graduate degree programs in arts and sciences, aviation, business & technology, communication, computer science, criminal justice, education, engineering, nursing, psychology & counseling, and theology & vocation. LETU's 2,700 students represent nearly all
50 states, more than 30 foreign countries, and around 50 different denominational groups. In addition to residential programs at the main campus in Longview, Texas, students are enrolled in a robust suite of online programs, as well as innovative hybrid programs in the Dallas and
Houston areas.

LETU is consistently recognized by U.S. News and World Report as one of ""America's Best
Colleges,"" and the engineering program is ranked nationally. LeTourneau University is accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges
(1866 Southern Lane, Decatur, Georgia 30033-4097, telephone 404-679-4500, at http://www.sacscoc.org) to award associate, baccalaureate, and master's degrees. LeTourneau
University's engineering and engineering technology programs are accredited by the
Engineering Accreditation Commission and the Technology Accreditation Commission of the
Accreditation Board of Engineering and Technology, 111 Market Place, Suite 1050, Baltimore,
MD 21202-4012 - telephone: 410-347-7700. The Carnegie Foundation classifies LeTourneau
University as a Master's (Comprehensive) University II.

The 162-acre main campus is located in Longview, Texas, a progressive hub city with an MSA of over 190,000, nestled among the beautiful pine-forested hills and lakes of East Texas. It is approximately 120 miles east of Dallas, Texas, and 60 miles west of Shreveport, Louisiana.

See https://www.letu.edu for more information.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Employee Discount
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",4.1,"LeTourneau University
4.1","Longview, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1946,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
152,Senior Software Engineer in Motion Planning,$104k-$199k (Glassdoor Est.),"Baidu USA, located in Silicon Valley, is looking for Senior Software Engineer in Motion Planning to work on the Baidu autonomous driving team. You will be responsible for areas such as spec definition, system prototyping, design, implementation, and sensor integration.

Here's what you will do:
You will be responsible for designing and developing new motion planning algorithms for comfortable and safe trajectories efficiently
You will be responsible for developing algorithms including path planning algorithms for lane keeping, proactive and passive lane change, automatic parking and etc. at different speed..
You will be working together with control engineers to model vehicle and controller dynamics and use these models to characterize and accelerate controller improvements.
You will be responsible for analyzing data to assess and improve system performance.
You will be collaborate with the teams in localization, perception, prediction and control to optimize systems.
You will be responsible for integrating, deploying, testing and verifying algorithms on the vehicles.
You will be participating to build new concepts and groundbreaking solutions that shape the future of mobility.
Here's what we'd like to see in you:
Solid background and knowledge in vehicle or robotic planning
Prior experience in vehicle/robotic planning is preferred
Prior experience in auto industry is preferred
Strong programming in C++
Advanced degree in automation, maths, optimization and other related disciplin
Culture Fit:


Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
153,HVAC Engineer - Casino Morongo,$51k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Exercises expertise in HVAC service/maintenance. Oversees installations, repairs & services of HVAC system(s). Maintains environmental control systems through preventative and trouble-shooting efforts.

Installs air & water filters, changing out all HEPA filters & other filters on all units.
Must create and maintain a preventative maintenance program.
Tests, diagnoses and repairs or replaces faulty components in the heating and air units.
Services and changes-out compressors.
Ensures proper functioning of all environmental control systems for Resort.
Performs other job related duties as assigned.

Guest-service-orientation essential. Knowledge of refrigeration, heating/air conditioning technology.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:
High School Diploma or GED required. Minimum of three (3) to five (5) years experience in heating/air conditioning w/ knowledge of automated control systems. EPA Card required.
LICENSES, CERTIFICATES & REGISTRATIONS:
Must undergo and successfully pass a background investigation to obtain and maintain a gaming license issued by the Morongo Gaming Agency. Should have HVAC Certification.
LANGUAGE SKILLS:
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions and procedure manuals.
MATHEMATICAL SKILLS:
Ability to add, subtract, multiply and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals.
REASONING ABILITY:
Ability to define and deal with problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram or schedule form. Ability to apply regulatory and procedural doctrine, concepts and policy to practical situations.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
While performing the duties of this job, the team member is required to stand, use hands to finger, handle, or feel and talk or hear. The team member is required to walk. The team member is occasionally required to sit and reach with hands and arms. Position involves functioning both in an office environment and in the field. Field work involves manual labor, and occasional lifting and/or moving up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
The duties of this position are typically performed on the Resort floor, which will have moderate to medium noise levels, and adequate lighting. The Resort is a smoking environment.
WORKING HOURS:
Because we are open 24 hours a day, 365 days a year, most positions require flexibility in scheduling and may require Team Members be available for evenings, weekends, holidays and special events. A typical workweek is 40 hours and normal work schedules may vary based on business needs and may include scheduled shifts Monday through Sunday. Position may require overtime.
INDIAN PREFERENCE:
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer while practicing Native American preference according to law.",3.4,"Morongo Casino Resort and Spa
3.4","Cabazon, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Gambling,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
154,Senior Engineer,-1,"POSITION DESCRIPTION
Primary responsibility is to oversee the efficient operations and maintenance of all building systems. Additional responsibilities include the operational management and effective daily leadership and administration of the building engineering team with the objectives of safely, efficiently, and effectively operating machinery and systems in a cost-effective manner. The Engineer must ensure the highest level of professionalism, while meeting the clients’ needs. Responsible for protecting and improving the value of the client’s assets, ensuring that the building systems continue to perform to their intended function. Apprise the Property Management of any and all conditions affecting building services and tenant comfort. Engineer must be able to work with and direct the efforts of both staff engineers and outside contractors alike. This position is for a working Engineer
RESPONSIBILITIES
Oversee the maintenance and continuous operation of all building systems including: fire/life safety, mechanical (HVAC, plumbing, controls) electrical (lighting, UPS, PDU, generators, primary switch gear), cabling (data and voice, broad band), lighting and temperature controls systems, critical environments, light construction (painting, doors, locks), digital systems(fire alarm, duress, card access, radionics, CCTV), and Audio/Visual services. Utilize staff and contracting with outside vendors as necessary
Identify the maintenance objectives of the facility and incorporate those objectives into a documented plan that includes preventive, predictive and reactive maintenance procedures
Identify safety hazards within the building and incorporate the remediation of such hazards to ensure that the building’s staff and occupants work in a safe environment. Implement, administer, and manage safety training program
Ensure that compliance of all regulatory laws and guidelines are met as they relate to the operation of the building’s infrastructure. Responsible for alerting management of building discrepancies
Assist in the development of a Capital plan which would include planning for infra-structure upgrades, equipment replacements and building modifications to ensure the building’s future capabilities are maintained
Responsible for ensuring that major projects performed at the building are properly planned, executed and closed out in accordance with standard industry practices
Maintain all infrastructure and compliance documentation for the building including up-to-date building drawings and single lines as well as documentation mandated for the purpose of maintaining regulatory compliance with Federal, State or Local law
Responsible for overseeing the activities of contractors working within the building either as representatives of the building itself or tenants operating within the buildings
Responsible for keeping records of buildings rounds and readings, all engineering logs and engineering data sheets
Responsible for advance training and notification to all contractors so that they are informed and knowledgeable with respects to the building’s critical functions and the work they are to perform, including an incident contact response list
Performs additional job duties as requested
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS
Must be able to lift 50 lbs. and use 26-foot ladder
REQUIREMENTS
High School diploma or GED equivalent
Minimum of five years hands on experience in commercial building engineering, or equivalent. HVAC and electrical engineering knowledge a necessity
Three or more years’ experience engineering and maintenance supervision
Working knowledge of computer applications including Word, Excel and PowerPoint
Demonstrated verbal/written communication skills
Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Other
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Confidential,"Cleveland, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
155,Data Engineer,$69k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

NJVC, LLC

Company Job Title: Data Engineer

Clearance: Top Secret with ability to obtain SCI

Location: Springfield, VA

Reports To: Program Manager

FLSA Status: Exempt, Full Time, Regular

Summary:

The Data Engineer will work with product owners and data stewards to deliver high quality technical solutions in response to business requirements. You will be counted on to provide your peers with technical expertise that will offer solutions for difficult programming problems.

Duties and Responsibilities:
SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS) including UI and custom code features.
Write or create stored procedures, SQL scripts, SSIS packages that can be used to:
Move data from source databases to target databases
Clean / Condition data
Convert or transform data
Reconcile and confirm converted data
Find data errors
Validate data to business rules
Ability to examine existing ETL scripts and track data back to source
SQL Server administration, tuning, and workbench.
Work with business experts to understand data and complete data mappings.
Focus on the development of extract, transform, and load (ETL) jobs currently using Microsoft SQL, Server, and SSIS.
The environment currently supports hundreds of related ETL jobs that move data between 30 different source systems and between multiple classifications.
Part of the challenge as a data engineer will be to find scalable and efficient coding solutions that plug into this extensible system in order to add more data to the Enterprise data store.
Other duties as assigned
Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.)
Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field
Equivalent years of experience in lieu of degree
4 years of relevant experience with the following software / tools:
Experience with Microsoft SQL
Prior experience supporting IC/DoD
The existing data warehouse is built on Microsoft SQL hosted on Amazon Web Services (AWS), so experience developing solutions that scale well in these environments is a plus.
Active Top-Secret Clearance with ability to obtain SCI
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Ability to work independently and yet be effective within a team setting
Must be capable of managing multiple efforts with time related constraints in a fast-paced contracting environment
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with diverse internal and external stakeholder groups and individuals
Friendly presence, helpful attitude, good interpersonal skills, and ability to work well with others.
Excellent skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, and other Office applications
Proficient with Microsoft Office Applications, and experience working in a home office setting as well as the ability to train end users on frequently asked technical issues.
Ability to provide technical assistance and support over the phone; good phone skills, professional demeanor, previous customer service experience strongly desired.
Good problem-solving skills; ability to visualize a problem/situation and think abstractly to solve it

Physical Demands: (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.
Work Environment: (The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.)
The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.
During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise.
Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Native preference under PL 93-638.

We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.

Primary Location: United States-Virginia-Springfield

Organization: NJVC
Strategic Business Unit: Military Intelligence and Operations Support
Security Requirements: Top Secret
Job Schedule: Full Time Exempt
Recruiter: Jonas Patterson
Req ID: 2000001203",4.3,"Chenega MIOS
4.3","Springfield, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
156,MSAT Senior Scientist/Engineer Small Molecules API,$87k-$170k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want the opportunity to utilize your small molecule chemistry expertise in a growing function within Seattle Genetics? As a member of the newly formed MSAT function, you will have a unique opportunity to apply your scientific knowledge and technical skills in readying processes for validation and supporting commercial production. Working cross functionally between Process Development and Manufacturing to ensure technology transfer is successful and Seattle Genetics has the most reliable, robust chemical processes for small molecule related components is a key requirement of this position. We’re looking for someone who is enthusiastic, knowledgeable, and can step in right away to contribute as a team player to project development. Is this you?

Summary:

The MSAT Sr./Engineer is part of a team of highly skilled Scientists and Engineers responsible for technical and scientific support to manufacturing of Seattle Genetics small molecule products, whether manufactured internally or at contract manufacturing organizations (CMO’s). The Incumbent collaborates with peers from Development functions to ensure a high degree of manufacturability of processes being developed and will contribute to or lead technology transfers to or between contract manufacturers. The MSAT Sr. Scientist/Engineer will support process validation and GMP manufacturing including person-in-plant presence and trouble-shooting activities at CMO’s, working closely with QA and QC. The incumbent provides technical and scientific leadership as subject matter expert (SME) relating to manufacturing processes, change control, scale-down/up studies, technology implementation projects and process optimization.

Responsibilities:
Supporting small molecule (drug substance and drug product) manufacturing activities for clinical and commercial manufacturing internally or at CMO’s
Providing technical and scientific leadership as subject matter expert (SME) relating to technology transfers, manufacturing processes, complex deviations, technical troubleshooting, CAPA design and implementation, process monitoring, change control and process optimization
Acts as Tech Transfer lead for transfer of processes into manufacturing facilities
Support the DS/API throughout the 3 phases of Validation (Process Design, Process Qualification and Continuous Process Verification)
Partnering with other functions to apply e.g. modelling tools ensuring that scale-down/up and characterization of manufacturing processes is robust and scientifically sound leading to a predictable and highly consistent performance and a well characterized process
Providing guidance for root cause investigations of process related deviations in a timely, comprehensive, and conclusive manner. Leads the data analysis of process data statistics, identifies process deviations, assesses product impact, prepares technical reports, and proposes process solutions and improvements
Acting as person-in-plant during tech transfer, validation studies and commercial manufacturing
Develop, optimize, and review Master Batch Records and Batch Records during development, clinical supply and transfer to commercial supply
Providing guidance for comprehensive facility fit assessments and gap analysis for the relevant part of the GMP manufacturing
Interfacing with Development and manufacturing sites for know-how transfers and process data analysis & mapping in order to anticipate potential risks and opportunities for improvements supporting next generation manufacturing processes. Identifies and initiates process and procedural changes to improve process performance, robustness, productivity, safety, efficiency, and compliance
Qualifications:
Demonstrated knowledge and proficiency in the synthesis and scale-up of small molecule compounds (multi-step synthesis, route selection, chromatography, crystallisation, solid form etc.) is required
Experience with GMP Drug Product manufacturing for oral dosage forms (blending, compaction, tableting, film-coating, etc.) is desired
Strong scientific and technical experience within relevant manufacturing process technologies and unit operations. Preferably experience with equipment utilized in commercial cGMP manufacturing facilities
Good knowledge of structured methodologies for process design, scale-up/down models, process control strategies, process validation and continuous process verification
The ability to work effectively in small matrix teams in a fast-paced environment with changing priorities and a high level of urgency. Highly motivated with the ability to work independently as well as on cross-functional and cross-site teams
Experience working with Contract Manufacturing Organizations is desirable
Able to effectively establish and maintain productive relationships with senior technical staff within and outside of Seattle Genetics
The candidate must demonstrate high levels of integrity. Key competencies are management of complexity, driving for results, problem-solving and collaborating cross-functionally.
Strong communication skills and computer literacy are essential
Experience with innovation and operational excellence is desirable
A good understanding of statistical analysis and continuous process verification is desirable
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Chemistry/Chemical Engineering or related discipline with a minimum of 8 years relevant industrial experience
Alternatively, M.S. or Ph.D. in Organic Chemistry, Analytical Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or related discipline (M.S. and 6 years or Ph.D. with 4 years of industrial experience)
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Chemistry/Chemical Engineering or related discipline with a minimum of 8 years relevant industrial experience
Alternatively, M.S. or Ph.D. in Organic Chemistry, Analytical Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or related discipline (M.S. and 6 years or Ph.D. with 4 years of industrial experience)
As the leading employer in our industry in the Pacific Northwest, Seattle Genetics is proud to offer a competitive total compensation package as well as a comprehensive benefits program designed to support the whole lives of our employees and their families. Benefits include medical, vision and dental coverage, group and supplemental life insurance, 401(k) with company match, tuition reimbursement, relocation assistance and much more. To learn more about Seattle Genetics, please visit www.seattlegenetics.com.

Seattle Genetics is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applications will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, gender identity, sexual orientation, color, religion, sex, marital status, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, or any other status protected by federal, state, or local law.

#LI-DD1",4.1,"Seagen
4.1","Bothell, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
157,Data Engineer,-1,"Why you'll love working here:

Zylotech is a fast-growing company that rewards autonomy and creativity. Our team works hard, is fast and collaborative, and we encourage personal growth. There are many opportunities to work with other departments where you can interact with some incredibly talented people.

What you’ll do:
Coordinate with Product management and technical stakeholders to continue building our SaaS product data + decision pipe
Perform architecture design, data modeling, and implementation of Big Data platform or Data pipe
Architect and develop big data solutions on either AWS or GCP cloud platforms
Set up and manage big data infrastructure to ingest and process data from multiple sources for Enterprise customer deployment
Create scalable & robust data pipelines to transfer data from source to destination data stores
Player and coach across a team of big data engineers, ML engineers, data scientist towards agile shipping of features and milestone
What we seek:
Prior experience in building, developing, architect scalable big data applications from grounds up preferably in product startups.
2+ years of experience in Data Engineering
Experience working with Big Data stack, Big Map Reduce, Hive, Kafka, Impala, Hadoop, Big Query, Spark SQL, Spark Streaming, HBase etc
Experience in Databases (NoSQL and SQL)
Experience in creating Data-warehouses and scheduling automated ETL jobs
Experience in Docker and Kubernetes
Good Communication Skill, both verbal & written. Confident in communicating with business & technical stakeholders alike.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or a related field of study.
Important Personal Attributes:
You are curious about technology & science.
Team matters.
Challenging yourself is an intrinsic part of who you are.
Sharing and debating ideas to get to the right answer is important to you.
You seek to act and don’t wait to be told.
You like to teach those around you.
You are serious about your work but also believe that laughter and levity are important.
You work hard and you also have passions outside of work that enrich your life.
Winning is important to you, but so is how you win.
You take pride & ownership in building a Product and company who is disrupting an industry.
About Zylotech:

Zylotech is a self-learning customer intelligence platform that helps marketers create complete customer profiles for targeting revenue opportunities more effectively. Powered by AutoML, the platform continuously unifies and enriches internal and external data, and performs ongoing micro-segmentation, pattern discovery, and recommendations, all while integrating with a variety of marketing clouds for on-demand accessibility. Zylotech’s cross-industry clients have reported up to a 6x increase in customer lift. For more information, visit Zylotech.com.

Zylotech is an equal employment opportunity employer and does not discriminate against any applicant because of race, creed, color, age, national origin, ancestry, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, genetic information, veteran status, military status, application for military service or any other class protected by state or federal law.

To all recruitment agencies: Zylotech does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Zylotech employees or any other company location. Zylotech is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Unsolicited resumes received will be considered our property and will be processed accordingly.

Qualified Applicants must be legally authorized for employment in the United States. Qualified Applicants will not require employer-sponsored work authorization now or in the future for employment in the United States.",3.4,"Zylotech
3.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
158,Systems Engineer - Radar Simulation,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The Algorithm & Simulation (A&S) Directorate is responsible for algorithm development including radio-frequency (RF) and electro-optical/infrared (EO-IR) Signal Processing; Guidance, Navigation, and Control; and missile-and-sensor-level Modeling and Simulation for RMD's broad portfolio of projects, programs and products. The MSA teams within the A&S Directorate provide, develop, and maintain high fidelity performance simulations (including multiple sensor channels, scene generation capability, control hardware, physical environment, and embedded software), execute system performance analysis (including pre-flight prediction, post flight matching, and verification and validation), support new business initiatives and develop & execute technology roadmaps. Our portfolio includes surface Navy, undersea Navy, missile defense sensors, interceptors, command and control, integrated air and missile defense systems and space surveillance systems.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Job Description:
The candidate will develop and analyze radar algorithms in the context of a high fidelity digital simulation supplemented by field measurements. The systems engineer will work collaboratively to extend and validate the digital simulation, assess radar performance in complex multi-mission scenarios by reviewing detailed data from individual runs and across broad sets of runs, and investigate and resolve issues identified during analysis. The systems engineer will support updating and developing new requirements for implementing and verifying refined and new radar algorithms in tactical radar software. The engineer will develop and present briefings and reports on performance assessments, new and modified radar algorithms, scene modeling approaches, and issue investigations. The engineer will support integration of the high fidelity radar simulation into federations managed by other US Government organizations.

Required Skills:
2+ years of radar modeling and/or analysis experience
Experience using Matlab for data analysis
Experience with a compiled programming language
Ability to work both independently and in a team environment
Commitment to work on-site in a classified environment
Active DoD SECRET clearance, or interim SECRET clearance required prior to start date.
Desired Skills:
Understanding of radar signal processing, radar tracking, and electronic protection
Understanding of environmental clutter and RF propagation phenomenology and modeling
Experience with classification and machine learning techniques
Experience with Java programming
Basic understanding of Linux (from a users point of view)
MS or PhD in Engineering, Science or Mathematics
Required Education (including Major):
Minimum Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, or Mathematics area
Keywords:
Radar Systems, RF, radar, simulation, M&S, federated simulation, algorithm development, systems engineering, research and development, Java, Matlab, radar tracking, signal processing, electronic protection, classification, classifier, machine learning, clutter, propagation, mathematics, software, engineer, algorithm, DoD, V&V

168595

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
159,Kitchen Equipment Engineer,$48k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Exercises expertise in kitchen equipment maintenance. Position inspects, repairs and services all refrigerated, electric and natural gas operated kitchen equipment.

Repairs all refrigerated, electrical and gas operated kitchen equipment.
Performs all inspections as required by local codes.
Creates preventative maintenance program and maintains all kitchen equipment through its implementation.
Orders and maintains adequate repair parts to facilitate timely repairs.
Initiates as required and completes all work orders of repairs completed, parts used, and time expended.
Performs other plumbing repairs as required.
Performs other electrical repairs as required.
Maintains all records and inspections as required by department, state and local regulations.
Performs other job related duties as assigned.

Knowledge of methods, practices, equipment and supplies used in the maintenance and repair of kitchen equipment. Knowledge of practice and procedures related to the maintenance and operation of such equipment. Knowledge of materials (parts and supplies) for kitchen equipment.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:
High School Diploma or GED required. Three (3) years successful experience in kitchen equipment repair. Basic knowledge of refrigeration, electrical and plumbing codes, and fire safety codes related to kitchen equipment installation and inspection.
LICENSES, CERTIFICATES & REGISTRATIONS:
Must undergo and successfully pass a background investigation to obtain and maintain a gaming license issued by the Morongo Gaming Agency.
LANGUAGE SKILLS:
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions and procedure manuals.
MATHEMATICAL SKILLS:
Ability to add, subtract, multiply and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals.
REASONING ABILITY:
Ability to define and deal with problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram or schedule form. Ability to apply regulatory and procedural doctrine, concepts and policy to practical situations.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The work is performed while standing or walking. It requires the ability to communicate effectively using speech, vision and hearing. The work requires the use of hands for simple grasping, pushing and pulling of arm controls and fine manipulations. The work requires the use of feet for repetitive movements. The work at times requires bending, squatting, crawling, climbing, reaching, with the ability to lift, carry, push or pull heavy weights. The work requires activities involving being around moving machinery, exposure to marked changes in temperature and humidity, exposure to dust, fumes and gases.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
The duties of this position are typically performed on the Resort floor, which will have moderate to medium noise levels, and adequate lighting. The Resort is a smoking environment.
WORKING HOURS:
Because we are open 24 hours a day, 365 days a year, most positions require flexibility in scheduling and may require team members be available for evenings, weekends, holidays and special events. A typical workweek is 40 hours and normal work schedules may vary based on business needs and may include scheduled shifts Monday through Sunday. Position may require overtime.
INDIAN PREFERENCE:
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer while practicing Native American preference according to law.",3.4,"Morongo Casino Resort and Spa
3.4","Cabazon, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Gambling,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
160,Data Engineer - AWS,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
161,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"KnowBe4, Inc. is the provider of the world's largest security awareness training and simulated phishing platform. KnowBe4 enables organizations to manage the ongoing problem of social engineering by helping them train employees to make smarter security decisions, every day. Tens of thousands of organizations worldwide use KnowBe4's platform to mobilize their end users as a last line of defense and enable them to make better security decisions, every day.

We have ranked a best place to work for women, millennials, and in technology nationwide by Fortune Magazine as well as #1 or #2 in The Tampa Bay Top Workplaces Survey for the last five years.

****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Engineer is responsible for developing, managing and optimizing our data pipelines, architecture, and datasets using Amazon Web Services. He or she will work alongside the developers, data analysts and data scientists to support the organization's data initiatives by evaluating, reviewing, implementing, and building the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources.

Responsibilities:
Design and develop data pipelines and ETL processes to connect with various data sources
Collaborate with Data Architects, Business SMEs, and Data Scientists to design, develop end-to-end data pipeline to meet fast paced organization needs across geographic regions
Support application programming interfaces (APIs), tools, and third-party products to extract data from SaaS applications
Extract data from various systems such as Salesforce.com, NetSuite, and our own products to create data models
Design and maintain enterprise data warehouse models
Deploy updates and fixes and provide technical support as requested
Implement standardized, automated operational and quality control processes to deliver accurate and timely data and reporting to meet or exceed SLAs.
Ensure current and future architecture meets stakeholder needs
Build and manage large scale data systems and ingestion capabilities and infrastructure
Research, recommend, and implement methods to ensure data integrity and quality
Build analytical solutions by manipulating large data sets and integrating diverse data sources
Work closely with the data scientists, and database and systems administrators to create data solutions
Ensure current and future architecture meets stakeholder needs
Build and manage large scale data systems and ingestion capabilities and infrastructure
Implement standardized, automated operational and quality control processes to deliver accurate and timely data and reporting to meet or exceed SLAs.
Perform ad-hoc analysis to meet business requirements, as requested.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field required
A minimum of 4 years of proven work experience as a data engineer
1+ years of Amazon Web Services (AWS) data related services required
Strong understanding of data structures and writing complex data analysis queries
Proven track record of shipping large, complex, data products
Superior organizational, communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills
Strong understanding of data structures and writing complex data analysis queries
Strong understanding of non-relational data structures and concepts related to BI
Experience with ""big data"" data pipelines and performing root cause analysis
Ability to manipulate, process, and extract value from large disparate data sets
Strong scripting skills: Python, PySpark
ITIL certification a plus
AWS certification a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

Individuals seeking employment at KnowBe4 are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
162,Systems Engineer - Radar Simulation,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The Algorithm & Simulation (A&S) Directorate is responsible for algorithm development including radio-frequency (RF) and electro-optical/infrared (EO-IR) Signal Processing; Guidance, Navigation, and Control; and missile-and-sensor-level Modeling and Simulation for RMD's broad portfolio of projects, programs and products. The MSA teams within the A&S Directorate provide, develop, and maintain high fidelity performance simulations (including multiple sensor channels, scene generation capability, control hardware, physical environment, and embedded software), execute system performance analysis (including pre-flight prediction, post flight matching, and verification and validation), support new business initiatives and develop & execute technology roadmaps. Our portfolio includes surface Navy, undersea Navy, missile defense sensors, interceptors, command and control, integrated air and missile defense systems and space surveillance systems.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Job Description:
The candidate will develop and analyze radar algorithms in the context of a high fidelity digital simulation supplemented by field measurements. The systems engineer will work collaboratively to extend and validate the digital simulation, assess radar performance in complex multi-mission scenarios by reviewing detailed data from individual runs and across broad sets of runs, and investigate and resolve issues identified during analysis. The systems engineer will support updating and developing new requirements for implementing and verifying refined and new radar algorithms in tactical radar software. The engineer will develop and present briefings and reports on performance assessments, new and modified radar algorithms, scene modeling approaches, and issue investigations. The engineer will support integration of the high fidelity radar simulation into federations managed by other US Government organizations.

Required Skills:
2+ years of radar modeling and/or analysis experience
Experience using Matlab for data analysis
Experience with a compiled programming language
Ability to work both independently and in a team environment
Commitment to work on-site in a classified environment
Active DoD SECRET clearance, or interim SECRET clearance required prior to start date.
Desired Skills:
Understanding of radar signal processing, radar tracking, and electronic protection
Understanding of environmental clutter and RF propagation phenomenology and modeling
Experience with classification and machine learning techniques
Experience with Java programming
Basic understanding of Linux (from a users point of view)
MS or PhD in Engineering, Science or Mathematics
Required Education (including Major):
Minimum Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, or Mathematics area
Keywords:
Radar Systems, RF, radar, simulation, M&S, federated simulation, algorithm development, systems engineering, research and development, Java, Matlab, radar tracking, signal processing, electronic protection, classification, classifier, machine learning, clutter, propagation, mathematics, software, engineer, algorithm, DoD, V&V

168595

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
163,Kitchen Equipment Engineer,$48k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Exercises expertise in kitchen equipment maintenance. Position inspects, repairs and services all refrigerated, electric and natural gas operated kitchen equipment.

Repairs all refrigerated, electrical and gas operated kitchen equipment.
Performs all inspections as required by local codes.
Creates preventative maintenance program and maintains all kitchen equipment through its implementation.
Orders and maintains adequate repair parts to facilitate timely repairs.
Initiates as required and completes all work orders of repairs completed, parts used, and time expended.
Performs other plumbing repairs as required.
Performs other electrical repairs as required.
Maintains all records and inspections as required by department, state and local regulations.
Performs other job related duties as assigned.

Knowledge of methods, practices, equipment and supplies used in the maintenance and repair of kitchen equipment. Knowledge of practice and procedures related to the maintenance and operation of such equipment. Knowledge of materials (parts and supplies) for kitchen equipment.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:
High School Diploma or GED required. Three (3) years successful experience in kitchen equipment repair. Basic knowledge of refrigeration, electrical and plumbing codes, and fire safety codes related to kitchen equipment installation and inspection.
LICENSES, CERTIFICATES & REGISTRATIONS:
Must undergo and successfully pass a background investigation to obtain and maintain a gaming license issued by the Morongo Gaming Agency.
LANGUAGE SKILLS:
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions and procedure manuals.
MATHEMATICAL SKILLS:
Ability to add, subtract, multiply and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals.
REASONING ABILITY:
Ability to define and deal with problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram or schedule form. Ability to apply regulatory and procedural doctrine, concepts and policy to practical situations.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The work is performed while standing or walking. It requires the ability to communicate effectively using speech, vision and hearing. The work requires the use of hands for simple grasping, pushing and pulling of arm controls and fine manipulations. The work requires the use of feet for repetitive movements. The work at times requires bending, squatting, crawling, climbing, reaching, with the ability to lift, carry, push or pull heavy weights. The work requires activities involving being around moving machinery, exposure to marked changes in temperature and humidity, exposure to dust, fumes and gases.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
The duties of this position are typically performed on the Resort floor, which will have moderate to medium noise levels, and adequate lighting. The Resort is a smoking environment.
WORKING HOURS:
Because we are open 24 hours a day, 365 days a year, most positions require flexibility in scheduling and may require team members be available for evenings, weekends, holidays and special events. A typical workweek is 40 hours and normal work schedules may vary based on business needs and may include scheduled shifts Monday through Sunday. Position may require overtime.
INDIAN PREFERENCE:
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer while practicing Native American preference according to law.",3.4,"Morongo Casino Resort and Spa
3.4","Cabazon, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Gambling,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
164,Principal Systems Engineer - Systems Integrator,-1,"Position Summary:

The Weapons & Platforms Center (W&PC) within the Systems Integration and Test Directorate for Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD) in Tucson, AZ is seeking candidates for the role of a RMD Integrator Engineer for hardware with strong knowledge in hardware development and testing at the sub assembly to full assembly testing in a lab and field environments. The selected candidate will be a technical lead and individual contributor in support of test planning, integration, testing, and analysis.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment

Responsibilities:
Develop and verify test plans and procedures.
Utilize lab / field test equipment for testing and troubleshooting
Develop and influence test objectives collaboratively with HIL, TSSC and Systems leads on the respective programs.
Perform as a leader of integration and/or field test teams for: missile builds and data analysis, qualification testing, design verification testing, hardware integration, aircraft integration, and flight testing.
Provide programmatic coordination and technical oversight of units under tests that entails the build, test and integration, including review and analysis of acceptance data for both lab and field test activities.
Compile and analyze test data and provide detailed reports of the results.
Should test failures occur, perform root cause and corrective action analysis as required.
Accountable for pedigree control and completeness of all documentation.
Able to support field testing with occasional travel for durations typically one to two week durations.
Support, create and present Consent to Ship (CTS) and Test Readiness Review (TRR) packages
Provide proposal support including writing of Basis of Estimates (BOEs) for integration and field test support requests from customers
Able to travel to domestic field sites on occasion

Required Experience & Skills:

U.S. Citizenship required
A minimum of eight (8) years of technical/engineering experience in a test environment with emphasis in test planning and/or execution with leadership experience. Leading or managing teams.
Experience developing and evaluating requirements
Understanding and working knowledge of troubleshooting and failure process
Advanced understanding and use of lab/field test equipment
Experience with Verification and Validation methods and associated activities
Experience creating integration and verification strategies to support efficiency improvements

Desired Experience & Skills:
Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skills
Able to perform successfully in an environment with frequent and direct interaction with customers and peers
Able to work well in diverse teams and have the ability to multi-task
Customer oriented and results driven
Excellent communication (oral and written) skills
Experience performing real time data collection / analysis (including telemetry)
Required Education:
BS in Engineering (Preferred Majors: Electrical, Aerospace, Mechanical, Software, Physics or Systems) and 8 years of relevant experience.

This position requires the successful issuance, transfer or maintenance of any clearances and/or accesses necessary for the position. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Additional detail regarding security clearance factors can be obtained by accessing the DISCO website at: https://www.state.gov/security-clearances


170335
Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
165,Logistics Systems Engineer,-1,"Whole Life Engineering Directorate(WLED) is a systems engineering organization whose main objective is to influence hardware, software, and systems early in their life cycle to assure effective operation, reliability and economical ownership by the customer and end users.

As a Logistics Systems Engineer you will bean integral partof the WLED team interfacing directly with team members and stakeholders including customer program leaders.

As a Logistics Systems Engineer, youreresponsible for the development and maintenance ofdetailed supportability analysis and provisioning data for all hardware within a specific product line. In addition, youll work under consultative direction to apply advanced logistics principles to develop complex program level concepts and plans and youll implement the successful execution of these plans.

This position can be a Salary Grade G07 or a Salary Grade G08 based on the candidate's qualifications as they relate to the skills, experience and responsibility requirements for the position.

This position requires the eligibilityto obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only US citizens are eligible for security clearance.

Required Skills:
2+ years of engineering, logistics or manufacturing operations experience in a civilian or military environment
At a Grade G07, 0 years of experience in the aforementioned areas along with a relevant Master's Degree may be considered for this job.
At a Grade G08, 2+ years of experience in the aforementioned areas along with a relevant Master's Degree may be considered for this job.
US Citizenship is required.
Desired Skills:
Experience working with relational databases
Experience in the development and maintenance of Logistics Management Information (LMI)in accordance with MIL-STD-1388-2B, GEIA-STD-0007, or MIL-PRF-49506
Experience with any of the following areas of the Technical Data Package (drawings,parts lists, and electrical schematics) and experience generating/interpreting Parts List
Experience utilizing EAGLE, POWERLOG or SLICWave tools
Experience with Logistics Plans
Spares Analysis and Spares List Development
Earned Value Management System (EVMS) certification and application
Experience working in a project management environment
US Military - supply chain familiarity
Familiarity with 3D modeling tools such as Solidworks or CreoView
""Hands on"" experience with hardware repair and maintenance a plus
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Experience with Microsoft Office applications including Microsoft Access
Required Education:
BS in a STEM discipline or BA in Mathematics, Computer Science or Physics
This job is posted internally as: Systems Engineer II / Sr. Systems Engineer I

Here at Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by our employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

What We Offer: Whether youre just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, we offer a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits on offer include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

170137

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Andover, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
166,Principal Systems Engineer - Radar Simulation,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The Algorithm & Simulation (A&S) Directorate is responsible for algorithm development including radio-frequency (RF) and electro-optical/infrared (EO-IR) Signal Processing; Guidance, Navigation, and Control; and missile-and-sensor-level Modeling and Simulation for RMD's broad portfolio of projects, programs and products. The MSA teams within the A&S Directorate provide, develop, and maintain high fidelity performance simulations (including multiple sensor channels, scene generation capability, control hardware, physical environment, and embedded software), execute system performance analysis (including pre-flight prediction, post flight matching, and verification and validation), support new business initiatives and develop & execute technology roadmaps. Our portfolio includes surface Navy, undersea Navy, missile defense sensors, interceptors, command and control, integrated air and missile defense systems and space surveillance systems.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Job Description:
The candidate will develop and analyze radar algorithms in the context of a high fidelity digital simulation supplemented by field measurements. The systems engineer will work collaboratively to extend and validate the digital simulation, assess radar performance in complex multi-mission scenarios by reviewing detailed data from individual runs and across broad sets of runs, and investigate and resolve issues identified during analysis. The systems engineer will support updating and developing new requirements for implementing and verifying refined and new radar algorithms in tactical radar software. The engineer will develop and present briefings and reports on performance assessments, new and modified radar algorithms, scene modeling approaches, and issue investigations. The engineer will support integration of the high fidelity radar simulation into federations managed by other US Government organizations.

Required Skills:
8+ years of radar modeling and/or analysis experience
Experience using Matlab for data analysis
Experience with a compiled programming language
Ability to work both independently and in a team environment
Commitment to work on-site in a classified environment
Active DoD SECRET clearance, or interim SECRET clearance required prior to start date.
Desired Skills:
Understanding of radar signal processing, radar tracking, and electronic protection
Understanding of environmental clutter and RF propagation phenomenology and modeling
Experience with classification and machine learning techniques
Experience with Java programming
Basic understanding of Linux (from a users point of view)
MS or PhD in Engineering, Science or Mathematics
Required Education (including Major):
Minimum Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, or Mathematics area
Keywords:
Radar Systems, RF, radar, simulation, M&S, federated simulation, algorithm development, systems engineering, research and development, Java, Matlab, radar tracking, signal processing, electronic protection, classification, classifier, machine learning, clutter, propagation, mathematics, software, engineer, algorithm, DoD, V&V
170033

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
167,Principal Software Engineer (TS/SCI),$88k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in software engineering or a related technical field is required (or equivalent experience), plus a minimum of 10 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience; agile experience preferred.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS
Department of Defense Top Secret/SCI security clearance is required at time of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

General Dynamics Mission Systems has immediate openings for a Principal Software Engineer at one of our Northern Virginia customer sites. Please note this position is based out of our Fairfax, VA location. This position provides an opportunity to further advance the cutting-edge technology that supports some of our nation’s core defense/intelligence services and systems. General Dynamics Mission Systems employees work closely with esteemed customers to develop solutions that allow them to carry out high-stakes national security missions.

As a Principal Software Engineer, you will:

Provide leadership to cross functional software development teams
Lead small technical proposals and contributes to medium sized proposals
Frequently responsible to lead collaboration activities with senior management and leadership within the company
Perform software requirements analysis, participate in research, design, develop and test software and tools, to include development of new work products or enhancing existing applications
Perform technical planning, verification and validation of others work, cost and risk analysis, and supportability and effectiveness analyses for total systems
Apply the appropriate standards, processes, procedures, and tools throughout the system development life cycle to support the generation of technical engineering products
Research and analyze data, such as customer design proposals, market trends, state of technology and industry, specifications and manuals to determine feasibility of design or application
Support and develop our technical culture by being engaged, intellectually curious, friendly, motivated to solve complex problems, and inspired to deliver superior user-centered design
Participate in internal reviews of software components and systems

Programming Skills:

Strong fundamentals in data structures and algorithms
Solid object oriented programming and software design skills
Proficient in one of the following: Java, C++, C, or JavaScript (using object oriented techniques)
Web Services knowledge such as HTML, CSS, JavaScript, React, and Redux

Candidates should have demonstrated strengths and experience in the following areas:

Strong leadership skills suitable for recruiting, leading and managing teams of engineers to solve challenging problems
User Interface development
Computer science theory (e.g., data structures, algorithms, computational complexity)
Appreciation for user-centric design
Full use and understanding of software engineering concepts, principles, and theories
Effective communication and attention to detail
Deep exposure to Unix/Linux systems as well as Windows

Other beneficial common programming patterns/paradigms:

Seasoned, experienced professional having a wide range of professional experience
Experience with version control systems
Experience leading software teams using Agile methodologies
Detailed and fully proficient knowledge of technology trends and champions new ideas and product and process improvements
Concurrent programming and building multi-threaded systems
Memory and CPU profiling
Data modeling and writing efficient data access methods
Experience building large-scale mission-critical applications
Experience with distributed systems
Direct-manipulation user interfaces

PREFERRED DEGREE TYPES AND EXPERIENCE:

Bachelor's degree in software engineering or a related technical field is required (or equivalent experience), plus a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 6 years of relevant experience.

#CJ3

#CB

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Fairfax, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
168,Cyber Security Engineer / Information Security Engineer (ISSE),-1,"Do you find yourself dreaming of how to make ultra-secure systems? Do you enjoy defending against vulnerabilities and exploits? If so, we need you! Do you find yourself breaking nonsense rules? If so, we are looking for a talented cyber security engineer who has the technical chops to implement smart, security controls traditionally, this is know as an Information System Security Engineer (ISSE) but we are rethinking (with the government) how to manage and shepherd our system accreditation(s). You will work across our scrum teams to assess the security of our system and implement methods to constantly improve our cybersecurity baseline. You will work closely with our Security Controls Assessor (SCA) and Authorization Official (AO) to implement smart, cybersecurity policies and to ensure ongoing Risk Management Framework (RMF) compliance.

This job is not for you if you’re used to solely pushing RMF paperwork. Unlike most companies, we implement true DevOps & CI/CD to our development as well as our authorization and accreditation where practical security mitigations reign over compliance -we are even implementing automated methods for generating all the traditional security paperwork. We’re looking for someone who has deep technical experience to design, implement, and manage the cybersecurity lifecycle of our system(s).

Skyward is delivering the sexiest, most efficient software known to the government while also developing core backbone services critical to the Department of Defense (DoD) so if you thrive in an early startup environment or are simply looking for more autonomy and the ability to have a large impact, we would love to meet you!

What You’ll Do
Design and implement security-relevant policies and technical cybersecurity controls.
Attack/Defend our system(s) to fully assess implemented controls across our products.
Analyze source code and security scan reports for security vulnerabilities and develop/implement mitigations.
Deploy and maintain modern security incident and event management systems.
Develop alerting capabilities based on security intelligence, post incident findings, new threats and vulnerabilities.
Mitigate system vulnerabilities via execution of PoA&Ms.
Spearhead the Authorization and Accreditation (A&A) process from design-stage to establishment and maintenance of system Authority to Operate (ATO).
Pathfind initial Compliance as Code baselines for document automation and reporting.
Conduct system audits to ensure compliance with SSP.
Assess security impact of new features and software deployments.
Interface with the Security Controls Assessor (SCA) and Authorizing Official (AO) to present status of current security posture and improvement tasks.
What You’ll Need
Strong analytical skills and cross functional knowledge across multiple security disciplines.
Working knowledge of 800-53/JSIG controls and policies.
Healthy dose of pragmatism in balancing mandatory security compliance tasks with a bias toward implementation of modern security best practices.
Working experience with one or more cloud providers, such as Amazon Web Services or Microsoft Azure.
Experience patching and mitigating vulnerabilities.
Familiar with interpreting the log output of a wide selection of network and host device classes (HIDS, NIDS, Firewalls, Proxies, Routers, Switches, WAF's, Servers, Desktop Controls, Endpoint Protection, etc.).
Functional experience with text and data representation and manipulation (XML, HTML, Regular Expressions, JSON, REST, SQL).
Cybersecurity certification (minimum IAT Level II per DoD 8570.01-M)
Packet-level behavioral familiarity with most major TCP/IP application protocols (DNS, SMTP, HTTP, BGP, LDAP, IMAP, SSH, FTP, KRB5, DHCP, CIFS).
Strong working experience with a major scripting language (Python, Bash, Powershell).
Working knowledge or willingness to learn and work with OpenControl/OSCAL Languages.
Working experience managing and maintaining global SIEM deployments.
Experience with vulnerability analysis using cyber security tools (e.g., ACAS, Nessus, SCAP, SCC, STIG Viewer).
Creative thinker that leverages unconventional and innovative ideas to solve problems.
Comfortable operating in environments subject to regulatory, compliance, and risk-based security requirements.
Patience and tolerance for when things just go wrong.
Strong interpersonal, verbal presentation and written communication skills.
Strong drive, self-motivated, logical, and detail-oriented.
Passion for new technologies, software & processes.
Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment with multiple deadlines is essential.
Why You’ll Love Working Here!
Highly competitive compensation and benefits package including:
100% company-paid comprehensive healthcare,
Unlimited sick leave,
All federal holidays & 15 days personal leave, (+ election day)
Fully-vested 401k matching,
Regular virtual and in-person social events,
Flexible schedules, educational reimbursements, and much more.
Office hours are flexible with much of our work performed remotely (as we are a geographically dispersed team), but some actions will require periodic travel and access to secure facilities. This position does require a government TS//SCI security clearance (or a favorable SSBI within the last 5 years). Ideal candidates will be located in Boston, MA, Colorado Springs, CO, or Washington, DC.

Skyward Federal is a small (but growing) startup bringing the best of breed to the most exciting & unique missions possible. We work hard but play harder. There is constant room for growth and cross-training depending on what your life goals are. Apply now & start your journey today!

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $125,000.00 - $160,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Cybersecurity: 1 year (Required)
Information Security: 1 year (Required)
Security Clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
Fully Remote
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
skywardfederal.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Skyward Federal LLC,"Washington, DC",-1,Unknown,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
169,DevOps Engineer (Automation),-1,"MetroStar Systems is looking for a DevOps Engineer that is passionate about developing and executing DevOps best-practices, providing solution architectures, and strategy for DevOps adoption.

Our team is responsible for supporting Full-Stack Development and Operations for the Enterprise Data Dissemination Environment (EDDE) in order to Modernize and and Transform how our client connects with data users of all archetypes, needs, and backgrounds. Come be a game changer and join our team!

You’re a great fit if…
You are entrenched, socialized and subscribed to the DevOps culture and mindset with exposure to industry standard DevOps tools.
You are passionate about DevOps initiatives fully adopting automated solutions in place of manual processes.
You have the ability to obtain a Public Trust clearance
You’ll love this position if…
(This is the stuff you MUST have to be a fit)
You have a minimum of 2 years of experience with designing and developing DevOps solution architecture
You have a strong Linux background and 3+ years’ experience with Linux Administration and bash or shell scripting.
You have a minimum of 3 years in configuration management
You have experience designing branching strategies with Git and experience creating jobs and pipelines within Jenkins.
Working knowledge of industry standard DevOps tools, such as Jenkins and Git. (Chef, Nexus, AWS and/or Puppet is a plus)
You have a Bachelor’s Degree and the ability to obtain a Public Trust clearance
We’ll REALLY love you if…
(This is the bonus stuff that makes you stand out)
You have a developer background and insider understanding how DevOps integrates with developers.
You have experience in configuration management
You have experience with working closely with Release Management teams as well as Automation Testing teams
You have experience working in Agile environment with multiple teams operating in parallel to accomplish a large initiative deployments
Experience in leading and evolving CI/CD processes leveraging the DevOps frameworks working in an Agile environment
You have experience with test automation tools such as Mocha, Jasmine, Selenium, WebDriver, Protractor, Karma, JUnit, and JSUnit
What your day will look like:
You'll work with Scrum Masters, business analyst, developers, etc. to support their DevOps mission
You’ll also provide support to develop new and innovative automated solutions
You’ll provide support to develop automated scripts and solutions to achieve sprint tasks
The Admin Stuff:

Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for potential access to classified information and obtain a Public Trust clearance. Accordingly, US Citizenship is required. We are unable to provide sponsorship now or in the future for this role.

The Legal Stuff:

MetroStar Systems is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees, and are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. Furthermore, they do not establish a contract for employment and are subject to change at the discretion of MetroStar Systems.",3.7,"MetroStar Systems
3.7","Suitland, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
170,Senior Systems Engineer - Project Services,$60k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"About NECI

NECI, an Emerson Impact Partner, is the leading Digital Automation solutions provider transforming manufacturing, lab operations, process development and process control across a range of process industries in New England. NECI relentlessly seeks to drive the outcomes that change the game for our clients and is seeking team members to join in our mission.

The Life Sciences Engineering team provides large project engineering, site engineering and integration engineering services using the DeltaV Automation System. Engineers leverage their expertise and knowledge of process control systems and automation across multiple process industries.

The Role

We are currently looking for a Senior Systems Engineer who will develop high quality, well-tested and well-documented application software and hardware designs.

How Youll Be Successful
Provide leadership in the development and implementation/adherence of NECI and Engineering policies, procedures and standards
Ability to read and understand P&ID and SAMA/ISA logic diagrams
Ability to understand and program PLCs
Ability to develop, adopt and maintain a budget for a Control System project
Ability to provide leadership to team members
Ability to develop and train engineers and technicians
What Youll Do
Based on the project you may be responsible for electrical panel design layouts, electrical loop drawings, bus segment drawings, on-site client work and provide management and oversight of panel fabrication and field installations or for developing Functional Requirements Specifications (FRS), Detailed Design Specifications (DDS), and Test Scripts following software implementation of software designs.
Work to improve engineering efficiency of the team through training and utilization of engineers and technicians
Develop and adhere to budgets for projects. Provide tracking information to project management for backlog reports (example: % complete on tasks)
Work to improve long-term growth through business development, maintaining and improving profitability, and improvements in engineering efficiency
Coordinate with assigned project team members to ensure that activities are completed in a timely manner
What Youll Bring
BS Degree in Chemical, Electrical, or Mechanical Engineering
5-7 years experience in electrical panel design and installation
Process automation control systems engineering experience with Distributed Control Systems (DCS)
Knowledge on data collection
Process control knowledge in our focus industries (life sciences - pharmaceutical/biotech, food and beverage, pulp and paper, and power)
Experience with Bus technologies
Specific knowledge of cGMP, batch process control in life science industry with validation experience
Heres What Youll Get
Highly competitive Medical and Dental Insurance
Flexible Spending Accounts for medical expenses and dependent care expenses
3 Weeks of Vacation + Holiday's
401(k)
Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP)
Employee Referral Bonus
Professional Development Reimbursement
NECI paid Basic Life & Short-Term, Long-Term Disability Insurance
Voluntary Benefits - Accident, Term Life, Whole Life Insurance
Flu Shot Clinic & First Aid/AED/CPR Classes
Must be currently authorized to work in the United States.

Policy on Third-Party Unsolicited Resume Submissions: Please note that any third-party unsolicited resume submissions will immediately become the property of NECI. NECI will not pay any fee to a submitting employment agency, person, or entity unless a signed agreement is established.

Please Note: NECI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.2,"NECI
4.2","Portsmouth, NH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
171,Sr. Business Intelligence Engineer,$96k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Start a Rewarding Career with Alliant


What will your day look like?

You will be responsible for collaborating with business teams and data owners to successfully implement and maintain enterprise level business analytics and data warehousing solutions. The ideal candidate must be able to support our business partners with their reporting needs, via dashboards, Business Object reports, mobile reporting, and self-service analytics requirements. Work involves moderate to complex difficulty in working on multiple high-level projects concurrently. Candidate must have a medium to expert level at designing, implementing, and operating our Business Intelligence toolkit. Additional requirements include experience in the financial industry and understanding requirements management process, and report testing and validation process.

Responsibilities


Do you see yourself doing this?
Participates in collaborating with end user to transform business requirements into BI and Reporting requirements
Strong working knowledge across the technology stack using SAP Business Intelligence tool (Version 4.1 and above) such as WebI, Designer, Data Explorer, Dashboards, Lumira and Crystal reports
Experience in data analysis and design using SAP tools such as Lumira, Data Explorer, Crystal Reports for Self-service reporting
Exposure to ETL tools such as Informatica and DB environment on MS SQL 2012/14 will be a great plus
At least 8-10 year of experience in design, develop and testing of BI Reports in Data warehouse environment is must
Experience in working with Global development teams in Agile development is required
Ability to communicate complex IT requirements with all levels of audiences (Marketing, Ops, Finance, Developers, QA and Senior Management)
Experience in SDLC process such as change management, Bug and issue Tracking, Report Test Management to resolve application issues or to implement development enhancements would be a plus
Prior experience in Estimating – Reporting requirements and Leading Data analysis efforts across reporting requirements would be a big plus
Strong working knowledge across the technology stack including ETL, data analysis, metadata, data quality, audit and design
Technologies currently used and supported are: SQL Server Database, Business Objects, Crystal, Informatica PowerCenter, and Informatica Metadata Manager
Design and develop or modify ETL processes that load data for the data warehouse users or for web applications using ETL tools
Provide assistance with ETL design, development, and performance tuning
Design and architect ETL solutions as part of a cross-functional team
Will be responsible to Coordinate and lead onsite and offshore delivery/Support team of 3-5 FTE on report development and BI Support
Will be responsible to support Enterprise BI and Self-service initiatives
Responsible for identifying/enhancing/implementing industry best practices in BI and Analytics space
Responsible to ensure Application Service levels across all BI application
Qualifications


What makes you a great fit?

You’ll be a great fit if in addition to the Completion of a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or a related field, minimum of 5 years of BI analytics experience in a Data Warehouse environment, and you have:
Experience with administration and development in SAP Business Objects and Crystal Reports
Experience with administration and development in Tableau
Experience in working in Agile development teams (via Scrum methodology)
Experience in SDLC process such as change management, Bug and issue Tracking, Report Test Management to resolve data issues or to implement development enhancements
Project Management experience with Scheduling, Resource Loading, Planning and reporting on large project/program & Technical knowledge in software development methodologies, design and implementation required
Prior experience working in Financial Service industry a plus
Technical Skills:
Platforms: MS Windows
Database Management Systems: Microsoft SQL Server 2012/2014/2016
Data integration: Informatica PowerCenter ETL, Informatica Data Transformation Tool, and HortonWorks
BI Reporting: SAP Business Objects & Tableau
Job Scheduling: SMA Solutions OpCon
File Movement: GO Anywhere Managed File Transfer
Experience working with SharePoint
Azure/AWS Cloud experience a plus
Agile Development – Scrum Training
MS-Office/Visio
Experience working with SharePoint Data & OLAP environment
SQL, Strong SQL/T-SQL, MS PowerShell scripting
Preferred Technical Skills:
Languages: SQL, Strong SQL/T-SQL, MS shell scripting,
Good understanding of SharePoint 2012 environment
SAP BI 4.0 reporting tools, ER win R9.0
Additional Skills:
Ability and willingness to develop creative solutions to business problems and work well within a team environment
Must be able to multi-task and balance multiple projects in a fast-paced environment
Must have good communication and collaboration skills
Solid diagnostic, testing, and problem-solving skills. Good organizational and time management skills
Ability to adapt to a fast-paced and changing environment
Must be enthusiastic, team-oriented and positive attitude
When you’re happy, we’re happy!

As a thank you for joining our team, you’ll benefit from:
Competitive medical, dental, and free vision benefits
Competitive compensation plan
Contributions towards gym memberships
Generous PTO and banking holidays off
Still not convinced?

We’re on the list of 100 Best Medium Companies to work for, check it out here. For more details you can also visit our Glassdoor and LinkedIn profiles.",3.6,"Alliant Credit Union
3.6","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1935,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
172,Space SE - Principal Systems Engineer,-1,"Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership genes? Raytheon Intelligence and Space is the right place for you. We are the leading group for the creation of advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security, and civil space. You might have seen on the web many beautiful images of the Earth, down to exquisite detail, and you might have been amazed by the discoveries coming back from deep space missions. Behind many of those amazing results are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Technologies. We are looking for the next generation of leaders who will shape the future of space exploration, human spaceflight, and national defense. Our team is developing the next generation of space systems architecture, space vehicle systems, and space mission payloads. We would like to hear from you if you have the initiative and qualifications. We are looking for you.

We are looking for an experienced and talented Space Systems Engineer who can support space missions design, EO/IR sensor development, program execution, and work product development as well as AI&T activity. This role requires experience in modelling and simulation analysis techniques pertaining to satellite systems and/or EO/IR sensors, the ability to manage and evaluate technical solutions for the development of complex space systems-of-systems (SoS) and/or EO/IR systems for high reliability applications, and hands-on skills for design, build, integration, and test of such systems.

You will support the research, design, development, analysis, and testing of diverse space-centric systems in support of one or more mission areas. You will be immersed in a very vibrant environment, where you will have constant opportunities to demonstrate your talent and skills, and you will help increase our competitive advantage and innovation breakthroughs. You will also have immediate opportunities to grow into roles with greater scope and responsibility. Your passion and creativity will be valued and will be an integral part of our ongoing success. We need your innovative spirit and your technical strength. Join our team of competitive professionals and world experts, and let your talent shine as you invent the future with us.

Required Skills:

• 8+ years of experience in systems engineering
• 4+ years of experience in space systems
• Experience with spacecraft on-orbit operations and data analysis
• Experience with space sensor testing and analysis
• Experience in numerical modeling and simulation, and performing analysis using MATLAB, C++, Python
• Demonstrated problem solving, organization, coordination, and planning skills
• Experience in working with multi-disciplined teams
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including presentation skills and negotiation skills
• Familiarity with system development phases including requirements, architecture, design, build, test, and deploy
• Ability to work independently, determine and develop approaches to solutions
• Ability to access to US only data systems
• U.S. Citizenship status is required and the ability to obtain US security clearance post-start

Desired Skills:
• Experience with modeling and simulation of EO/IR systems
• Experience in space product design and lifecycle
• Familiarity with designing and testing optical subsystems related to space EO/IR payload systems
• Experience developing proposals for Government, commercial, and international customers
• Experience developing operational concepts
• Familiarity with spacecraft bus architecture
• Ability to decompose top level requirements down to subsystems
• DOORS and other requirements management applications
• Technical design experience in opto-mechanical engineering
• Experience in leading testing activities such as environmental, thermal, vibration, and EMI testing
• Ability to establish and maintain strong working relationships with all levels of the organization
• Familiarity with cost and schedule management using a government approved Earned Value Management System
• Knowledge of EO/IR instruments power and thermal subsystems
• Knowledge of US Export/Import law in regards to space technologies

Required Education:
BS in Engineering, Sciences, or Mathematics or related STEM discipline

Desired Education:
MS/PhD in Engineering, Sciences, or Mathematics or related STEM discipline

169758

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Dulles, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
173,Pilot Plant Engineer III,$79k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

OBJECTIVE:

The individual will be a member within a group responsible for performing large scale cell culture and purification operations/development, including expansion and production bioreactor operation, capture, and purification of non-GMP batches to support development timelines. They will collaborate within the upstream and downstream pilot teams and with the process development team. This individual is responsible for independently executing basic/routine and complex experiments and unit operations. Additionally, this position participates in planning unit operations/experiments under supervision and drafting support documentation (SOPs, batch records, and/or reports). They will apply knowledge from various technical areas, industry practices and standards under close supervision and provide quality and productive output that is consistently timely, reliable and reproducible. The candidate must be customer focused, results oriented, science driven, and have high attention to detail.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Works with departmental and/or cross functional peers to execute on assignments, under limited supervision.
Documents data accurately in laboratory notebooks and batch records completely as per established company guidelines/SOPs. Writes documents such as reports, protocols and internal presentations that may require substantial edits. Assists senior personnel with publications, external abstracts and presentations, as needed.
Organizes and presents issues and results at departmental and project meetings.
Contributes significantly to project work which may include multiple projects within functional area.
Interprets data independently, and contributes to technical reports
Identifies complex technical issues, and implements solutions under supervision
Contributes to the design of new applications/experiments/unit operations in consultation with supervisor.
Supports technology transfer through writing and consolidating technical documents.
Coordinates within department as well as cross functionally with peers on projects

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:

Education and Experience:

Required:

Associates degree in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, engineering or related pharmaceutical science and 4+ years relevant industry experience
Bachelors degree in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, engineering or related pharmaceutical science; 2+ years relevant industry experience
Masters degree in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, engineering or related pharmaceutical science; 0+ years relevant industry experience
Previous experience working in lab setting or Masters degree plus appropriate laboratory training

Knowledge and Skills:

Analytical and Problem-Solving Skills -Able to troubleshoot critical issues or problems and resolve routine issues using appropriate information. Stands accountable and consistently follows through on work assignments and personal objectives to deliver high quality results despite obstacles.
Teamwork - Ability to work within department groups/team.
Communication Skills - Expresses one’s self clearly and concisely within function; documents issues and/or concerns concisely with colleagues; timely and effectively communicates issues to supervisor
Organization – Exercises good time management skills. Effectively manages multiple priorities and outcomes of critical tasks.
Technical - Proficient in use of applicable lab equipment and operations

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:

Ability to wear personal protective equipment such as safety glasses/goggles, gloves and safety shoes.
Ability to lift, pull or push equipment requiring up to 25-50 lbs of force.
Ability to stand for 6 hours in a suite.
Ability to climb ladders and work platforms.
Stooping or bending to check or trouble-shoot equipment operations.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

The candidate may be asked to travel occasionally (domestically and internationally) for conferences, seminars, and project specific needs (approximately 5% travel).

LINE FUNCTION SPECIFIC QUALIFICATIONS

Biologics – Pilot Plant:

Experience with either cell culture or purification is required as this role will support both upstream and downstream operations. Experience with cell culture and aseptic techniques; Experience with laboratory equipment that supports cell culture, such as bioreactors, metabolite analyzers, shake flasks, cell culture plates; Experience with using automation preferred; Good understanding of chromatographic and other protein separation principles; Familiarity with use of bioseparation equipment and standard analytical assays.
May be required to adjust work schedule to meet operational demands.
Work includes a combination of cell culture (seed train/expansion/production bioreactor), harvest operations (filtrations or centrifugation), buffer planning and ordering, scheduling, large-scale column packing, sample forecasting and submission, metabolite or sample measurement, assisting with assembly and disassembly of process equipment, authoring batch records/SOPs or proposing document revisions, and execution of these records in a non-GMP environment. The individual may contribute to the evaluation of novel, generic platform technologies that can be applied across multiple programs.

Locations

Lexington, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Lexington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
174,Active Sensing Software Engineer,$43k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Team

The Active Sensing and Information Fusion team is responsible for developing perception algorithms to detect and identify objects for Torc's autonomous driving systems, allowing the system to understand and react to the environment around the vehicle in real-time. Our algorithms utilize 3D point cloud data from LiDAR and objects detected in radar returns. The team also implements the sensor fusion algorithms that combine this data and provide probabilistic state estimation.

We work closely with other engineering teams in behavior and motion planning to create innovative solutions for our Level 4 autonomous system.

About the Role:

We are looking for a Software Engineer with an understanding of autonomous vehicles and expertise in computer vision, LiDAR data, or object tracking.

As Software Engineer on our Active Sensing/Perception team, you will develop and test software components and algorithms for autonomous systems. You'll also be involved in creating systems that detect, classify, segment and predict obstacles in the vehicle's surrounding environment.

What you'll be doing:
Develop and test C++ ROS software along the TORC perception pipeline, including object detection, classification, and tracking.
Required Competencies
Bachelor's or Master's Degree in Computer Engineering, Robotics, or related technical field
0-2 years of relevant industry experience
Experience programming in C++ and ROS (Robot Operating System) and with efficient, clean code
Experience in robotics and/or self-driving technologies
What we want to see:

Experience working with:
Computer Vision
Lidar Processing
ROS (Robot Operating System)
C++ Libraries
PCL
OpenCV
Boost
Excellent software design and problem-solving skills
Python Experience
Multithreaded software development
Structured software development, automated testing, and deployment process
Perks of being a Torc'r

Torc cares about our team members and we strive to provide benefits and resources to support their health, work/life balance, and their future. Additionally, we are always open to suggestions to accommodate individual employee needs. Torc offers:
Full coverage of monthly medical premiums for full-time employees
Medical/dental/vision/ AD+D and Life Insurance
401K plan with employer matching
Annual learning and development stipend
Leadership development training
Collaborative, energetic, and team-focused work environment
Flexibility in schedule and generous paid vacation",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
175,Senior Systems IV&V Engineer II,-1,"Systems Integration, Verification and Validation (IV&V) Engineer

The Systems Engineering Center (SEC) Department within the Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) Business Segment is involved in a wide variety of Systems IV&V activities for the Protected Communication Systems group. The SECIV&V activities include all aspects of system integration and test in both laboratory and challenging environmental conditions including, but not limited to, temperature, vibration, salt/fog, lightning, humidity and reliability growth testing.

The SEC IV&V organization also supports system architecture development, CONOPS development, system trade studies, requirements analysis and flow down to hardware/software configuration items; all of which lead to the final system integration, verification and validation. The department sections support a variety of communication system programs including Satellite Communication (SATCOM), line-of-sight (LOS) / beyond line-of-sight (BLOS) and networking for ground based, ship, submarine, and airborne platforms.

JOB SUMMARY

We are currently seeking experienced Senior Systems IV&V Engineers to join our dynamic, diverse, and rapidly growing team. Ideal candidates would have technical experience with System Level IV&V of AEHF, EHF, X-Band, Ka-Band, Ku-Band, C-Band, LOS/BLOS, and networking for ground based, ship, submarine, and/or airborne platforms.

Required Skills
Minimum of six (6) years of systems integration and verification experience; 4 yrs with a Master's degree; 2 yrs with a PhD
Background and competency in requirements development, analysis, verification and validation
Demonstrated experience with communication architectures
Ability to work within a structured Systems Engineering process environment including a task-oriented, value-based management system
Ability to interact effectively with multidisciplinary teams of program management and system design professionals including electrical, mechanical, software and logistics engineers
U.S. Citizenship status is required as well as DoD Secret U.S. Security Clearance day one of employment; position will require the ability to access US only data systems
Desired Skills
Technical experience with System Level Integration, Verification and Validation on SATCOM (AEHF, EHF, X-Band, Ka-Band, Ku-Band, C-Band), LOS/BLOS, and networking for ground based, ship, submarine, and airborne platforms
Experience with Earned Value Management System (EVMS), Microsoft Project, engineering tools (e.g., DOORS) and peer review products
Direct experience with and/or working knowledge of environmental test requirements pertaining to Military Standards including; MIL-STD-810, MIL-STD-67, MIL-STD-1399, MIL-STD-1540, MIL- STD-461
Direct experience with and/or working knowledge of Environmental Tests including requirements analysis, procedure development, test conduct and evaluation of results.
Experience in some or all of the following are highly desirable: EMI/EMC, shock, vibration, altitude, temperature, sand/dust, humidity, explosive atmosphere, crash safety, and reliability growth testing.
Satellite Communication systems definition, design, and development experience and/or experience with defining and evolving communication architectures
Proposal support experience including writing Basis of Estimates (BOEs)
Direct experience with and/or working knowledge of field support activities
Agile/Scrum program experience
Excellent communication skills (written, verbal, and presentation) and be able to communicate effectively.
Required Education
Bachelor of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) from an accredited educational institution (i.e. Engineering, Physics, Mathematics)
Desired Education
Master of Science degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM) from an accredited educational institution (i.e. Engineering, Physics, Mathematics)
This position requires a U.S. person or the ability to obtain an Export Authorization from the appropriate government agency for non-U.S. persons

164200

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
176,Sr Mechanical Engineer - Antenna Systems,-1,"The Raytheon Missile and Defense's (RMD) Mechanical Product Team (MPT) leads in mechanical hardware design, development and production of radar, sonar, torpedo and combat system equipment. The Mechanical Product Team uses state-of the-art tools, processes, technology, and Six Sigma principles. MPTs capabilities encompass a broad range of technical disciplines which include engineering, manufacturing, technical services, materials, processes, analysis, test and documentation.

Are you a mechanical engineer whos ready to take on a challenging role to help defend our nation? Are you ready for the challenge of designing developing, and building future radar systems?

The Antenna Systems Department designs some of the most innovative land-based and shipboard radars in the world.
The Antenna Systems Department is seeking motivated and driven Senior Mechanical Engineers with experience in hardware design and analysis. The position will primarily support design, development, and production focused around phased array antennas and supporting structures, power, and cooling sub-systems.

Responsibilities can include, but are not limited to:

•Mechanical design, analysis and documentation of hardware and systems
•Representing the Mechanical Engineering organization as a technical contact on projects
•Executing as part of, or leading/managing, a small team during product development, drawing generation, drawing release, and drawing change incorporation
•Solving complex technical problems that require the regular use of ingenuity and creativity
•Providing factory and supplier support domestically and internationally
•Holding and participating in design reviews and resolving action items
•Interacting with senior external personnel on significant technical matters requiring coordination within and between organizations
•Key expectations for this position include technical problem solving, along with technical leadership in the development of new hardware. Senior engineers will be required to make sound technical decisions, provide supervision and leadership to junior engineers and manage to cost and schedule requirements of assigned tasks.
•This position will require interfacing with other mechanical engineers, designers, and structural / thermal analysts, as well as engineers from other disciplines, along with line and program management and Customers.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will need a U.S. Security Clearance within 1 year of start date. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

Required Skills:

•6+ years mechanical engineering design experience
•Experience with electronic packaging, including antenna or pedestal design
•Experience using CAD software, preferably CREO (PRO/ENGINEER)

Desired Skills:

•Ability to creatively apply mechanical engineering knowledge to efficiently and creatively solve complex design problems, and make sound and rational data driven technical decisions
•Experience with radar systems
•Working knowledge of military and commercial design, materials, and process specifications
•Efficient and disciplined process execution behaviors coupled with agility of thought and knowledge of how to appropriately tailor processes to fit the task
•Strong presentation and technical writing skills
•Experience with technical and cost proposal development
•Experience leading other junior engineers within an integrated product team environment
•Experience successfully managing to cost and schedule requirements for assigned tasks
•Ability to multi-task and successfully manage multiple activities at any given time
•Ability to interact well with other team members across various disciplines, including other engineering disciplines, manufacturing, supply chain, and program management
•Ability to identify and communicate technical issues that may impact cost, schedule, or other aspects of product design
•Strong analytical design and drawing skills including geometric tolerance and dimensioning and associated tolerance analysis
•Demonstrated hands-on mechanical aptitude with the ability to work across disciplines
•Work performed without appreciable direction and exercises considerable latitude in determining technical objectives of assignment
•Experience in technical risk management
•Understanding of the product development lifecycle models and program lifecycle modes
•Qualified Six Sigma Specialist or equivalent
•Master's degree preferred
•Experience with Microsoft Office applications including MS Word, Excel and Power Point
•Experience in Electro-mechanical packaging of multi-function multi-technology electronic assemblies

Required Education

•B.S. /B.A. in Aerospace Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, Math, or related science degree.

163867

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
177,Senior Software Engineer - React,$59k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311105

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Software Engineering and Architectures
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Then join us in the Software Engineering and Architectures Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to providing cutting edge, state-of-the-art solutions in support of our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Software Engineering at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by developing data processing/storage systems utilizing cloud, parallel and distributed architectures. We provide high-performance extract-transform-load processing and big data services capabilities supporting high velocity streaming systems, large data sets, applied real-time analytics and artificial intelligence

The ideal candidate will also possess qualities such as,

+ An interest, curiosity and technical depth to support the development and advancement of a variety of applied problems specific to the national security community

+ The ability and the desire to learn new technologies as this is a rapidly evolving field

+ Technical knowledge in configuring and deploying applications in multiple environments cloud, container services, clusters

+ Must possess excellent verbal and written communication skills

The Senior Software Engineer React should have working knowledge in several of the following related-skillsets:

+ 5+ years of experience as a professional software developer

+ Strong expertise in React/Redux

+ Strong understanding of state management

+ Strong experience providing mentorship and guidance, including code reviews, training, and feedback

+ Strong communication skills

+ Strong experience writing unit and integration tests

+ Proficiency with GraphQL a plus

+ Proficiency designing Restful APIs a plus

+ Proficiency with ElasticSearch a plus

+ Experience with containerization and/or Kubernetes a plus

+ Knowledge of software engineering best practices and software project lifecycles

+ Conduct code reviews on components and applications to ensure adherence to the development standards and best practices.

+ Experience with big data platforms a plus

+ Experience with cloud platforms a plus

EXPECTED OF YOU:

+ Apply knowledge of software engineering practices (e.g. source control, problem tracking, design principles, etc.) with minimal oversight

+ Take initiative to set personal direction and goals

+ Stay current about industry developments

+ Work collaboratively within a team to execute on the full system development life cycle

+ Maintain or follow quality assurance procedures

+ Demonstrate good time management skills

+ Be able to work with different technologies

WHY WE SHOULD TALK:

+ You want to work in a lively environment full of scientists, engineers, and subject matter experts who love learning and thinking creatively

+ You want to have impact on people's lives and national security problems

+ You want to work in an environment where diversity and equality are highly valued

+ You want to build novel solutions to complex problems

+ You are independent in your every-day work, and self-directed in your career goal
*_The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:_**
+ **Level III** : Manages small to moderate projects and/or major project tasks. Integrates intellectual and technical capabilities of work teams. Enhances technical/professional skills of junior staff through active mentoring and training. Generates ideas for new proposals and participates in business development activities

+ **Level IV** : Selects and develops technical approaches to complex challenges. Principal investigator/Lead or coPI on multiple or significantly complex, and/or high risk projects or tasks and/or involving multiple tasks, capabilities, and organizations. Takes lead in scope, schedule, and budget for projects or large tasks Demonstrates ability to acquire funding for self and task level teams. Leading organizational teams that proactively identify and promote new capabilities within a division and S&E domain, and advance the directorate strategy. Sought after within PNNL for technical leadership to set technical direction.
*Minimum Qualifications**
Bachelor's degree in computer science or closely related field with strong software design and development skills with 5 years' experience, or a masters degree with 3 years' experience, or a Ph.D. with 1 years experience is required
*Preferred Qualifications**
Bachelor's degree in computer science or closely related field with strong software design and development skills with 7 years' experience, or a masters degree with 5 years' experience, or a Ph.D. with 3 year experience.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Computation and Information Sciences_

_Group:_ _Software Eng & Architectures_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-20_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-18_",4.0,"PNNL
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
178,Expert Level Network Systems Engineer,-1,"Raytheon Technologies is looking for Expert Level Network Systems Engineers with an active TS/SCI clearance and current polygraph.

Work involves oversight and technical direction of system-wide issues requiring advanced levels of understanding of network theory and the specific enterprise network architecture; establishing overall strategic network standards and priorities; providing the highest level of technical guidance and direction in the design and implementation of networking solutions; analyzing the optimization of network system performance; overseeing the strategic interface of network systems configuration; using and incorporating broad technical knowledge of the diverse business areas within the enterprise in the assessment of network engineering technologies, computing systems hardware and software protocols. Additionally, these positions provide high-level technical advice and guidance to managers and technical resources on which network technologies can be utilized to meet current and future organizational needs.

Duties, Tasks, and Responsibilities:

• Work as part of a fast-paced, collaborative, multidiscipline team in support of U.S. Government and provide technical subject matter expertise in the field of network engineering and communications.
• Provides support in the translation of business requirements into telecommunications (eg. LAN, MAN, WAN, Voice and Video) requirements, designs and orders. Understands how the overarching INFOSEC and COMSEC security requirements add to the complexity of these designs.
• Provide expert knowledge of network infrastructure, including routing, switching, gateways, VPNs, and MPLS networks including Type 1 cryptographic equipment.
• Performs a full range of complex network designs encompassing multiple technologies and technology layers (LAN, WAN, OS, IOS, etc.) within a single, enterprise network. Evaluates new network technologies (SDN, SD-WAN, etc.) and makes recommendations to project managers regarding the integration of these technologies into the existing network infrastructure. Plans new designs and configurations for integration into the enterprise network, using knowledge of the performance characteristics and network interconnect points to ensure effective integration and optimal network performance.
• Provides engineering and design support for the creation and deployment of tactical communication systems. Research existing technologies and apply COTS/GOTS systems to develop network infrastructure for voice and data systems, using best practice security methodologies. Integrate system design with network architecture to best meet customer requirements. Test and deploy system designs in tactical CONUS/OCONUS locations.
• Perform post design support to include installation, configuration, and tier IV, O&M support for both enterprise and field deployed systems including local area network (LAN), wide area network (WAN), and system level aspects. Creates simulated networks to test applications over low bandwidth links, troubleshoots network connectivity issues, and install/configure wide area link utilizing radio frequency (RF) communications (i.e. over satellite, cell, and microwave). Configure/test/maintain network infrastructure that connects to enterprise architecture.

Required Minimum Experience:
• Top Secret SCI clearance with full-scope polygraph.
• A minimum of ten (10) years of experience in relevant environment.
• Bachelors degree or higher in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related field.

General professional years of experience may be substituted for specialized years of experience at a ratio of three (3) years of general experience within an occupation for one (1) year of specialized experience. Relevant certifications will be considered equivalent to three (3) months of specialized experience. A degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Business, or a scientific or technical discipline related to the specific skill.

• An Associates degree will be considered equivalent to eighteen (18) months specialized experience.

• A Bachelors degree will be considered equivalent to three (3) years specialized experience (total equivalency is not cumulative when combined with an Associates degree).

• A Masters degree will be considered equivalent to two (2) years specialized experience (up to a total of five (5) years when combined with a Bachelors).

• A PhD will be considered equivalent to two (2) years specialized experience (up to a total of seven (7) years when combined with a Masters and a Bachelors).

***This position is contingent on contract award and also requires a U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.***
153952

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Herndon, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
179,Sr. Algorithm Development Scientist / Engineer,$12k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented, self-motivated Aerospace or Electrical Engineer, or Scientist for simulation and post processing algorithm development to join a multi-discipline engineering team in support of the development of Avionics products design, development, analysis, and test. The end products are avionics systems that provide time, space, position, guidance, navigation, control and automated flight termination capability. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost-effective engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

The candidate will design and develop in-flight, post processing and estimation algorithms for complex flight vehicle configurations and flight envelopes including high-dynamic scenarios. The position requires a fundamental of modeling and estimation techniques, coupled with a solid base of programming experience. Candidate must have an interest in modeling and simulation, analysis, and problem-solving. These skills will be used in the creation of detailed algorithms, estimation techniques and test scenarios to support complete end-to-end test and evaluation of: strategic/tactical missile systems, glide munitions, and manned/unmanned vehicles.

The successful applicant will work closely with a highly technical team of multi-disciplinary engineers to provide accurate and timely analysis of flight vehicle systems' performance and capabilities, and to verify/validate system models.

The work will evolve into hardware in the loop simulation, and flight test support. Work may cover both new and existing air vehicles. The work will engage in module level testing, system level testing, debugging, and documentation, in addition to authoring code. As part of a team the work will use configuration management tools and other development tools and methods to ensure a quality product.

This position may require travel for meetings and test events.

Basic Qualifications


Position requires a Bachelor's degree from an ABET accredited school in Engineering, Math or Science with 5+ years of applicable experience or a Master's Degree in Engineering, Math or Science with 3+ years of applicable experience or a PhD in Engineering, Math or Physics with applicable course and research work.
Candidate must have familiarity with linear and nonlinear attitude estimation methods, e.g., extended Kalman filters, batch smoother based on quadratic and cubic programs, sigma-point ﬁlters, particle ﬁlters
Candidate must possess knowledge of state estimation techniques and their application to aerospace physical systems
Candidate must possess knowledge or have a willingness to learn and apply algorithms for trajectory estimation and reconstruction
Candidate must have familiarity with Global Navigation Satellite System fundamentals and application
Candidate must have experience with Matlab, Simulink and basic programming concepts
Candidate must have interest in and basic familiarity with the analysis of physical systems, to include simulation development and maintenance, and hardware-in-the-loop development, application and validation
Excellent communication and inter-personal skills are required, as the successful candidate must function effectively in a team environment and interact with program stakeholders.

Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama area.

Other Qualifications


Experience with the following is beneficial:
Command-and-control modeling
C/C++
Ground and flight test support
Hands-on experience with aviation platforms
Experience with design and implementation of embedded software or firmware
Experience with Guidance, Navigation, and Control (GNC) for missiles and/or launch vehicles
Knowledge of GPS receiver operation, integration and test
Experience with GPS simulators
Experience with GPS antennas including Anti-Jam antennas
Organizational skills to document designs, assist with Technical Data Packages (TDP) and support production and test production Avionics systems
Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.05.03-79

Closing Date:
11/11/2020

#CJ

#LI",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
180,Principal Systems Engineer Synthetic Aperture Radar,-1,"Youre a collaborative and highly skilled Principal Systems Engineer Synthetic Aperture Radar, who is accomplished, experienced and ready to meet new challenges. Protecting our nation while advancing the future defense of our world through technical ingenuity excites you.

Rated the best at what we do, Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RIS) builds world class satellite ground systems and counters national security threats through cyber solutions. We are a state-of-the-art technology company because of our innovative thinkers.

Our employees matter. Your contribution is vital to everything we build. As you drive the next phase of your career you will find solutions to complex challenges and have the opportunity to mentor team members by sharing your insight and experience. The RIS culture fosters collaboration and respect while doing meaningful work.

Join us! Together, we will support critical missions, develop solutions and define the future in aerospace and defense.

Raytheon Technologies is seeking a Principle Systems Engineer with experience in the area of Synthetic Aperture Radar (SAR) imaging, with an emphasis on how to configure a payload/sensor to perform SAR imaging and/or moving target indication (MTI) collection. You are expected to participate in the entire life cycle of related projects, including concept definition, algorithm development, design reviews, integration and test, and operational support. In this role you will ultimately be a recognized as the expert by our customers and be frequently called upon to help solve emerging technical problems. The ideal candidate will have the subject matter expertise to perform detailed SAR payload and ground implementation engineering, and communication and interpersonal skills to represent and explain this design to our customers and co-contractors. Individuals lacking current detailed subject matter expertise but with appropriate technical background and a demonstrated ability to learn new, complex subjects quickly will also be considered for this position.

Required Skills:
8+ years demonstrated engineering experience with proven track record
Experience leading engineering teams
Understanding of the SE lifecycle and change management process
Experience with requirements analysis/management
Experience in functional decomposition, interface analysis and definition
Proven ability to meet timelines
Experience in systems engineering functions including: operations concept development, requirements management, technical risk management, interface definition and control
Knowledge of component level integration and test
Demonstrated ability to effectively work with and communicate with all levels of management and individual contributors on the program team
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including presentation skills
Experience with Microsoft Office suite of tools
Existing TS SCI clearance
Desired Skills:
Advanced degree in Electrical Engineering or Physics with a radar emphasis or 5+ years in a RADAR system design role preferred
Experience in an Agile or DevOps development environment
Experience with satellite data processing and operations domain preferred
Education Requirements:
Bachelors Degree in Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM), or related STEM degree program from an Accredited University/School/College with 8+ years of relevant work experience

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

RISENGBONUS
165865

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Aurora, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
181,Data Engineer,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 200 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.
If you have proven experience in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you:
Git / SVN / TFS / VSTS
Jenkins / Travis / Bamboo / Go
Vagrant / Packer / Terraform
GitHub / Bamboo / GitLabs
Chef / Puppet / Ansible / SaltStack
Docker / Docker Swarm
Kubernetes / OpenShift
Power-Shell / Bash
AWS / Azure / GCP / OpenStack
Cloud Formation / Code Deploy
Spring Boot / Tomcat / WebLogic / JBoss
ELK Stack / Splunk
AMQP / RabbitMQ / Active MQ
New Relic / Dynatrace / AppDynamics / Sensu
JIRA / Rally / VersionOne
VMware / VirtualBox
F5 / Citrix / NGINX /Amazon ELB
Pipeline Design & Management
Application Lifecycle Management
Leading Cultural Change
Bonus experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
What's in it for you?
Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success. sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology & social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
182,Systems Engineer - Top Secret Clearance,-1,"Millican & Associates, Inc. is a records and information management consulting firm with over thirty (30) years of experience working with clients across a variety of industries and government agencies. We currently have an opening for a Systems Engineer with Top Secret Clearance to provide analysis related to the design, development and integration of hardware, software, man-machine interfaces and all system level requirements to provide an integrated IT solution. *Qualifications/Education for the Systems Engineer: * * Programmatic or technical knowledge identifying, formulating, designing and/or testing practical solutions to engineering problems; * Information Management/Information Governance experience; * Lightweight coding and scripting (JavaScript, VB, JSON, python) * Experience with designing data storage solutions using extract, transform, load (ETL) development; * Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related field; and * Microsoft Technical Solutions Certification or equivalent. * *Top Secret or ""Q*"" clearance required. EOE/M/F/VETS/A/A Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Disability insurance * Flexible spending account * Health insurance * Life insurance * Paid time off * Referral program * Retirement plan * Tuition reimbursement * Vision insurance Schedule: * 8 hour shift Experience: * Systems Analysis: 7 years (Required) Education: * Bachelor's (Required) Security Clearance Required: * Top Secret (Required) Work Location: * One location Company's website: * millican-assoc.com Benefit Conditions: * Waiting period may apply Work Remotely: * Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.3,"Millican & Associates, Inc
4.3","Germantown, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Contract,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
183,Engineer - OEM R&D,-1,"Engineer - OEM R&D

US-PA-Allentown

Job ID: 2020-16979
Type: Regular Full-Time
# of Openings: 1
Category: Engineering
Allentown Mfg Facility

Overview

About B. Braun

B. Braun Medical Inc., a leader in infusion therapy and pain management, develops, manufactures, and markets innovative medical products and services to the healthcare industry. Other key product areas include nutrition, pharmacy admixture and compounding, ostomy and wound care, and dialysis. The company is committed to eliminating preventable treatment errors and enhancing patient, clinician and environmental safety. B. Braun Medical is headquartered in Bethlehem, Pa., and is part of the B. Braun Group of Companies in the U.S., which includes B. Braun Interventional Systems, Aesculap® and CAPS®.

Globally, the B. Braun Group of Companies employs more than 61,000 employees in 64 countries. Guided by its Sharing Expertise® philosophy, B. Braun continuously exchanges knowledge with customers, partners and clinicians to address the critical issues of improving care and lowering costs. To learn more about B. Braun Medical, visit www.BBraunUSA.com.

Responsibilities

Position Summary:

Provide Engineering support and expertise in the design, development, and manufacture of products for B Braun Medical and other customers as part of a cross-functional product development and realization team.

Responsibilities: Essential Duties

Applies standard engineering techniques to design, analyze, test, maintain, repair or improve products, components or assemblies.
Analyzes, develops and evaluates products.
Improves and maintains current products or creates brand new products.
Prepares bids for new projects.
Collaborates with customers as part of a focused, cross-functional team.
Designs and reviews blueprints with designer, visits customers and manages projects.
Must be SME in field at higher levels of job.
Creates test protocols and analyzes data from the execution of those protocols.
Applies engineering techniques and analyses within the scope of the assignment.
The job function listed is not exhaustive and shall also include any responsibilities as assigned by the Supervisor from time to time.

Expertise: Knowledge & Skills

Requires full working knowledge of relevant business practices and procedures in professional field. Uses standard theories, principles and concepts and integrates them to propose a course of action.
Work under minimal supervision. Relies on experience and judgement to plan and accomplish assigned goals. May periodically assist in orienting, training , assigning and checking the work of lower level employees. Referring only complex problems and issues
Judgement is required in resolving all day-to-day problems.
Contacts are primarily with department supervisors, leads, subordinates, and peers. Occasional contact with external contractors/vendors.
Mechanical Engineering, BioMedical Engineering, and Material Science degrees (or equivalent) are preferred given the type of projects and products.
Project Management Professional certification or Project Management experience is preferred.

Qualifications

Expertise: Qualifications - Experience/Training/Education/Etc

Required:

Bachelor's degree (B.S. Engineering) from four-year college or university and 2-3 years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of 10 years of education and experience.
Domestic travel with the remote possibility of International travel.

Desired:

N/A

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to handle or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.

B. Braun offers an excellent benefits package, which includes healthcare, a 401(k) plan, and tuition reimbursement. To learn more about B. Braun and our safety healthcare products or view a listing of our employment opportunities, please visit us on the internet at www.bbraunusa.com.

Through its “Sharing Expertise®” initiative, B. Braun promotes best practices for continuous improvement of healthcare products and services

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, marital status, pregnancy, genetic information, or other legally protected status.

PI124859131",3.7,"B. Braun Medical Inc.
3.7","Allentown, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1839,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
184,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$56k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",4.0,"PNNL
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
185,Sales Engineer,-1,"U.S. Bridge designs, engineers and manufactures steel bridge solutions for the global infrastructure market. We require the skills and expertise of an experienced Sales Engineer. He or she will work closely with our CEO to achieve the desired metrics.

Major Duties and Functions Include:
Learn the technical details about our products and what problems they solve for our clients
Create new sales and marketing strategies and positions our products as the best solutions for prospective clients
Manage customer relations by soliciting and logging client feedback and evaluating the data received
Generate high-quality sales leads and follow up after initial meeting
Identify areas where we can improve customer satisfaction and repeat business, then communicate those issues and possible solutions to upper management
Set and achieve sales goals and quotas on a monthly and quarterly basis
Required Qualifications:
3+ years of technical sales experience
Fully proficient with MS Office products to include, Word, Excel & Powerpoint
*Bachelor’s degree in Civil Engineering*
Working knowledge of infrastructure technologies and methodologies
Excellent communication and analytical skills, inclusive of written, verbal and listening
Customer service orientation
Strong teamwork
Ability to travel up to 20%
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $75,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Commission pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Experience:
Sales Experience: 3 years (Required)
Work Location:
Fully Remote",4.1,"U.S. Bridge
4.1","Columbus, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Legal,Accounting & Legal,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
186,Software Engineer - TS/SCI Required,-1,"As a Software Engineer at Synergist, you will work with a team of developers on a specific project critical to one of our customer’s needs. You'll be an active contributor on an Agile Software development team to deliver custom solutions to the customer. You will perform design, development, and testing activities related to assigned tasks and manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables.

** Position Requires a Top Secret Clearance with a Full-Scope Polygraph**
Degree and Years of Experience
BS degree in Computer Science or a similar technical field of study and 4 years of experience software development/engineering, including requirements analysis, software development, installation, integration, evaluation, enhancement, maintenance, testing, and problem diagnosis/resolution; additional 4 years of experience may be substituted for the degree.
Responsibilities
Be an active contributor on an Agile Software development team to deliver custom solutions to the customer.
Perform design, development, and testing activities related to assigned tasks.
Manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables.
Minimum Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. Citizen.
Ability to collaborate across multiple teams and develop ideas, architectures and agreements to support the interfaces between products.
Software development experience in one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, C++, Ruby.
Experience developing software within a Linux environment.
Experience working with any of the following: web/mobile application development, distributed systems, user interface development, big data analytics.
Excellent communication skills.
Passion for technology and the drive to learn new programming languages and frameworks.
Desired Qualifications:
We realize that we are about to enumerate a bunch of skills and experience here. Don’t worry if you don’t have all of these, but we’d like you to have touched some of these technologies or concepts or at least be familiar with them.
Experience with NoSQL technologies such as MongoDB, REDIS, Neo4J, etc.
Experience with Relational Databases such as MySQL, Oracle, POSTGres
Experience with developing RESTful Services using a framework such as Jersey, Spring MVC, CXF
Experience with an Enterprise Integration Framework such as Apache Camel, or Spring Integration
Experience with JMS to include messaging Frameworks such as Apache ActiveMQ or Apache Artemis.
Experience with Spring to include Spring Boot, Spring Data
Experience with the Java Persistence API through a persistence framework such as Hibernate, OpenJPA
Experience developing and deploying applications to Servlet containers such as Tomcat or Jetty or Application Servers such as Glassfish, JBoss, Weblogic
Experience developing Applications with NodeJS
Experience with JavaScript frameworks such as Ext-JS, AngularJS, Vue or React.
Experience with Javascript, Flex, JSP, HTML, CSS, SpringMVC, or equivalents for UI developers and Spring, Hibernate, JPA, Servlets or equivalents for Java developers
Experience developing web applications leveraging ES6 and component based packaging
Experience with Bootstrap framework.
Experience with JQuery
Experience with Hadoop and MapReduce
Experience developing applications within utility clouds such as AWS, Rackspace, or Heroku
Experience wtth continuous integration tools such as Gitlab I or Jenkins

Know anyone who may also be interested in a position with us? Refer them and receive a substantial referral bonus! https://synergistcomputing.com/referral",5.0,"Synergist Computing
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
187,Computer Science Machine Learning Engineer,$85k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

If you are a talented and motivated early career computer scientist (or equivalent) looking to put your skills to use in a challenging environment that includes supporting military tactical operations and military intelligence, then this is the opportunity for you! MITRE’s Army Division has openings for recent graduates in computer science, machine learning, software engineering or similar degree programs to work a variety of cutting edge projects in information warfare, command and control, fire support (artillery), smart munitions, intelligence, signal processing and much more. The technical work areas include applying machine learning for real-time signal processing, data modeling/management, sensor integration, and UML for software designs. Modern technologies such as React, Node.js, Angular, Protobuf, git, NOSQL, Atlassian, Slack, and more are utilized. Opportunities in research and development exist in such areas as Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Natural Language Processing, and Distributed Computing to support the Army command, control, communications and intelligence capabilities of the future!

MITRE’s Army division has locations in Aberdeen, MD; McLean, VA and other locations.

Responsibilities include:
Develop and hone machine learning algorithms and techniques for real-time operations
Develop software using agile processes and tools (JIRA, git, Jenkins/gradle, and more)
Deliver machine learning based designs and prototypes to Army R&D and Acquisition, Logistics and Technology sponsors
Develop methods and algorithms to represent complex data into usable formats and presentation for decision making
Evaluate technologies and commercial products for potential military applicability
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Programming Language experience with either
Java or similar object-oriented language
Python
Understanding of current machine learning techniques, methods and best-practices
Understanding of software design patterns and best practices
Enthusiasm and a desire to learn and grow
Candidate must be able to obtain and maintain a DoD Secret Clearance which requires US citizenship
Preferred Qualifications:
Advance degree Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Two years of relevant experience
Proven experience with machine learning
Building software with languages/frameworks such as Maven
Understanding of databases (relational or NOSQL)
Familiarity with serialization formats including JSON, XML, and Google Protobuf
Technical writing skills such as drafting software designs and technical guidance
Strong interpersonal, briefing, and communication skills
Ability to obtain and maintain a DoD Top Secret/SCI Clearance.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Aberdeen, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
188,Sr. Software Development Engineer- Embedded,$103k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"· Bachelors degree or higher in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related field
· 7+ years’ experience in software development as an engineer
· 5+ years' experience with software development in C / C++

The AWS Firmware team drives system innovation in the servers used by all of Amazon Web Services, including EC2, S3, CloudFront, etc. Our engineers solve the hardest problems that fuse software, hardware, and the cloud. We take big bets on new concepts, enabling AWS services to continue to revolutionize the industry.

We are looking for a seasoned Senior Software Development engineer to build and own the server related firmware. As a senior engineer in this team, you will work with a team of truly innovative software developers who thrive on creating innovative, scalable solutions for real-world data center infrastructure problems. You will be part of development efforts to build, validate, and support firmware in diverse technology domains from embedded software to large-scale distributed software systems, using proprietary and open source technologies.

Why it matters
Public cloud IT services represent the majority of growth in the overall IT services market and will continue to do so for several years to come. The scale of AWS, combined with an understanding of how our software and hardware is used, creates a unique opportunity for component customizations that will directly benefit our customers.

Why you will love it
You will work with engineers across the company to build software for the next-generation platform. You will have a direct impact on our bottom line and the ability to deliver improvements for our developers. You will be part of a growing, fast paced, and fun team. You will have ownership for the implementation of your work. You will see direct product improvements based on the results of your work.

· Experience developing embedded systems
· Experience with software development for server platforms
· Working knowledge of scripting languages like Python, Shell,
· Understanding of Intel architecture
· Understanding of server platform design and architecture
· Experience with IPMI and BMC development
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role
Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.9,"Amazon Data Services, Inc.
3.9","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
189,EO/IR sensor payload Image Processing Principal Systems Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

We are looking for an EO/IR sensor payload Image Processing Principal Systems Engineer to be part of a growth-oriented organization. This role will leverage your knowledge of all elements of a spaceborne image acquisition system, including algorithm design, sensor and hardware/software performance considerations, optics design, and interface requirements. The successful candidate will have a strong Physical Science/Engineering/Applied Math/Computer Science background. The job will require continuous interaction with the program Chief Engineer, the Systems Engineering team, and a broad cross-functional team. Your vital contribution will help us to deliver excellence on a dynamic program critical to national security.

Required Skills:
8+ years engineering experience
Strong Physical Science/Engineering/Applied Math/Computer Science background
Experience with digital image processing
Extensive experience programming with Matlab
Ability to work independently and manage ones time and tasks
Ability to determine and develop rigorous analytical approaches to problem solving
Evidence of problem solving and time management skills
Experience working with multi-disciplined teams
Active DOD Secret Clearance
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment
Desired Skills:
Experience designing algorithms for target detection and tracking
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work with minimal supervision and collaborate on small teams
Experience designing hardware-in-the-loop and software-in-the-loop testbeds for algorithm verification
Experience with flight software auto-generation using Simulink
Experience with extended Kalman filter design
Required Education:
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Physics, Math, or related STEM discipline

Desired Education:
Advanced degree in Engineering, Physics, Math, or related STEM discipline
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#Space2020
168623

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
190,Systems Engineer II - Master Degree,-1,"2020 Master Degree Graduates! Systems Engineer

One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

Join our highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Job Description:

System of Systems Data and Analysis
One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System of Systems Modeling and Architecture Directorate performs customer focused operational analysis and simulation activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). Supporting this mission are teams driving flexible integration solutions crossing all product areas (sensors, effectors, command and control, logistics and operations), developing tools and methods to evaluate system level analysis and visualization based on customer requirements. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of excellence through innovation and teamwork while championing individual diversity in a flexible work environment to meet the needs of todays workforce.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments that will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters. We are looking for motivated engineers with subject matter expertise in Python, Matlab, or Java at our Tewksbury, Marlborough, or Woburn locations to join our team in the development of novel system of system architectures to deliver best of breed solutions to our customers.

The team applies modeling, simulation, analysis of real-world and modeled data to create deep understanding of needs/constraints and breakdown traditional stovepiped systems to assemble dynamic system-of-system solutions. The systems engineer will analyze end-to-end system needs, in particular to understand system interfaces and data connectivity requirements across the kill-chain. Tasks will include analyzing data, understanding performance requirements, developing metrics, developing or implementing algorithms to cleanse, process, and combine products from multiple systems to provide next-generation performance across the entire system of systems.

Required Skills:
Candidate must have currently enrolled or completed an graduate degree no more than 18 months prior to start date with an emphasis in Systems Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Aerospace, Computer Science or Computer Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related technical field.
Programming experience in Python and/or Java, scientific data analysis with Matlab and other tools, systems/mission modeling and simulation, use of Linux and Windows as data analysis/processing platforms, and data storage in databases
Technical depth in at least one of the following: Radar data processing/analysis, DoD Command and control (C5I) systems, DoD modeling and simulation
This position requires DOD a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.
This position requires a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
Desired Skills:
Knowledge of elements across the kill chain including sensors, C5I, and effectors, along with DoD systems & concepts of operation
Technical skills including radar data processing, virtualization/containerization using Docker or Kubernetes, strong knowledge of SQL or NoSQL databases, information buses like RabbitMQ, Radar modeling and simulation, Command and Control modeling and simulation, communications systems, familiarity with space operations
Required Education: Maters Degree in Engineering, Science, Mathematics or related discipline.
Keywords: Systems engineering, data architecture, radar engineering ,modeling and simulation, space operations, DOD operations, DOD kill-chains, radar data processing.

At RTX, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work.

Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision that is shared by RTX employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place. RTX has been recognized as a respected employer and valued corporate citizen for our employment practices, programs and community support by a number of highly-regarded organizations. The list includes: Forbes, Glassdoor, National Veterans Small Business Association, Corporate Responsibility Magazine, Environmental Protection Agency, Affinity Inc. and many more.

What We Offer: Whether you are just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, RTX offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits RTX offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.
Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.
164552

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Andover, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
191,Software Engineer/Developer – Transportation,$47k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"IAI is looking for a Software Engineer/Developer with experiences in AI/Machine Learning and/or transportation. The candidate will work in an agile and dynamic R&D environment that focuses on developing, improving and testing software code for transportation system management and operation applications. The candidate will support (and/or lead) the development, integration, and testing of software in the areas of traffic data analysis, video/time-series data processing.

Job Duties

Develop and implement software code for signals, image/video and text data analysis
Design, develop and integrate web services to support existing software applications
Contribute and implement the architecture and framework for cloud-based data analytics
Design, enhance, and maintain existing software and perform upgrades to existing live production software applications
Support monitoring of deployed services and applications

Qualifications:

Proficiency in Java programming language
Experience building and maintaining web applications and services.
Familiarity with HTML5/CSS, Bootstrap.
Familiarity with SQL and querying relational databases
Familiarity with Linux and basic shell commands
Proficiency in software tools such as Jira and Git.

Desired Skills/Experience

Proficiency in C/C++ programming languages.
Proficiency in Python programming languages.
Experience with Grails3 and any variant of Spring Framework (Core, Boot, MVC).
Experience with JavaScript and frontend JavaScript libraries and frameworks (i.e., JQuery, Angular, Vue, React).
Familiarity with Android mobile application development.
Familiarity with Windows desktop application development.

Education

A bachelor's degree (or higher) in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Civil Engineering or related field.

About IAI
IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID: 1167",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
192,Data Engineer (Remote),-1,"Our client headquartered in San Francisco, CA is seeking a Data Engineer for a full time permanent opportunity open due to growth and expansion. This is open to 100% remote but must be able to work 9 am- 5pm (Pacific Time).

Responsibilities:

Design and implement reliable ETL data pipelines.
Enabling data-driven decision making across the company
Collaborating with other teams (Engineering, Data Science, Product, Customer Success) to understand their requirements for analysis and then implement solutions as needed
Designing, implementing, iterating on, and maintaining data pipelines and storage systems

Qualifications:

Proficient in one of the following programming languages: Ruby, Go, Python, Scala, Elixir, or Java
Strong experience with relational databases, including ER modeling and performance optimization such as PostgreSQL, Redis, and ElasticSearch
SaaS models and cloud services preferably AWS
Utilize container based technologies to help support a micro service based architecture
Experience designing and operating infrastructure (we use Terraform + Ansible to manage our stack on AWS)
Must be a US Citizen or Green Card Holder

To apply, please send your resume to Sheila@libertyjobs.com.

Sheila Shamloo
Liberty Personnel Services Inc.
Sheila@libertyjobs.com
https://www.linkedin.com/in/sheila-shamloo-026420114/

#LI-SS1

#IT

#midsenior",4.3,"Liberty Personnel Services
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
193,"Data Engineer, Partnerships Central Systems, Data and Tools",$115k-$187k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

Facebook is looking for exceptionally talented and experienced data engineers to join the Partnerships Central Systems, Data and Tools team. The Partnerships team at Facebook works with leading content creators, publishers, and businesses in entertainment, sports, news, and many other verticals. This role is a unique opportunity to work with one of the most important datasets in the world to create analytics tools and systems that enable field organizations, analysts and clients alike. You will work with some of the brightest minds in the industry, and get an opportunity to solve some of the most challenging business problems on the web and mobile Internet, at a scale that few companies can match. The ideal candidate will have a passion for problem solving and a belief in the power of incremental change in a fast-paced environment.
Develop methods to unlock access to data for stakeholders across the Partnerships Organization
Design, build and maintain efficient & reliable data pipelines to move and transform data (both large and small amounts)
Architect build and launch new data models that provide intuitive analytics
Design and develop new systems and tools to enable folks to consume and understand data faster
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, and make recommendations
Build data expertise and own data quality for allocated areas of ownership
Work with data infrastructure to triage infra issues and drive to resolution
Support on-call shift as needed to support the team
BS in Computer Science, Engineering, Math or related field
4+ years experience in custom ETL/data pipeline design, implementation and maintenance
4+ years experience of SQL (Oracle, Vertica, Hive, etc.)
Expert coding skills with at least one object-oriented programming language (Python, Java, PHP)
Experience with data architecture, data modeling, schema design and software development
Experience with large data sets, Hadoop, and data visualization tools
Experience initiating and driving projects, and communicating data warehouse plans to internal clients/stakeholders
Experience with packages such as R, Tableau, SPSS, SAS, STATA, etc.
Familiar with version control systems (Git, Mercurial, etc.)
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
194,Real-Time Software Engineer,$47k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

Intelligent Automation, Inc. (IAI) is looking for a new team member who is a self-motivated Software Engineer with a passion for electro-mechanical systems. You will be working with the Robotics and Electromechanical Systems Group to develop custom solutions in the fields of Robotics, Autonomy, Human-Machine Interface, Machine Vision, and Electromechanical System Design.

We have numerous active research and development projects where we design, integrate, test, and deploy systems for a range of applications, including aircraft inspection, ISR (intelligence, surveillance, and reconnaissance), utility construction, medical training, IED/EOD operations, and simulation. We are looking to add expertise and talent to our multi-disciplinary team to continue to achieve success in all of these areas.

Job Duties
• Work closely with algorithm developers, and/or lead algorithmic development, to mature algorithms from MATLAB and C++ to real-time applications.
• Develop and /or improve software frameworks that handle multiple sensor streams while allowing algorithms to process them.
• Profile software systems to identify bottlenecks (processor, memory, I/O) and collaborate on improvements as needed.
• Utilize and/or modify existing code bases and libraries; create and shape new functionality.

Required Experience
• Bachelors (BS) or Master’s degree (MS) in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science (or a related field)

Required Skills
• Knowledge and hands-on experience of medium scale software project developed and executed in Linux with build configuration and customization. Bonus for familiarity with embedded Linux.
• Experience prototyping and implementing challenging software solutions or algorithms in C/C++ based on collaboration and whiteboarding sessions.
• Multi process/thread programming such as thread safety and synchronization using frameworks like Boost, C++11, and ASIO event driven when relevant.
• Strong background in Object Oriented Programming (OOP).
• Inter-System communication over TCP/UDP, Serial Interface such as I2C, SPI, UART.
• Experience configuring C/C++ compilers for libraries and optimizations either through an IDE or Makefile
• Profile/Optimize software to select/meet target platform
• Write clean, efficient, well-documented code
• Proficient with SCM tools such as SVN, GIT, and Mercurial
• Strong written and communication skills

Desired Skills
• Familiar with common signal processing and/or image processing algorithms
• Installing and configuring embedded Linux, i.e. Yocto, Arch, Raspberry Pi (Raspian)
• Optimization using GPU or SIMD/NEON.
• Toolchain & Compiler/Cross-Compiler Technologies for ARM/X86/X86_64/BareMetal
• Experience with common middleware implementations that interchange data between algorithms and applications such as Robotic Operating System (ROS)
• Experience with prototyping, integrating, testing and deploying electromechanical systems
• Experience prototyping software based on conference/journal publications

About IAI

IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,

color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID: 19-1212",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
195,Senior Data Engineer (2 Openings--Urgent Need),-1,"Why Should You Join First Advantage?

First Advantage is in the midst of a technology revolution, and the best time to join us is right now! We are developing incredible solutions, working with amazing customers, and we would love to see how your skills could help get people back to work. Our brand new Data team is recruiting several passionate people in greater metropolitan areas across the Central and Eastern time zones (namely Chicago, Atlanta, Charlotte, Austin, Boston, Houston, Columbus, Tampa, etc) in the US! This opportunity is for remote work, with occasional travel to our Atlanta office.

First Advantage has over 4000 employees across the world and does over 71 million background screens a year, so if you’re looking for opportunities working with advanced technologies to produce awesome user experiences and securely process high-volume transactions leveraging massive amounts of data, then this is the place for you!

We work with Fortune 100 and Global 500 hundred companies, so your work will directly impact some of the largest enterprises in the world!

We need talent that is Informed, Insightful, Transformational, and Progressive

We’re looking for two Sr Data Engineers! You’re our ideal candidate if you 5+ years of strong experience and expertise with SQL, 3+ years of experience working with Python, Hive/Hadoop, and Apache Spark (RStudio is a plus), and you have strong data analytics and troubleshooting skills. The Sr Data Engineers manage the complex data flow across multiple Enterprise systems and will be working with business and technical teams to load data from various internal and external sources to FADV data warehouses and DataLake systems hosted from on premise or cloud. We’re looking for someone who can do the deeply analytical work, and knows how to code. If you meet those requirements, and have experience working with integration software packages like Oracle Data Integrator or Mulesoft, you could be a great fit!

Our brand new Data team have the opportunity to build a game-changing solution from the ground up, and that solution will drive the next generation of background screening. Joining our team right now is an incredible opportunity to be on the ground floor of our technology transformation, and will give you a chance to make a real difference!

Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 5 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL
Minimum of 3+ years of experience working with Python, Hive/Hadoop, Apache Spark. RStudio is a Plus
Strong communication skills and creative skills
Strong data analytics and troubleshooting skills
Preferred Requirements
RStudio, and experience with data integration software packages like Oracle Data Integrator or Mulesoft
Strong working experience in an OEM product company that with variety of integrated customer base
Experience with programming languages like Java/.NET
Strong experience in Relations Database and Big Data analytics
Knowledge of other BI tools like Oracle Business Intelligence, SQL Server Reporting, Cognos
Experience with machine learning models (neural, bayesian, clustering algorithms, decision tree, supervised learning, unsupervised learning)",3.5,"First Advantage Corporation
3.5",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
196,IT Enterprise Systems Engineer,$58k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION: IT ENTERPRISE SYSTEMS ENGINEER

Summary:

Report to the SVP/ Head of IT and assist with the design, selection, integration and implementation of the Bank’s technology platforms. The Enterprise Systems Engineer will be a key strategist and administrator working with the Head of IT to lead the bank in projects requiring provisioning, deployment, security considerations, upgrading and retirement of key bank platforms and solutions. This position will also serve as a technical escalation resource for the IT Department and will provide technical mentoring and guidance for IT staff as required.

Key Result Areas:
Leverage experience and technical knowhow to assist the Head of IT with the design, selection, implementation and integration of the Bank’s technology platforms
Provide business systems architecture and processing guidance ensuring the efficiency, security and support of the organization’s goals
Escalation support for IT Systems and Helpdesk functions as needed based on experience and overall IT knowledge
Assist in the management of vendor selection, vendor relationship management, risk assessment and documentation
Assist in the technology selection and risk assessment process
Help to maintain the Enterprise Data Flow documentation to ensure customer information storage and flow are properly documented
Participate in Project Management Office (PMO) project meetings to ensure IT concerns, capabilities and requirements are addressed
Support the integration and implementation of net new systems as well as the upgrade of existing solutions
Recommend new policies and procedures and/or assist the Head of IT in the development and documentation of new policies and procedures
Perform additional duties as required
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology or other subject matter area with equivalent IT experience
15+ years of experience in Information Technology implementation, maintenance and support
3+ years of experience managing IT Staff
2+ years of experience in business analysis, system implementation and project management
10+ years of experience in virtualization, storage, networking, Exchange and SQL technologies
Strong communication, customer service and interpersonal skills
Experienced in the use of Microsoft Office, Visio, SharePoint, Office 365
Ability to work a flexible schedule; i.e. weekends and evenings as needed
The above description covers the most significant responsibilities but does not exclude other occasional responsibilities and accountabilities, the inclusion of which would be in conformity with the major purpose of this job.

Location:

Waltham, Massachusetts

About Cambridge Savings Bank:

Cambridge Savings Bank is a full-service financial institution with approximately $5 billion in assets that is committed to improving the quality of life in the communities it serves. One of the oldest and largest community banks in Massachusetts, Cambridge Savings Bank offers a full line of individual and business banking services and has branches located in Arlington, Bedford, Belmont, Burlington, Cambridge, Charlestown, Concord, Lexington, Melrose, Newton, and Watertown.

Cambridge Savings Bank is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. We are a VEVRAA Federal Contractor.",3.7,"Cambridge Savings Bank
3.7","Waltham, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1834,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
197,Sr. Network Engineer with SECURITY CLEARANCE - ATMP,-1,"Job Location: * Ft. Irwin, California
Consolidated Networks Corporation (CNC) is hiring a Senior Network Engineer. This position is at Ft. Irwin, the U.S. Army National Training Center (NTC) located in the Mojave Desert 40 miles northeast of Barstow, CA. Candidate will perform primarily Network Administration duties supporting multiple domain environment systems and all supporting servers, networks, desktops and other duties as assigned in a complex fast paced 24x7 DoD Army computing environment.
Requirements: *
Must be a U.S. Citizen with an active DoD Secret security Clearance;
Security + certification required;
Must have a valid driver’s license and maintain Fort Irwin driving privileges;
Must be able to lift 50 lbs. and wear appropriate personal protective equipment;
Must be able to travel to remote locations in extreme weather conditions as required to include the heat, and cold of the Mojave Desert, helicopter travel, 4x4 travel, tactical vehicles elevated walkways, and mountain tops.
Skills: *
3+ years of experience in network engineering;
CCNA or equivalent certification preferred;
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, and procedures in the networking field;
SolarWinds;
DISA Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIGs).
Duties and Responsibilities: *
The Sr. Network Engineer will be responsible for the following:
Configuration of routing and switching equipment;
Establishing a networking environment by designing system configuration, directing system installation, documenting, and enforcing system standards;
Maintain system baselines and STIGS;
Implementation of new solutions and improving resilience of the current environment;
Maximizing network performance by monitoring performance, troubleshooting network problems and outages, scheduling upgrades and collaborating with network architects on network optimization;
Reporting network operational status by gathering, prioritizing information and managing projects;
Upgrading data network equipment to latest stable firmware releases;
Support end users/customers during installation;
Mentor and train junior staff.
.
Corporate Benefits: *
CNC provides health care, dental, term life, long term disability, 401k with company matching, as well as 10 Federal Holidays observed, paid time off, sick and bereavement leave.
CNC Background: *
CNC is an employee-owned corporation with core competencies in numerous IT functions. These competencies include voice, video, and data network design and implementation, telecom engineering, physical layer installation, network administration and management, performance and security optimization, and IT outsourcing. Founded in 1998, CNC provides end-to-end network engineering and IT services to its government, education, and corporate clients. Those services include secure high-speed internet access, flexible remote access, and high-performance wide-area and local-area networking. CNC serves a wide range of clients, from long-haul carriers and non-traditional entrants in the telecom industry, large enterprise clients, small businesses, education and government organizations.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
License:
Security+ (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Required)",-1,Consolidated Networks Corporation (CNC),California,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
198,Quality Planner Engineer,-1,"About the company*
GRAMMER AG is specialized in developing and manufacturing components and systems for car interiors as well as driver and passenger seats for off-road vehicles, trucks, buses, and trains.

At Grammer, people are at the forefront and they are the drivers and heart of the group. Employees are constantly engaged in developing and producing innovative, flexible solutions to meet challenges in today’s competitive global market. Grammar is driven by a passion to improve the quality of life of people who use vehicles because increasing mobility at ever-higher speeds calls for as much safety and comfort as possible. Day after day, millions of people rely on innovative and creative solutions made by GRAMMER – at work, in their everyday lives and while traveling.

https://www.grammer.com/en/career.html
About the job*
A. GOAL SETTING / TASKS: *
To plan, maintain, and execute the processes and procedures (according to GRAMMER Quality Product Development Guidelines) required for development of the new product and continues improvement of the existing products and equipment required for quality insurance. APQP and support of the product launch in supplier facilities and GRAMMER manufacturing plants is part primary task as well.

The holder of QP position should have at least 3 Years experience in quality insurance and planning in Automotive Industry, knowledge in PSO, R&R, PSW, PPAP.
B. PRIMARY DUTIES *
Planning of equipment for quality insurance for new and existing products (gauges etc.)

Cost estimations for required equipment and invest

Participation in DFMEA and PFMEA

Preparation of documentation for quality insurance on new products (incoming material inspection, inspection of finish goods, control plans etc)

Statistical analysis of the components and equipment for quality insurance (capability and repeatability, R&R etc)

Preparation of the PSO, PSW and PPAP documentation

Plant support for PSO, PSW and PPAP

Follow up supplier PPAP

Supplier quality development

Input and analysis of GD&T

Input into development teams

Actively participate in continuous improvement and corrective action activities

Responsible for DMR, 7D, 8D Reports to customers and suppliers

Provide support and direction to suppliers

Responsible for APQP

Input of SAP data required for project planning

Carry on DVP and component testing (internal and external)

Planning of the traceability for the components and the product
C. OTHER: *
Authority to prevent occurrences of nonconformances in product, process, and/or systems; identify and record any problems; initiate, recommend or provide solutions and control quality.
D. WORKPLACE REQUIREMENTS/CONDITIONS: *
Ability to travel to supplier and other GRAMMER facilities

Ability to communicate in a team environment

Ability to communicate with suppliers and customers in a professional manor

Ability to operate a PC for extended periods of time

Ability to operate standard business equipment (fax, copy, phone etc)
Education: *
BA/BS Degree in Engineering

Quality Assurance Organization Certification preferred
Experience: *
Minimum 3 Years experience in quality planning and/or quality insurance in automotive industry
Knowledge and skills: *
Working knowledge of ISO/QS9000/TS16949

Quality System auditing experience

APQP knowledge

PPAP, PSO, PTR, PSW knowledge

DFMEA/PFMEA knowledge

Knowledge in GD&T

Demonstrated knowledge of statistical process control

Ability to read CAD drawings

Good organizational skills

Proficient knowledge in PC skills, primary Excel, Word, PowerPoint

Basic knowledge in Spanish language

Flexible, dependable, and creative

Ability to collect, maintain, and analyze data

Ability to work independently

Ability to prioritize projects

Basic knowledge in SAP

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Quality Planning and/or Quality Insurance: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
Quality Assurance Organization (Preferred)
Application Question:
Any knowledge in PSO, R&R, PSW, PPAP?",-1,Pin-Point Solutions,"Shannon, MS",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
199,Lead Search and Relevance Engineer,$68k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Search and Relevance Engineer is responsible for the design construction and maintainenance of a relevant and reliable search experience for Tractor Supply Company E-Commerce applications. This requires strong knowledge of search algorithms, technologies and infrstructure with a background in Solr, Large Scale Data Processing, and Site Search best practices. Additional responsibilities include mentoring other team members.

Responsibilities:

Meets with technical leads, architects and vendor partners to determine project scope and vision, set system goals, identify and resolve system issues, ensure the system is implemented as designed and in adherence to the implementation guidelines.
Partners with the business analysts to review and refine business requirements into core system capabilities.
Assists developers, analysts, and designers in conceptualizing and validating solutions that meet business requirements.
Prototypes new requirements for the purpose of enhancing technical functionalities and information process flow.
Develops and/or configures, builds, reviews and unit tests software/solutions.
Mentors team members on new technologies in area of expertise.
Works with Enterprise teams to ensure changes are properly documented, communicated, audited, and deployed in compliance with established procedures.
Participates in 24x7 on call rotations.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or 4-year equivalent required. College degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or related field is preferred.
6-9 years of experience in designing and building complex search based applications using Java or related technologies
Experience with Solr or Elastic Search or similar technologies (Solr preferred)

Strong knowledge of linguistic processing functions such as stemming, spell checking, search relevancy tuning, customization of dictionaries, stop words and synonyms
Strong experience with search algorithms, taxonomies, recommendation engines, rules engines, personalization and merchandising
Hands-on experience developing large-scale data processing pipelines or analytics
Deep, specialized domain knowledge and expertise in web services design, analytics architectures and query optimization
Strong experience with auto-suggests, auto-corrections, type ahead, and other core search functions
Strong experience with user engagement metrics, search relevancy and information retrieval metrics
Ability to work independently, work in a fast paced environment, and manage workload prioritization to deliver high quality work products on time with minimal direction is preferred.
Company Overview:

Tractor Supply Company (TSCO), the largest rural lifestyle retailer in the United States, is dedicated to enhancing our strong company culture built on our Team Members’ commitment to our Mission and Values. With over 1,900 stores in 49 states and an innovative e-commerce platform, Tractor Supply ranks in the Fortune 400 with annual revenues of more than $8 billion and growing! Come grow your career with us as we serve those who live “Life out Here”!",3.4,"Tractor Supply Company
3.4","Brentwood, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1938,Company - Public,Home Centers & Hardware Stores,Retail,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
